Nebraska, session 109, LB474.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 8-319, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-319 (1) No loan shall be made by such association except to its own
members, and no loan shall be made to any member for any sum in excess of the
par value of his or her stock. The borrower shall pledge to the association, as
security for the loan, shares of a maturity value equal to the principal of the
loan and, except as otherwise provided in this section, ample security by
mortgage or deeds of trust on real estate. For purposes of this section, real
property and real estate shall include a leasehold or subleasehold estate in
real property under a lease or sublease the term of which does not expire, or
which is renewable automatically or at the option of the holder or of the
association so as not to expire for at least five years beyond the maturity of
the debt. Loans made upon improved real estate, except as otherwise provided in
this section, shall not exceed ninety-five percent of the reasonable normal
cash value thereof, and all loans made on any other real estate shall not
exceed three-fourths of the reasonable normal cash value thereof.
(2) An association may make a loan or loans in an amount exceeding ninety-
five percent of the reasonable normal cash value of the real estate security
(a) if such loan or loans are made to a veteran in accord with the provisions
of 38 U.S.C., as now existing or as hereafter amended, (b) if the proceeds of
the loan or loans are to be used in purchasing residential property or in
constructing a dwelling on unimproved property owned by such veteran to be
occupied as his or her home, used for the purpose of making repairs,
alterations, or improvements in or paying delinquent indebtedness, taxes, or
special assessments on residential property owned by the veteran and used by
him or her as his or her home, or used in purchasing any land and buildings to
be used by the applicant in pursuing a gainful occupation other than farming,
-1-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
and (c) if the Secretary of Veterans Affairs guarantees that portion of such
loan or loans in excess of ninety-five percent of the reasonable normal cash
value of the real estate security.
(3) An association is authorized to obtain insurance of its loans by the
Federal Housing Administrator under Title II of the National Housing Act, as
amended, and such loans so made upon improved real estate and so insured shall
not be subject to the restrictions set forth in this section with reference to
the maximum authorized amount of a loan.
(4) An association may make unsecured loans to its members if such loans
(a) are insured under Title I and Title II of the National Housing Act, as
amended, or (b) are for property alterations, repair, or improvements. The
aggregate amount of loans made under subdivisions (a) and (b) of this
subsection shall not at any time exceed twenty percent of the association's
assets. Each loan made under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall be
repayable in regular monthly installments within a period of twenty years and
shall be supported by a written property statement on forms to be prescribed by
the Department of Banking and Finance. An association may make secured loans to
its members and may make loans under 38 U.S.C., as amended, under Chapter V,
subchapter C of the Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933, as amended (12 U.S.C.), and
on the security of mobile homes.
(5) The stock of such association may be accepted as security for a loan
of the amount of the withdrawal value of such stock without other security.
(6) An association when so licensed may make loans to its own members upon
the terms and security set forth in the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act.
(7) Any provisions of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, an
association may make any loan that a federal savings and loan association doing
business in this state is or may be authorized to make.
(8) An association may invest in loans, obligations, and advances of
credit, all of which are referred to in this subsection as loans, made for the
payment of expenses of business school, technical training school, college, or
university education, but no association shall make any investment in loans
under this subsection if the principal amount of its investment in such loans,
exclusive of any investment which is or which at the time of its making was
otherwise authorized, would thereupon exceed five percent of its assets. Such
loans may be secured, partly secured, or unsecured, and the association may
require a comaker or comakers, insurance, guaranty under a governmental student
loan guarantee plan, or other protection against contingencies. The borrower
shall certify to the association that the proceeds of the loan are to be used
by a full-time student solely for the payment of expenses of business,
technical training school, college, or university education.
(9) An association may participate with other lenders in making loans of
any type that an association may otherwise make if (a) each of the lenders is
either an instrumentality of the United States Government or is insured by the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or, in the case of another lender, the
interest of the association in such loan is superior to the participating
interests of the other participants and (b) an association whose accounts are
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation which may be a federal
association or an association chartered by this state, or another association
chartered by this state which is not so insured, has otherwise complied with
subsection (1) of this section with respect to loans to members.
(10) An association may sell to or purchase from any institution which is
a savings association chartered by this state or the accounts of which are
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation a participating interest
in any loan, whether or not, in the case of a purchase, the security is located
within the association's regular lending area.
Sec. 2. Section 8-330, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended to
read:
8-330 Every association may require borrowing members to pay all
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the making, closing,
disbursing, extending, readjusting, or renewing of real estate loans. Such
expenses may include abstract, recording, and registration fees, title
examinations, survey, escrow services, and taxes or charges imposed upon or in
connection with the making and recording of any mortgage. Such reasonable
charges may be collected by the association from the borrower and shall not be
considered interest or a charge for the use of the money loaned. A charge not
exceeding one percent or that allowed a federally chartered association for the
premature prepayment may be made. The rate of interest on any loan of money
shall be determined and computed upon the assumption that the debt will be paid
according to the agreed terms and in the event the loan is paid or collected by
court action prior to the term of the loan, any payment charged, received, or
taken as an advance or forbearance which is in the nature of and taken into
account in the calculation of interest, shall be spread over the stated term of
the loan for the purpose of determining the rate of interest. Any amounts paid
or contracted to be paid by persons other than the borrower shall not be
considered interest and shall not be taken into account in the calculation of
interest. Interest may be paid on escrow accounts held for the payment of
taxes, insurance, and similar payments, if agreed to in writing by the borrower
and association. Loans may be made by an association under a license granted it
pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, to borrowing members
whose loans are secured by real estate, to the same extent and in the same
amount as such loans may lawfully be made to nonborrowing members. The
association shall furnish a loan settlement statement to each borrower,
-2-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
indicating in detail the charges and fees such borrower has paid or obligated
himself or herself to pay to the association or to any other person in
connection with such loan. A copy of such statement shall be retained in the
records of the association.
An association may charge and receive interest, on property improvement
loans including loans made under Title I of the National Housing Act, as
amended, and unsecured loans authorized in section 5(c) of the Home Owners'
Loan Act, as amended.
Sec. 3. Section 8-601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended to
read:
8-601 The Director of Banking and Finance may employ deputies, examiners,
attorneys, and other assistants as may be necessary for the administration of
the provisions and purposes of the Credit Union Act, Delayed Deposit Services
Licensing Act, Interstate Branching and Merger Act, Interstate Trust Company
Office Act, Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995, Nebraska Banking Act,
Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act,
Nebraska Installment Sales Act, Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, Nebraska Trust
Company Act, and Residential Mortgage Licensing Act; Chapter 8, articles 3, 5,
6, 7, 8, 13, 14, 15, 16, 19, 20, 24, and 25; and Chapter 45, articles 1 and 2.
The director may levy upon financial institutions, namely, the banks, trust
companies, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations,
savings banks, digital asset depositories, and credit unions, organized under
the laws of this state, and holding companies, if any, of such financial
institutions, an assessment each year based upon the asset size of the
financial institution, except that in determining the asset size of a holding
company or digital asset depository, the assets of any financial institution or
holding company otherwise assessed pursuant to this section and the assets of
any nationally chartered financial institution shall be excluded. The
assessment for digital asset depositories under the Nebraska Financial
Innovation Act shall be in an amount to offset the costs of supervision and
administration of the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act. The assessment shall
be a sum determined by the director in accordance with section 8-606 and
approved by the Governor.
Sec. 4. Section 8-602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-602 The Director of Banking and Finance shall charge and collect fees
for certain services rendered by the Department of Banking and Finance
according to the following schedule:
(1) For filing and examining articles of incorporation, articles of
association, and bylaws, except credit unions, one hundred dollars, and for
credit unions, fifty dollars;
(2) For filing and examining an amendment to articles of incorporation,
articles of association, and bylaws, except credit unions, fifty dollars, and
for credit unions, fifteen dollars;
(3) For issuing to banks, credit card banks, trust companies, and building
and loan associations a charter, authority, or license to do business in this
state, a sum which shall be determined on the basis of one dollar and fifty
cents for each one thousand dollars of authorized capital, except that the
minimum fee in each case shall be two hundred twenty-five dollars;
(4) For issuing to digital asset depositories under the Nebraska Financial
Innovation Act a charter to do business in this state, the sum of fifty
thousand dollars;
(5) For issuing an executive officer's or loan officer's license, fifty
dollars at the time of the initial license, except credit unions for which the
fee shall be twenty-five dollars at the time of the initial license;
(6) For affixing certificate and seal, five dollars;
(7) For making substitution of securities held by it and issuing a
receipt, fifteen dollars;
(8) For issuing a certificate of approval to a credit union, ten dollars;
(9) For investigating the applications required by sections 8-117, 8-120,
8-331, and 8-2402 and the documents required by section 8-201, the cost of such
examination, investigation, and inspection, including all legal expenses and
the cost of any hearing transcript, with a minimum fee under (a) sections
8-117, 8-120, and 8-2402 of two thousand five hundred dollars, (b) section
8-331 of two thousand dollars, and (c) section 8-201 of one thousand dollars.
The department may require the applicant to procure and give a surety bond in
such principal amount as the department may determine and conditioned for the
payment of the fees provided in this subdivision;
(10) For the handling of pledged securities as provided in sections
8-210 , 8-2727, and 8-3022 at the time of the initial deposit of such
securities, one dollar and fifty cents for each thousand dollars of securities
deposited and a like amount on or before January 15 each year thereafter. The
fees shall be paid by the entity pledging the securities;
(11) For investigating an application to move its location within the city
or village limits of its original license or charter for banks, trust
companies, and building and loan associations, two hundred fifty dollars;
(12) For investigating an application under subdivision (6) of section
8-115.01, five hundred dollars;
(13) For investigating an application for approval to establish or acquire
a branch pursuant to section 8-157 or 8-2103 or to establish a mobile branch
pursuant to section 8-157, two hundred fifty dollars;
(14) For investigating a notice of acquisition of control under subsection
(1) of section 8-1502, five hundred dollars;
-3-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(15) For investigating an application for a cross-industry merger under
section 8-1510, five hundred dollars;
(16) For investigating an application for a merger of two state banks, a
merger of a state bank and a national bank in which the state bank is the
surviving entity, or an interstate merger application in which the Nebraska
state chartered bank is the resulting bank, five hundred dollars;
(17) For investigating an application or a notice to establish a branch
trust office, five hundred dollars;
(18) For investigating an application or a notice to establish a
representative trust office, five hundred dollars;
(19) For investigating an application to establish a credit union branch
under section 21-1725.01, two hundred fifty dollars;
(20) For investigating an applicant under section 8-1513, five thousand
dollars;
(21) For investigating a request to extend a conditional bank charter
under section 8-117, one thousand dollars; and
(22) For investigating an application to establish a branch office, for a
merger or an acquisition of control, or for a request to extend a conditional
charter for a digital asset depository, five hundred dollars.
Sec. 5. Section 8-820.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-820.01 It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of
Nebraska that for purposes of applying the federal most-favored-lender
doctrine, the bank credit card rate contained in section 8-820 is not
comparable or analogous to the small loan rate found in section 70 of this act
sections 45-1024 and section 45-350 45-1025. The Legislature finds that the
institutions making small loans and the institutions administering a bank
credit card are categorically different. The transactions carried on by these
institutions are categorically different. The Legislature finds that small loan
borrowers and bank credit card users are not synonymous or comparable. In
establishing a small loan rate, the Legislature has recognized a risk factor
that is different and greater than other financial transactions and therefor
justifies the charging of a higher interest rate than installment loans,
personal loans, retail revolving credit plans, or bank credit card interest
rates.
Sec. 6. Section 8-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2701 Sections 8-2701 to 8-2742 8-2747 shall be known and may be cited as
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 7. Section 8-2702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2702 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act: , the
definitions found in sections 8-2703 to 8-2723 shall be used.
(1) Acting in concert means persons knowingly acting together with a
common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not pursuant
to an express agreement;
(2) Applicant means a person filing an application for a license under the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(3) Authorized delegate means a person designated by the licensee to
engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
(4) Average daily money transmission liability means the amount of the
licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state at the end
of each day in a given period of time, added together, and divided by the total
number of days in the given period of time. For purposes of calculating average
daily money transmission liability under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
for any licensee required to do so, the given period of time shall be each
calendar quarter;
(5) Closed loop stored value means stored value that is redeemable by the
issuer of such stored value only for goods or services provided by the issuer
or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or affiliates of such
franchisees, except to the extent the stored value is required by applicable
law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of the stored value;
(6)(a) Control means:
(i) Direct or indirect power over the vote of at least twenty-five percent
of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a licensee or person in
control of a licensee;
(ii) The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals,
executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons that have
managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; or
(iii) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of
a licensee.
(b) For purposes of determining the percentage of a person controlled by
any other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated with the interest
of any other immediate family member, including the person's spouse, parents,
children, siblings, mothers-in-law, fathers-in law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-
law, brothers-in-law, and sisters-in-law, and any other person who shares such
person's residence;
(7) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(9) Eligible rating means a credit rating of any of the three highest
rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby each category
may include rating category modifiers such as plus or minus for Standard and
-4-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
Poor's Corporation or the equivalent for any other eligible rating service.
Long-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to A- or
higher by Standard and Poor's Corporation, or the equivalent from any other
eligible rating service. Short-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if the
rating is equal to or higher than A-2 or SP-2 by Standard and Poor's
Corporation or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service. In the
event that ratings differ among eligible rating services, the highest rating
shall apply when determining whether a security bears an eligible rating.
(10) Eligible rating service means any nationally recognized statistical
rating organization approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission and any
other organization designated by the director by rule or order;
(11) Federally insured depository financial institution means a bank,
credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association,
savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company organized under the
laws of the United States or any state of the United States, when such bank,
credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings association,
savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company has federally insured
deposits;
(12) In this state means at a physical location within this state for a
transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested electronically or
by telephone, the provider of money transmission may determine if the person
requesting the transaction is in this state by relying on other information
provided by such person regarding the location of the individual's residential
address or the entity's principal place of business or other physical address
location and any records associated with such person that the provider of money
transmission may have that indicate the location of the individual's
residential address or the entity's principal place of business or other
physical address location, including, but not limited to, an address associated
with an account;
(13) Individual means a natural person;
(14) Key individual means any individual ultimately responsible for
establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, such as an
executive officer, manager, director, or trustee;
(15) Licensee means a person licensed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act;
(16) Material litigation means litigation, that according to United States
generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to a person's
financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the person's annual
audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records;
(17) Model Money Transmission Modernization Act means the Model Money
Transmission Modernization Act approved for state adoption by the Conference of
State Bank Supervisors Board of Directors that sets nationwide standards,
including net worth, surety bond, and permissible investments requirements, to
modernize the supervision and regulation of money transmitters;
(18) Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable
in money;
(19) Money means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted by the
United States or a foreign government. Money includes a monetary unit of
account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement
between two or more governments;
(20)(a) Money transmission means any of the following:
(i) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in this
state;
(ii) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this state;
and
(iii) Receiving money for transmission from a person located in this
state.
(b) Money transmission includes payroll processing services. Money
transmission does not include the provision solely of online or
telecommunications services or network access;
(21) Multistate licensing process means any agreement entered into by and
among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of applications for
money transmission licenses, applications for the acquisition of control of a
licensee, control determinations, or notice and information requirements for a
change of key individuals;
(22) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, also known as the Nationwide
Multistate Licensing System and Registry, developed by the Conference of State
Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage
Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry LLC, or any
successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration of persons
in financial services industries;
(23)(a) Outstanding money transmission obligation means:
(i) Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the licensee
to a person located in the United States or reported as sold by an authorized
delegate of the licensee to a person that is located in the United States that
has not yet been paid or refunded by or for the licensee or has been escheated
in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws; or
(ii) Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an authorized
delegate in the United States from a person located in the United States that
has not been received by the payee or refunded to the sender or has been
escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned property laws.
(b) For purposes of subdivision (23) of this section, in the United States
-5-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
includes, to the extent applicable, a person in any state, territory, or
possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico; or a United States military installation that is located in a
foreign country;
(24) Payment instrument means a written or electronic check, draft, money
order, traveler's check, or other written or electronic instrument for the
transmission or payment of money or monetary value, whether or not negotiable.
Payment instrument does not include stored value or any instrument that:
(a) Is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the
issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or affiliates
of such franchisees except to the extent the instrument is required by
applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of the instrument;
or
(b) Is not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty,
rewards, or promotional program;
(25) Payroll processing services means receiving money for transmission
pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages or salaries, make payment
of payroll taxes to state and federal agencies, make payments relating to
employee benefit plans, or make distributions of other authorized deductions
from wages or salaries. Payroll processing services does not include an
employer performing payroll processing services on the employer's own behalf or
on behalf of an affiliate of the employer;
(26) Person means any individual, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association, joint
stock corporation, or other corporate entity identified by the director;
(27) Receipt means a paper receipt, electronic record, or other written
confirmation;
(28) Receiving money for transmission or money received for transmission
means receiving money or monetary value in the United States for transmission
within or outside the United States by electronic or other means;
(29) Remit means to make direct payments of money to a licensee or a
representative of a licensee authorized to receive money or to deposit money in
a bank in an account specified by the licensee; and
(30) Stored value means monetary value representing a claim against the
issuer of the stored value evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and
that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for money or
monetary value, or payment for goods or services. Stored value includes, but is
not limited to, prepaid access as defined by 31 C.F.R. 1010.100.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, stored value does not include a payment
instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not sold publicly but
issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program.
Sec. 8. Section 8-2703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2703 The Nebraska Money Transmitters Act does not apply to:
(1) An operator of a payment system to the extent that such operator
provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or among persons
exempted from the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act under this section or
licensees, in connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit
card transactions, stored value transactions, automated clearinghouse
transfers, or similar funds transfers;
(2) A person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and process a
payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services, other than money
transmission, provided to the payor by the payee, provided that:
(a) There exists a written agreement between the payee and the agent
directing the agent to collect and process payments from payors on the behalf
of the payee;
(b) The payee holds the agent out to the public as accepting payments for
goods or services on the behalf of the payee; and
(c) Payment for the goods or services is treated as received by the payee
upon receipt by the agent so that the payor's obligation is extinguished and
there is no risk of loss to the payor if the agent fails to remit the funds to
the payee;
(3) A person that acts as an intermediary by processing payments between
an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money transmission
obligation to a sender, and the sender's designated recipient, provided that
the entity:
(a) Is properly licensed or exempt from licensing requirements of the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(b) Provides a receipt, electronic record, or other written confirmation
to the sender identifying the entity as the provider of money transmission in
the transaction; and
(c) Bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding money
transmission obligation to the sender, including the obligation to make the
sender whole in connection with any failure to transmit the funds to the
designated recipient of the sender;
(4) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof or any agent of the United States or any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(5) Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by an agent
of the United States Postal Service;
(6) A state, county, or city or any governmental agency, political
subdivision, or instrumentality of a state, or any agent of a state, county, or
city or any governmental agency, political subdivision, or instrumentality of a
-6-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
state;
(7) A federally insured depository financial institution, bank holding
company, office of an international banking corporation, foreign bank that
establishes a federal branch pursuant to the International Banking Act of 1978,
corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service Company Act, or corporation
organized under the Edge Act;
(8) Electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a federal,
state, county, or other governmental agency by a contractor on behalf of the
United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or on behalf
of a state, county, or other governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(9) A board of trade designated as a contract market under the Commodity
Exchange Act or a person that, in the ordinary course of business, provides
clearance and settlement services for a board of trade to the extent of such
person's operation as or for such a board;
(10) A person registered as a futures commission merchant under the
federal commodities laws to the extent of such person's operation as a
merchant;
(11) A person registered as a securities broker-dealer under federal or
state securities laws to the extent of such person's operation as a broker-
dealer;
(12) An individual employed by a licensee, authorized delegate, or any
person exempted from the licensing requirements of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act when acting within the scope of employment, under the
supervision of the licensee, authorized delegate, or exempted person, as an
employee and not as an independent contractor;
(13) A person expressly appointed as a third-party service provider to or
agent of an entity exempt under subdivision (7) of this section, solely to the
extent that:
(a) Such service provider or agent is engaging in money transmission on
behalf of and pursuant to a written agreement with the exempt entity that sets
forth the specific functions that the service provider or agent is to perform;
and
(b) The exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and all legal
responsibility for satisfying the outstanding money transmission obligations
owed to purchasers and holders of the outstanding money transmission
obligations upon receipt of the purchaser's or holder's money or monetary value
by the service provider or agent;
(14) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed in this state
and acting within this state within the scope of a license:
(a) As a collection agency pursuant to the Collection Agency Act;
(b) As a credit services organization pursuant to the Credit Services
Organization Act; or
(c) To engage in the debt management business pursuant to sections 69-1201
to 69-1217;
(15) A charter issued under the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act; and
(16) A person exempt by regulation or order if the director finds such
exemption to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such person
is not necessary for the purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Applicant means a person filing an application for a license under the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 9. Section 8-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2704 The director may require that any person claiming to be exempt from
licensing under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to section 8-2703
provide information and documentation to the director demonstrating that such
person qualifies for exemption. Authorized delegate means an entity designated
by the licensee or an exempt entity under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
to engage in the business of money transmission on behalf of the licensee or
exempt entity.
Sec. 10. Section 8-2705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2705 (1) In order to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, the director may, subject to subsections (1) and (2) of
section 8-2706:
(a) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials
or federal and state regulatory agencies and regulatory associations in order
to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by standardizing methods
or procedures and sharing resources, records, or related information obtained
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(b) Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or
software to examine or investigate any person subject to the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act;
(c) Accept, from other state or federal governmental agencies or
officials, licensing, examination, or investigation reports made by such other
state or federal governmental agencies or officials; and
(d) Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public
accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant or licensee
and incorporate the audit report in any report of examination or investigation.
(2) The director shall have the broad administrative authority to
administer, interpret, and enforce the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, to
adopt and promulgate rules or regulations implementing the act, and to recover
the cost of administering and enforcing the act by imposing and collecting
-7-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
proportionate and equitable fees and costs associated with applications,
examinations, investigations, and other actions required to achieve the
purposes of the act.
Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of data
that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information
maintained by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, its
affiliates, or its subsidiaries.
Sec. 11. Section 8-2706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2706 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
all information or reports obtained by the director from an applicant,
licensee, or authorized delegate, related to an examination or investigation,
on behalf of, or for the use of the director, are not public record and are not
subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(2) The director may disclose information not otherwise subject to
disclosure under subsection (1) of this section to a representative of state or
federal agencies who promises in a record that the representative will maintain
the confidentiality of the information or if the director finds that the
disclosure is reasonably necessary for the protection and interest of the
public pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(3) This section does not prohibit the director from disclosing to the
public a list of all licensees or the aggregated financial or transactional
data concerning those licensees.
(4) Information contained in the records of the department that is public
record and may be made available to the public either on the department's
website, upon receipt by the department of a written request, or in the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry shall include:
(a) The name, business address, telephone number, and unique identifier of
any licensee;
(b) The business address of any registered agent of a licensee for
service;
(c) The name, business address, and telephone number of all authorized
delegates;
(d) The terms of, or a copy of, any bond filed by a licensee, provided
that confidential information, including, but not limited to, prices and fees
for such bond is redacted;
(e) Copies of any nonconfidential final orders of the department relating
to any violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or the rules and
regulations implementing the act; and
(f) Imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under the act.
Control means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management
or policies of a licensee, whether through ownership of securities, by
contract, or otherwise. Any person who (1) has the power to elect a majority of
executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons exercising
managerial authority of a licensee or any person in control of a licensee, (2)
directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten percent or more of a class of
stock or directly or indirectly has the power to sell or direct the sale of ten
percent or more of a class of stock, (3) in the case of a limited liability
company, is a managing member, or (4) in the case of a partnership, has the
right to receive, upon dissolution, or has contributed, ten percent or more of
the capital, is presumed to control that licensee.
Sec. 12. Section 8-2707, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2707 (1) The director may conduct an examination or investigation of a
licensee or authorized delegate or otherwise take independent action authorized
by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or by a rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated or an order issued under the act as reasonably necessary or
appropriate to administer and enforce the act, rules and regulations
implementing the act, or other applicable law, including the Bank Secrecy Act
and the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools
Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001. The director may:
(a) Conduct an examination as the director may reasonably require;
(b) Conduct an examination in conjunction with an examination conducted by
representatives of other state agencies or agencies of another state or of the
federal government;
(c) Accept the examination report of another state agency or an agency of
another state or of the federal government, or a report prepared by an
independent accounting firm, which on being accepted, is considered for all
purposes as an official report of the director; and
(d) Summon and examine under oath a key individual or employee of a
licensee or authorized delegate and require the person to produce records
regarding any matter related to the condition and business of the licensee or
authorized delegate.
(2) A licensee or authorized delegate shall provide, and the director
shall have full and complete access to, all records the director may reasonably
require to conduct a complete examination. The records shall be provided at a
location and in a format specified by the director. The director may utilize
multistate record production standards and examination procedures when such
standards will reasonably achieve the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Upon receipt by a licensee, an authorized delegate, or any other
person of a notice of investigation or inquiry request for information from the
department, the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person shall respond
within twenty-one calendar days after receipt. Failure to respond is a
-8-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. Each day a licensee,
authorized delegate, or other person fails to respond shall constitute a
separate violation of the act.
(4) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has violated
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to subsection (3) of this section,
the director may order such person to pay an administrative fine of not more
than five thousand dollars for each separate violation and the costs of
investigation.
(5) Unless otherwise directed by the director, a licensee shall pay all
costs reasonably incurred in connection with an examination of the licensee or
the licensee's authorized delegates.
Controlling person means any person in control of a licensee.
Sec. 13. Section 8-2708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2708 (1) The director is authorized to participate in multistate
supervisory processes established between states and coordinated through the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money Transmitter Regulators
Association and any affiliates and successors thereof for all licensees that
hold licenses in this state and other states. As a participant in multistate
supervision, the director may:
(a) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other state and
federal regulators in accordance with section 8-2706;
(b) Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or information-sharing
contracts or agreements with organizations, the membership of which is made up
of state or federal governmental agencies; and
(c) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with organizations, the
membership of which is made up of state or federal governmental agencies,
provided that the organizations agree in writing to maintain the
confidentiality and security of the shared information in accordance with
section 8-2706.
(2) Nothing in this section constitutes a waiver of the director's
authority to conduct an examination or investigation or otherwise take
independent action authorized by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule
or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act to
enforce compliance with applicable state or federal law.
(3) A joint examination or investigation, or acceptance of an examination
or investigation report, does not waive an examination assessment provided for
in the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Department means the Department of Banking and Finance.
Sec. 14. Section 8-2709, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2709 (1) A person may not engage in the business of money transmission
or advertise, solicit, or hold such person out as providing money transmission
unless the person is licensed under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person that is an authorized delegate of a licensee under the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act acting within the scope of authority conferred
by a written contract with the licensee; or
(b) A person that is exempt pursuant to section 8-2703 and does not engage
in money transmission outside the scope of such exemption.
(3) A license issued under section 8-2713 is not transferable or
assignable.
Director means the Director of Banking and Finance.
Sec. 15. Section 8-2710, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2710 (1) To establish consistent licensing between Nebraska and other
states, the director is authorized to:
(a) Implement all licensing provisions of the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act in a manner that is consistent with other states that have adopted a
version of the Model Money Transmission Modernization Act or multistate
licensing processes; and
(b) Participate in nationwide protocols for licensing cooperation and
coordination among state regulators provided that such protocols are consistent
with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act, the director is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities
designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to enable
the director to:
(a) Collect and maintain records;
(b) Coordinate multistate licensing processes and supervision processes;
(c) Process fees; and
(d) Facilitate communication between Nebraska and licensees or other
persons subject to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(3) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry for all aspects of licensing in accordance with
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, including, but not limited to, license
applications, applications for acquisitions of control, surety bonds,
reporting, criminal history background checks, credit checks, fee processing,
and examinations.
(4) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry forms, processes, and functionalities in
-9-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
accordance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. In the event the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry does not provide
functionality, forms, or processes for a provision of the act, the director is
authorized to implement the requirements in a manner that facilitates
uniformity with respect to licensing, supervision, reporting, and regulation of
licensees which are licensed in multiple jurisdictions.
(5) The director is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations, or issue an order, to establish requirements for participation by
applicants and licensees in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry upon the department's determination that each requirement is
consistent with law, public interest, and the purposes of this section.
Electronic instrument means a card or other tangible object for the
transmission or payment of money that contains a microprocessor chip, magnetic
strip, or other means for the storage of information, that is prefunded, and
the value of which is decremented upon each use. Electronic instrument does not
include a card or other tangible object that is redeemable by the issuer or its
affiliates in goods or services of the issuer or its affiliates.
Sec. 16. Section 8-2711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2711 (1) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a medium
as prescribed by the director. Each such form shall contain content as set
forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the director and may be
changed or updated by the director in accordance with applicable law in order
to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act and maintain
consistency with Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry licensing
standards and practices. The application shall state or contain, as applicable:
(a) The legal name and residential and business addresses of the applicant
and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in conducting the
applicant's business;
(b) A list of any criminal conviction of the applicant and any material
litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the ten-year period next
preceding the submission of the application;
(c) A description of any money transmission previously provided by the
applicant and the money transmission that the applicant seeks to provide in
this state;
(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the
locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates
propose to engage in money transmission;
(e) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to engage in
money transmission and any license revocation, suspension, or other
disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;
(f) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceeding
affecting the applicant or a person in control of an applicant;
(g) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if applicable;
(h) A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as applicable;
(i) The name and address of any federally insured depository financial
institution through which the applicant plans to conduct money transmission;
and
(j) Any other information the Director or the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry reasonably requires with respect to the
applicant.
(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall also provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state or
country of incorporation or formation;
(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or
country in which the applicant was incorporated or formed;
(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the applicant,
including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant, and whether any such
parents or subsidiaries are publicly traded;
(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and
residential addresses, and the employment, as applicable, of each key
individual and person in control of the applicant in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application;
(e) A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation for a
person in control of the applicant that is not an individual that has been
involved with the applicant in the ten-year period preceding the submission of
the application;
(f) A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for the most
recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding the submission of the
application or, if determined to be acceptable to the director, certified
unaudited financial statements for the most recent fiscal year or any other
period acceptable to the director;
(g) A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the applicant
for the most recent fiscal quarter;
(h) If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of the most
recent report filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934;
(i) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of audited
financial statements for the parent corporation for the most recent fiscal year
or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent report filed pursuant to the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or
-10-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy of
similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent corporation's
domicile outside the United States;
(j) The name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this
state; and
(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with respect to
the applicant.
(3) A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars
must accompany an application for a license under this section.
(4) Other than the nonrefundable application fee, the director may waive
one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to submit other
information in lieu of the required information.
Executive officer means the president, chairperson of the executive
committee, senior officer responsible for business decisions, chief financial
officer, and any other person who performs similar functions for a licensee.
Sec. 17. Section 8-2712, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2712 (1) Any individual in control of a licensee or applicant, any
individual that seeks to acquire control of a licensee, and any key individual
shall furnish to the director, through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry, the following items:
(a) The individual's fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the director for purposes of a national criminal history
background check unless the individual currently resides outside of the United
States and has resided outside of the United States for the last ten years; and
(b) The individual's personal history and experience in a form and in a
medium prescribed by the director, including the following:
(i) An independent credit report from a consumer reporting agency unless
the individual does not have a social security number, in which case, this
requirement shall be waived;
(ii) Information related to any criminal conviction or pending charges;
and
(iii) Information related to any regulatory or administrative action and
any civil litigation involving any claim of fraud, misrepresentation,
conversion, mismanagement of funds, breach of fiduciary duty, or breach of
contract.
(2) If the individual has resided outside of the United States at any time
in the last ten years, the individual shall also provide an investigative
background report prepared by an independent search firm that meets the
following requirements:
(a) The firm shall, at a minimum:
(i) Demonstrate that the firm has sufficient knowledge and resources and
employs accepted and reasonable methodologies to conduct the research of the
background report; and
(ii) Not be affiliated with, or have an interest with, the individual it
is researching; and
(b) The investigative background report shall be written in the English
language and shall contain the following, at a minimum:
(i) If available in the individual's current jurisdiction of residency, a
comprehensive credit report, or any equivalent information obtained or
generated by the independent search firm to accomplish such report, including a
search of the court data in the countries, provinces, states, cities, towns,
and areas where the individual resided and worked;
(ii) Criminal record information of the individual for the past ten years,
including, but not limited to, felonies, misdemeanors, or similar convictions
for violations of law in the countries, provinces, states, cities, towns, and
areas where the individual resided and worked;
(iii) Employment history of the individual;
(iv) Media history of the individual, including an electronic search of
national and local publications, wire services, and business applications; and
(v) Financial services-related regulatory history of the individual,
including, but not limited to, money transmission, securities, banking,
insurance, and mortgage-related industries.
(3) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing
information to the United States Department of Justice or any other
governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal
Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of this section.
Key shareholder means any person or group of persons acting in concert
owning ten percent or more of any voting class of an applicant's stock.
Sec. 18. Section 8-2713, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2713 (1) When the director determines an application for an original
license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act appears to include all the
items and addresses all of the matters that are required, the application is
complete. The director shall promptly notify the applicant in a record of the
date on which the application is determined to be complete. The director shall
approve, conditionally approve, or deny the application within one hundred
twenty days after the completion date. The director may for good cause extend
such one-hundred-twenty-day period.
(2) A determination by the director that an application is complete and is
accepted for processing means only that the application, on its face, appears
to include all of the items, including the criminal history background check
-11-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
response from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and address all of the
matters that are required, and is not an assessment of the substance of the
application or of the sufficiency of the information provided.
(3) When an application is filed and considered complete under this
section, the director shall investigate the applicant's financial condition,
financial responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and
general fitness. The director may conduct an investigation of the applicant,
the reasonable cost of which the applicant must pay. The director shall issue a
license to an applicant under this section if the director finds that all of
the following conditions have been fulfilled:
(a) The applicant has complied with sections 8-2711 and 8-2712; and
(b) The financial condition, financial responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the
applicant and the competence, experience, character, and general fitness of the
key individuals and persons in control of the applicant indicate that it is in
the interest of the public to permit the applicant to engage in money
transmission.
(4) The director shall issue a formal written notice of the denial of a
license application within thirty days after the decision to deny such
application. The director shall set forth in the notice of denial the specific
reasons for the denial of the application. An applicant whose application is
denied by the director under this section may appeal within thirty days after
receipt of the written notice of the denial. The appeal shall be in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) If an applicant for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act does not complete the license application and fails to respond to a notice
or notices from the department to correct a deficiency or deficiencies for a
period of one hundred twenty days or more after the date the department sends
the initial notice to correct the deficiency or deficiencies, the department
may deem the application as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of
the application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the
application.
(6) The initial license term shall begin on the day the application is
approved. The license shall expire on December 31 of the year in which the
license term began, unless the initial license date is on or after November 1
and on or before December 31, in which instance the initial license term shall
run through December 31 of the following year.
Licensee means a person licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
Sec. 19. Section 8-2714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2714 (1) A license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act shall be
renewed annually.
(2) An annual renewal fee of seven hundred fifty dollars shall be paid no
more than sixty days before the license expiration.
(3) The renewal term shall be for a period of one year and shall begin on
January 1 of each year after the initial license term and shall expire on
December 31 of the year the renewal term begins.
(4) A licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal fee, in a
form and in a medium prescribed by the director. The renewal report shall state
or contain a description of each material change in information submitted by
the licensee in its original license application which has not been reported to
the director.
(5) The director may, for good cause, grant an extension to when the
submission of the renewal fee and report is due for renewal for a licensee.
(6) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry to process license renewals provided that such
functionality is consistent with this section.
Material litigation means any litigation that, according to generally
accepted accounting principles, is deemed significant to an applicant's or
licensee's financial health and would be required to be referenced in an
applicant's or licensee's annual audited financial statements, report to
shareholders, or similar documents.
Sec. 20. Section 8-2715, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2715 (1) If a licensee does not continue to meet the qualifications or
satisfy the requirements that apply to an applicant for a new money
transmission license, the director may suspend or revoke the licensee's license
in accordance with the procedures established by the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act or other applicable state law for such suspension or
revocation.
(2) An applicant shall demonstrate that the applicant meets or will meet,
and a licensee shall at all times meet, the requirements of sections 8-2730,
8-2731, and 8-2732.
Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in
money.
Sec. 21. Section 8-2716, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2716 (1) Any person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control of a licensee shall obtain the written approval of the director
prior to acquiring control. An individual is not deemed to acquire control of a
licensee and is not subject to this section when that individual becomes a key
individual for a licensee in the ordinary course of business.
-12-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(2) A person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire
control of a licensee shall, in cooperation with the licensee:
(a) Submit an application in a form and in a medium prescribed by the
director; and
(b) Submit a nonrefundable fee of one thousand five hundred dollars with
the request for approval.
(3) Upon request, the director may permit a licensee or the person, or
group of persons acting in concert, to submit some or all information required
by the director pursuant to this section without using the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry.
(4) The application required by this section shall include the information
required by section 8-2712 for any new key individuals that have not previously
completed the requirements of section 8-2712 for a licensee.
(5) When the director determines an application for acquisition of control
under this section appears to include all the items and address all of the
matters that are required, the application shall be considered complete and the
director shall promptly notify the applicant in writing of the date on which
the application was determined to be complete.
(6) The director shall approve or deny the application within sixty days
after the completion date and, if the application is not approved or denied by
the director within sixty days after the completion date, the application is
deemed approved and the person, or group of persons acting in concert, are not
prohibited from acquiring control of the licensee. The director may for good
cause extend such sixty-day period.
(7) A determination by the director that an application is complete and is
accepted for processing means only that the application, on its face, appears
to include all of the items and address all of the matters that are required,
and is not an assessment of the substance of the application or of the
sufficiency of the information provided.
(8) When an application is filed and considered complete under this
section, the director shall investigate the financial condition, financial
responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general
fitness of the person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control. The director shall approve an acquisition of control pursuant
to this section if the director finds that all of the following conditions have
been fulfilled:
(a) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section have been
met, as applicable; and
(b) The financial condition, financial responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the person,
or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire control and the
competence, experience, character, and general fitness of the key individuals
and persons that would be in control of the licensee after the acquisition of
control indicate that it is in the interest of the public to permit the person,
or group of persons acting in concert, to control the licensee.
(9) The director shall issue a formal written notice of the denial of an
application to acquire control within thirty days after the decision to deny
the application. The director shall set forth in the notice of denial the
specific reasons for the denial of the application. An applicant whose
application is denied by the director under this section may appeal within
thirty days after receipt of the written notice of the denial. The appeal shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(10) The requirements of this section do not apply to any of the
following:
(a) A person that acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at a
designated meeting of the shareholders or holders of voting shares or voting
interests of a licensee or a person in control of a licensee;
(b) A person that acquires control of a licensee by devise or descent;
(c) A person that acquires control of a licensee as a personal
representative, custodian, guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as an officer
appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction or by operation of law;
(d) A person that is exempt under subdivision (7) of section 8-2703;
(e) A person that the director determines is not subject to this section
based on the public interest;
(f) A public offering of securities of a licensee or a person in control
of a licensee; or
(g) An internal reorganization of a person in control of the licensee
where the ultimate person in control of the licensee remains the same.
(11) Persons described in subdivisions (10)(a), (b), (c), (d), (f), and
(g) of this section, in cooperation with the licensee, shall notify the
director within fifteen days after the acquisition of control.
(12) Before filing an application for approval to acquire control of a
licensee, a person may request in writing a determination from the director as
to whether the person would be considered a person in control of a licensee
upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the director determines that
the person would not be a person in control of a licensee, the proposed person
and transaction is not subject to the requirements of this section.
Money transmission means the business of the sale or issuance of payment
instruments or stored value or of receiving money or monetary value for
transmission to a location within or outside the United States by any and all
means, including wire, facsimile, or electronic transfer. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, money transmission also includes bill payment services
not limited to the right to receive payment of any claim for another but does
-13-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
not include bill payment services in which an agent of a payee receives money
or monetary value on behalf of such payee.
Sec. 22. Section 8-2717, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2717 (1) A licensee adding or replacing any key individual shall:
(a) Provide notice in a manner prescribed by the director within fifteen
days after the date the key individual's appointment became effective; and
(b) Provide the information required by section 8-2712 within forty-five
days of the date after the key individual's appointment.
(2) Within ninety days after the date on which the notice provided
pursuant to this section was determined to be complete, the director may issue
a notice of disapproval of an added or replacement key individual if the
director determines that, given the competence, experience, character, or
integrity of the individual, permitting the individual to be a key individual
of such licensee would not be in the best interest of the public or the
customers of the licensee.
(3) A notice of disapproval shall contain a statement of the basis for
disapproval and shall be sent to the licensee and the disapproved individual. A
licensee may appeal a notice of disapproval within thirty days after receipt of
such notice of disapproval. The appeal shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) If the notice provided pursuant to this section is not disapproved
within ninety days after the date on which the notice was determined to be
complete, the key individual is deemed approved.
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means a licensing system
developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the
American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and
registration of mortgage loan originators, mortgage bankers, installment loan
companies, and other state-regulated financial services entities and
industries.
Sec. 23. Section 8-2718, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2718 (1) Each licensee shall submit a report of condition within forty-
five days after the end of a calendar quarter, or within any extended time as
the director may prescribe.
(2) The report of condition shall include:
(a) Financial information at the licensee level;
(b) Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction
information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the licensee is
licensed to engage in money transmission;
(c) A permissible investments report of the licensee;
(d) Transaction destination country reporting for money received for
transmission, if applicable; and
(e) Any other information the director reasonably requires with respect to
the licensee.
(3) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry for the submission of the report required by this
section and is authorized to update as necessary the requirements of this
section to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act and
maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
reporting.
(4) The information required by subdivision (2)(d) of this section shall
only be included in a report of condition submitted within forty-five days
after the end of the fourth calendar quarter.
Outstanding payment instrument means any payment instrument issued by a
licensee which has been sold in the United States directly by the licensee or
any payment instrument issued by a licensee which has been sold by an
authorized delegate of the licensee in the United States, which has been
reported to the licensee as having been sold, and which has not yet been paid
by or for the licensee.
Sec. 24. Section 8-2719, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2719 (1) Each licensee shall, within ninety days after the end of each
fiscal year or within any time period after the end of the fiscal year as the
director may prescribe, file with the director:
(a) An audited financial statement of the licensee for the fiscal year
prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting
principles; and
(b) Any other information as the director may reasonably require.
(2) Such audited financial statement shall be prepared by an independent
certified public accountant or independent public accountant who is
satisfactory to the director.
(3) Such audited financial statement shall include or be accompanied by a
certificate of opinion of the independent certified public accountant or
independent public accountant that is satisfactory in form and content to the
director. If the certificate or opinion is qualified, the director may order
the licensee to take any action as the director may find necessary to enable
the independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant to
remove the qualification.
Payment instrument means any electronic or written check, draft, money
order, travelers check, or other electronic or written instrument or order for
the transmission or payment of money, sold or issued to one or more persons,
whether or not such instrument is negotiable. Payment instrument does not
-14-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
include any credit card, any voucher, any letter of credit, or any instrument
that is redeemable by the issuer or its affiliates in goods or services of the
issuer or its affiliates.
Sec. 25. Section 8-2720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2720 (1) Each licensee shall submit a report of authorized delegates
within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter. The director is
authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for
the submission of the report required by this section provided that such
functionality is consistent with the requirements of this section.
(2) The authorized delegate report shall include, at a minimum, each
authorized delegate's:
(a) Company legal name;
(b) Taxpayer employer identification number;
(c) Principal provider identifier;
(d) Physical address;
(e) Mailing address;
(f) Business conducted in other states;
(g) Fictitious or trade names;
(h) Contact person name, telephone number, and email;
(i) Start date as the licensee's authorized delegate;
(j) End date acting as the licensee's authorized delegate, if applicable;
and
(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with respect to
the authorized delegate.
Permissible investments means:
(1) Cash;
(2) Certificates of deposit or other debt obligations of a financial
institution, either domestic or foreign;
(3) Bills of exchange or time drafts drawn on and accepted by a commercial
bank, otherwise known as bankers' acceptances, which are eligible for purchase
by member banks of the federal reserve system;
(4) Any investment bearing a rating of one of the three highest grades as
defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates such securities;
(5) Investment securities that are obligations of the United States or its
agencies or instrumentalities, obligations that are guaranteed fully as to
principal and interest by the United States, or any obligations of any state or
political subdivision thereof;
(6) Shares in a money market mutual fund, interest-bearing bills or notes
or bonds, debentures or stock traded on any national securities exchange or on
a national over-the-counter market, or mutual funds primarily composed of such
securities or a fund composed of one of more permissible investments as set
forth in this section;
(7) Any demand borrowing agreement or agreements made to a corporation or
a subsidiary of a corporation whose capital stock is listed on a national
exchange;
(8) Receivables that are due to a licensee from its authorized delegates
pursuant to a contract described in section 8-2739 which are not past due or
doubtful of collection; or
(9) Any other investment or similar security approved by the director.
Sec. 26. Section 8-2721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2721 (1) A licensee shall file a report with the director within one
business day after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of
the following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United
States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership,
the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its
dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the
benefit of its creditors; or
(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend the license of a
licensee in a state or country in which the licensee engages in business or is
licensed.
(2) A licensee shall file a report with the director within three business
days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of the
following events:
(a) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of a key individual or
person in control of the licensee for a felony; or
(b) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection,
a licensee shall notify the director in writing or through the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within three business days after the
time that the licensee becomes aware of any breach of security of the system of
computerized data owned or licensed by the licensee, which contains personal
information about a Nebraska resident, or the unauthorized access to or use of
such information about a Nebraska resident as a result of the breach. For
purposes of this subsection, the terms breach of the security of the system and
personal information have the same meaning as in section 87-802.
(b) If a licensee would be required under Nebraska law to provide
notification to a Nebraska resident regarding such breach, then the licensee
shall provide a copy of such notification to the department prior to or
simultaneously with the licensee's notification to the Nebraska resident.
-15-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(c) Notice required by this subsection may be delayed if a law enforcement
agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation. Notice
shall be made in good faith and without unreasonable delay as soon as possible
after the law enforcement agency determines that notification will no longer
impede the investigation.
Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company,
association, joint-stock association, trust, or corporation. Person does not
include the United States or the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 27. Section 8-2722, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2722 A licensee and an authorized delegate shall file all reports
required by the federal currency reporting, record-keeping, and suspicious
activity reporting requirements set forth in the Bank Secrecy Act and other
federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering. The timely filing of a
complete and accurate report required under this section with the appropriate
federal agency is deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this
section. Remit, except as used in section 8-2747, means either to make direct
payment of the funds to a licensee or its representatives authorized to receive
those funds or to deposit the funds in a bank, credit union, or savings and
loan association or other similar financial institution in an account specified
by a licensee.
Sec. 28. Section 8-2723, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2723 (1) A licensee shall maintain the following records, for
determining the licensee's compliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act,
for at least five years:
(a) A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation sold;
(b) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset,
liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;
(c) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(d) Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;
(e) Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation paid;
(f) A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the licensee's
authorized delegates; and
(g) Any other records the director reasonably requires by rule or
regulation.
(2) The items specified in subsection (1) of this section may be
maintained in any form of record.
(3) Records specified in subsection (1) of this section may be maintained
outside this state if they are made accessible to the director within seven
business days after notice.
(4) All records maintained by the licensee as required in subsection (1)
of this section are subject to inspection by the director pursuant to section
8-2707.
Stored value means monetary value that is evidenced by an electronic
record. Stored value does not include any item that is redeemable by the issuer
or its affiliates in goods or services of the issuer or its affiliates.
Sec. 29. Section 8-2724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, as
amended by section 18, Legislative Bill 251, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025, is amended to read:
8-2724 (1) Before a licensee is authorized to conduct business through an
authorized delegate or allows a person to act as the licensee's authorized
delegate, the licensee shall:
(a) Adopt, and update as necessary, written policies and procedures
reasonably designed to ensure that the licensee's authorized delegates comply
with applicable state and federal law;
(b) Enter into a written contract that complies with subsection (3) of
this section; and
(c) Conduct a reasonable risk-based background investigation sufficient
for the licensee to determine whether the authorized delegate has complied and
will likely comply with applicable state and federal law.
(2) An authorized delegate shall operate in full compliance with the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(3) The written contract required by subdivision (1)(b) of this section
shall be signed by the licensee and the authorized delegate and, at a minimum,
also shall:
(a) Appoint the person signing the contract as the licensee's authorized
delegate with the authority to conduct money transmission on behalf of the
licensee;
(b) Set forth the nature and scope of the relationship between the
licensee and the authorized delegate and the respective rights and
responsibilities of the parties;
(c) Require the authorized delegate to agree to fully comply with all
applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to money
transmission, including the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act and the rules and
regulations implementing the act, the Bank Secrecy Act, and the Uniting and
Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and
Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001;
(d) Require the authorized delegate to remit and handle money and monetary
value in accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the
authorized delegate;
(e) Impose a trust on money and monetary value net of fees received for
money transmission for the benefit of the licensee;
-16-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(f) Require the authorized delegate to prepare and maintain records as
required by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or the rules and regulations
implementing the act, or as reasonably requested by the director;
(g) Acknowledge that the authorized delegate consents to examination or
investigation by the director;
(h) State that the licensee is subject to regulation by the director and
that, as part of that regulation, the director may suspend or revoke an
authorized delegate designation or require the licensee to terminate an
authorized delegate designation; and
(i) Acknowledge receipt of the written policies and procedures required
under subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(4) If the licensee's license is suspended, revoked, canceled,
surrendered, or expired, the licensee shall, within five business days, provide
documentation to the director that the licensee has notified all applicable
authorized delegates of the licensee whose names are in a record filed with the
director of the suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration
of the license. Upon suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or
expiration of the license, applicable authorized delegates shall immediately
cease to provide money transmission as an authorized delegate of the licensee.
(5) An authorized delegate of a licensee holds in trust for the benefit of
the licensee all money net of fees received from money transmission. If any
authorized delegate commingles any funds received from money transmission with
any other funds or property owned or controlled by the authorized delegate, all
commingled funds and other property shall be considered held in trust in favor
of the licensee in an amount equal to the amount of money net of fees received
from money transmission by the authorized delegate on behalf of the licensee.
(6) An authorized delegate may not use a subdelegate to conduct money
transmission on behalf of a licensee.
(1) The requirement for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act does not apply to:
(a) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;
(b) Any post office of the United States Postal Service;
(c) A state or any political subdivision thereof;
(d)(i) Banks, credit unions, digital asset depository institutions as
defined in section 8-3003, building and loan associations, savings and loan
associations, savings banks, or mutual banks organized under the laws of any
state or the United States;
(ii) Subsidiaries of the institutions listed in subdivision (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(iii) Bank holding companies which have a banking subsidiary located in
Nebraska and whose debt securities have an investment grade rating by a
national rating agency; or
(iv) Authorized delegates of the institutions and entities listed in
subdivision (d)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, except that authorized
delegates that are not banks, credit unions, building and loan associations,
savings and loan associations, savings banks, mutual banks, subsidiaries of any
of the foregoing, or bank holding companies shall comply with all requirements
imposed upon authorized delegates under the act;
(e) The provision of electronic transfer of government benefits for any
federal, state, or county governmental agency, as defined in Consumer Financial
Protection Bureau Regulation E, 12 C.F.R. part 1005, as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2025, by a contractor for and on behalf of the United States or
any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof or any state or any
political subdivision thereof;
(f) An operator of a payment system only to the extent that the payment
system provides processing, clearing, or settlement services between or among
persons who are all exempt under this section in connection with wire
transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, automated
clearinghouse transfers, or similar fund transfers; or
(g) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed in this state and
acting within this state within the scope of a license:
(i) As a collection agency pursuant to the Collection Agency Act;
(ii) As a credit services organization pursuant to the Credit Services
Organization Act; or
(iii) To engage in the debt management business pursuant to sections
69-1201 to 69-1217.
(2) An authorized delegate of a licensee or of an exempt entity, acting
within the scope of its authority conferred by a written contract as described
in section 8-2739, is not required to obtain a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, except that such an authorized delegate shall comply with the
other provisions of the act which apply to money transmission transactions.
Sec. 30. Section 8-2725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2725 A person shall not engage in the business of money transmission on
behalf of a person not licensed under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or
not exempt from the act pursuant to section 8-2703. A person that engages in
such business and provides money transmission to the same extent as if the
unlicensed or nonexempt person were a licensee shall be jointly and severally
liable with the unlicensed or nonexempt person. (1) Except as otherwise
provided in section 8-2724, a person shall not engage in money transmission
without a license issued pursuant to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) A person is engaged in money transmission if the person provides money
-17-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
transmission services to any resident of this state even if the person
providing money transmission services has no physical presence in this state or
if the resident is not physically located in this state at the time when the
resident enters into money transmission or otherwise receives money
transmission services.
(3) If a licensee has a physical presence in this state, the licensee may
conduct its business at one or more locations, directly or indirectly owned, or
through one or more authorized delegates, or both, pursuant to the single
license granted to the licensee.
(4) A license issued pursuant to the act is not transferable or
assignable.
Sec. 31. Section 8-2726, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2726 (1) Every licensee shall forward all money received for
transmission in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the licensee
and the sender unless the licensee has a reasonable belief or a reasonable
basis to believe that the sender may be a victim of fraud or that a crime or
violation of any law, rule, or regulation has occurred, is occurring, or may
occur.
(2) If a licensee does not forward money received for transmission in
accordance with this section, the licensee shall respond to inquiries by the
sender with the reason for not forwarding the money unless providing a response
would violate a state or federal law, rule, or regulation.
To qualify for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, an
applicant, at the time of filing for a license, and a licensee at all times
after a license is issued, shall satisfy the following requirements:
(1) Each applicant or licensee must have a net worth of not less than
fifty thousand dollars, calculated in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles;
(2) The financial condition and responsibility, financial and business
experience, and character and general fitness of the applicant or licensee must
reasonably warrant the belief that the applicant's or licensee's business will
be conducted honestly, fairly, and in a manner commanding the confidence and
trust of the community. In determining whether this requirement is met and for
purposes of investigating compliance with the act, the director may review and
consider the relevant business records and capital adequacy of the applicant or
licensee;
(3) Each corporate applicant or licensee must be organized under the laws
of any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any territory of
the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of
the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the Northern Mariana Islands, and
must be in good standing in the place of its incorporation;
(4) Each applicant or licensee must be registered or qualified to do
business in the State of Nebraska; and
(5) Each applicant or licensee must maintain an office in the United
States.
Sec. 32. Section 8-2727, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2727 (1) This section does not apply to:
(a) Money received for transmission subject to the federal remittance
rule; or
(b) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services
provided by the payee.
(2) Every licensee shall refund to the sender within ten days after
receipt of the sender's written request for a refund of any and all money
received for transmission unless any of the following occurs:
(a) The money has been forwarded within ten days after the date on which
the money was received for transmission;
(b) Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount of money
to the person designated by the sender within ten days after the date on which
the money was received for transmission;
(c) The agreement between the licensee and the sender instructs the
licensee to forward the money at a time that is beyond ten days after the date
on which the money was received for transmission. If funds have not yet been
forwarded in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the licensee
and the sender, the licensee shall issue a refund in accordance with the other
provisions of this section;
(d) The refund is requested for a transaction that the licensee has not
completed based on a reasonable belief or a reasonable basis to believe that a
crime or violation of law, rule, or regulation has occurred, is occurring, or
may occur; or
(e) The refund request does not enable the licensee to:
(i) Identify the sender's name and address or telephone number; or
(ii) Identify the particular transaction to be refunded in the event the
sender has multiple transactions outstanding.
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an applicant
shall submit, with the application, a surety bond issued by a bonding company
or insurance company authorized to do business in this state and acceptable to
the director in the principal sum of one hundred thousand dollars. The director
may increase the amount of the bond to a maximum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars for good cause.
(b) The bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the director and shall run
-18-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
to the state for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee to secure
the faithful performance of the obligations of the licensee with respect to the
receipt, handling, transmission, and payment of money in connection with money
transmission. In the case of a bond, the aggregate liability of the surety
shall not exceed the principal sum of the bond. Any claimant against the
licensee may bring suit directly on the bond or the director may bring suit on
behalf of any claimant, either in one action or in successive actions.
(2) Upon filing of the report required by section 8-2734 and the
information required by subdivision (2)(b) of such section, a licensee shall
maintain or increase its surety bond to reflect the total dollar amount of
money transmitter transactions by the licensee in this state in the most recent
four calendar quarters for which data is available before the date of the
filing of the renewal application in accordance with the following table. A
licensee may decrease its surety bond in accordance with the following table if
the surety bond required is less than the amount of the surety bond on file
with the department:
Dollar Amount of Money Transmitter Transactions Surety Bond Required
$0.00 to $2,000,000.00 $100,000.00
$2,000,000.01 to $4,000,000.00 $150,000.00
$4,000,000.01 to $6,000,000.00 $200,000.00
Over $6,000,000.00 $250,000.00
(3) If the department determines that a licensee does not maintain a
surety bond in the amount required by subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall give written notification to the licensee requiring it to
increase the surety bond within thirty days to the amount required by such
subsection.
(4) The director may at any time require the filing of a new or
supplemental bond in the form as provided in subsection (1) of this section if
he or she determines that the bond filed under this section is exhausted or is
inadequate for any reason, including, but not limited to, the financial
condition of a licensee or an applicant for a license or violations of the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, any rule and regulation or order thereunder,
or any state or federal law applicable to a licensee or an applicant for a
license. The new or supplemental bond shall not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars.
(5)(a) In lieu of the corporate surety bond or bonds required by this
section or of any portion of the principal thereof, the applicant or licensee
may deposit, with the director or with such banks or trust companies located in
this state or with any federal reserve bank as the applicant or licensee may
designate and the director may approve, interest-bearing stocks and bonds,
notes, debentures or other obligations of the United States or any agency or
instrumentality thereof, or guaranteed by the United States, or of this state,
or of a city, county, village, school district, or instrumentality of this
state, or guaranteed by this state, to an aggregate amount, based upon
principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, of not less than the
amount of the required corporate surety bond or portion thereof. The securities
shall be deposited and held to secure the same obligations as would the surety
bond.
(b) The licensee shall have the right, with the approval of the director,
to substitute other securities for those deposited and shall be required to do
so on written order of the director made for good cause shown. The licensee
shall pay the fees prescribed in section 8-602 for pledging and substitution of
securities. So long as the licensee so depositing shall continue solvent and is
not in violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, such licensee shall be
permitted to receive the interest or dividends on such deposit.
(c) The safekeeping of such securities and all other expenses incidental
to the pledging of such securities shall be paid by the licensee. All such
securities shall be subject to sale and transfer and to the disposal of the
proceeds by the director only on the order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(6) The surety bond shall remain in effect until cancellation, which may
occur only after thirty days' written notice to the director. Cancellation
shall not affect any liability incurred or accrued during the period the surety
bond was in effect.
(7) The surety bond shall remain in place for at least five years after
the licensee ceases money transmission in this state, except that the director
may permit the surety bond to be reduced or eliminated before that time to the
extent that the amount of the licensee's payment instruments outstanding in
this state are reduced. The director may also permit a licensee to substitute a
letter of credit or such other form of security acceptable to the director for
the surety bond in place at the time the licensee ceases money transmission in
the state.
Sec. 33. Section 8-2728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2728 (1) This section does not apply to:
(a) Money received for transmission subject to the federal remittance
rule; or
-19-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(b) Money received for transmission that is not primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes;
(c) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services
provided by the payee; or
(d) Payroll processing services.
(2)(a) Every licensee or authorized delegate shall provide the sender a
receipt for money received for transmission.
(b) The receipt shall contain the following information, as applicable:
(i) The name of the sender;
(ii) The name of the designated recipient;
(iii) The date of the transaction;
(iv) The unique transaction or identification number;
(v) The name of the licensee, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry unique identification, the licensee's business address, and the
licensee's customer service telephone number;
(vi) If not available on the licensee's website or mobile application, the
name and telephone number of the department and a statement that the licensee's
customers can contact the department with questions or complaints about the
licensee's money transmission services;
(vii) The amount of the transaction in United States dollars;
(viii) Any fee charged by the licensee to the sender for the transaction;
and
(ix) Any tax collected by the licensee from the sender for the
transaction.
(c) For a transaction conducted in person, the receipt may be provided
electronically if the sender requests or agrees to receive an electronic
receipt. For a transaction conducted electronically or by telephone, a receipt
may be provided electronically. All electronic receipts shall be provided in a
retainable form.
(d) The receipt required by this subsection shall be in English and in the
language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate to advertise,
solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a transaction conducted
in person, electronically, or by telephone, if other than English.
(1) Each licensee shall at all times possess permissible investments
having an aggregate market value, calculated in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, of not less than the aggregate face amount of
all outstanding payment instruments and stored value issued or sold by the
licensee in the United States. This requirement may be waived by the director
if the dollar volume of a licensee's outstanding payment instruments and stored
value does not exceed the bond or other security posted by the licensee
pursuant to section 8-2727.
(2) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the
licensee, are deemed by operation of law to be held in trust for the benefit of
the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding payment instruments in
the event of the bankruptcy of the licensee.
Sec. 34. Section 8-2729, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-2729 (1) A licensee that provides payroll processing services shall:
(a) Issue reports to clients detailing client payroll obligations in
advance of the payroll funds being deducted from an account; and
(b) Make available employee paystubs or an equivalent statement to
employees.
(2) This section does not apply to a licensee providing payroll processing
services where the licensee's client designates the intended recipients to the
licensee and is responsible for providing the disclosures required by
subdivision (1)(b) of this section.
Each application for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
shall be made in writing and in a form prescribed by the director. Each
application shall state or contain:
(1) For all applicants:
(a) The exact name of the applicant, the applicant's principal address,
any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in the conduct of its
business, and the location of the applicant's business records;
(b) The history of the applicant's criminal convictions and material
litigation for the five-year period before the date of the application;
(c) A description of the activities conducted by the applicant and a
history of operations;
(d) A description of the business activities in which the applicant seeks
to be engaged in this state;
(e) A list identifying the applicant's proposed authorized delegates in
this state, if any, at the time of the filing of the application;
(f) A sample authorized delegate contract, if applicable;
(g) A sample form of payment instrument, if applicable;
(h) The locations at which the applicant and its authorized delegates, if
any, propose to conduct money transmission in this state; and
(i) The name, address, and account information of each clearing bank or
banks, which shall be covered by federal deposit insurance, on which the
applicant's payment instruments and funds received for transmission or
otherwise will be drawn or through which the payment instruments or other funds
will be payable;
(2) If the applicant is a corporation, the applicant shall also provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation and state of incorporation;
-20-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(b) A certificate of good standing from the state in which the applicant
was incorporated;
(c) A certificate of authority from the Secretary of State to conduct
business in this state;
(d) A description of the corporate structure of the applicant, including
the identity of any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and a disclosure of
whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded on any stock exchange;
(e) The name, business and residence addresses, and employment history for
the five-year period immediately before the date of the application of the
applicant's executive officers and the officers or managers who will be in
charge of the applicant's activities to be licensed under the act;
(f) The name, business and residence addresses, and employment history for
the five-year period immediately before the date of the application and the
most recent personal financial statement of any key shareholder of the
applicant;
(g) The history of material litigation for the five-year period
immediately before the date of the application of every executive officer or
key shareholder of the applicant;
(h) Background checks as provided in section 8-2730;
(i) A copy of the applicant's most recent audited financial statement
including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in
shareholder equity, and statement of changes in financial position and, if
available, the applicant's audited financial statements for the immediately
preceding two-year period. However, if the applicant is a wholly owned
subsidiary of another corporation, the applicant may submit either the parent
corporation's consolidated audited financial statements for the current year
and for the immediately preceding two-year period or the parent corporation's
Form 10-K reports filed with the United States Securities and Exchange
Commission for the prior three years in lieu of the applicant's financial
statements. If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of a corporation
having its principal place of business outside the United States, similar
documentation filed with the parent corporation's non-United States regulator
may be submitted to satisfy this subdivision; and
(j) Copies of all filings, if any, made by the applicant with the United
States Securities and Exchange Commission or with a similar regulator in a
country other than the United States, within the year preceding the date of
filing of the application; and
(3) If the applicant is not a corporation, the applicant shall also
provide:
(a) The name, business and residence addresses, personal financial
statement, and employment history, for the five-year period immediately before
the date of the application, of each principal of the applicant and the name,
business and residence addresses, and employment history for the five-year
period immediately before the date of the application of any other person or
persons who will be in charge of the applicant's money transmission activities;
(b) A copy of the applicant's registration or qualification to do business
in this state;
(c) The history of material litigation for the five-year period
immediately before the date of the application for each individual having any
ownership interest in the applicant and each individual who exercises
supervisory responsibility with respect to the applicant's activities;
(d) Background checks as provided in section 8-2730; and
(e) Copies of the applicant's audited financial statements including
balance sheet, statement of income or loss, and statement of changes in
financial position for the current year and, if available, for the immediately
preceding two-year period.
Sec. 35. Section 8-2730, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-2730 (1) A licensee shall maintain at all times a net worth of the
greater of one hundred thousand dollars or three percent of the licensee's
total assets for the first one hundred million dollars, two percent of
additional assets for over one hundred million dollars to one billion dollars,
and one-half percent of additional assets for over one billion dollars.
(2) Net worth shall be demonstrated at initial application by the
applicant's most recent audited or, if allowed by the director, unaudited
financial statements provided pursuant to subdivision (2)(f) of section 8-2711.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the director
shall have the authority, for good cause shown, to exempt any applicant or
licensee, in part or in whole, from the requirements of subsections (1) and (2)
of this section.
(1) Effective July 1, 2014, the department shall require licensees under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to be licensed and registered through the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order to carry out this
requirement, the department is authorized to participate in the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this purpose, the department may
establish, by adopting and promulgating rules and regulations or by order,
requirements as necessary. The requirements may include, but are not limited
to:
(a) Background checks of applicants and licensees, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Fingerprints of every executive officer, director, partner, member,
sole proprietor, or shareholder submitted to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and any other governmental agency or entity authorized to receive
-21-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
such information for a state, national, and international criminal history
record information check, except that the department shall not require the
submission of fingerprints by (A) an executive officer or director of an
applicant or licensee which is either a publicly traded company or a wholly
owned subsidiary of a publicly traded company or (B) an applicant or licensee
who has previously submitted the fingerprints of an executive officer,
director, partner, member, sole proprietor, or shareholder directly to the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation will accept such fingerprints for a criminal background check;
(ii) Checks of civil or administrative records;
(iii) Checks of an applicant's or a licensee's credit history; or
(iv) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry;
(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew a license through the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(c) The setting or resetting, as necessary, of renewal processing or
reporting dates;
(d) Information and reports pertaining to authorized delegates; and
(e) Amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the
director deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the act, the department is
authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and
process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons
subject to the act. The department may allow such system to collect licensing
fees on behalf of the department and allow such system to collect a processing
fee for the services of the system directly from each licensee or applicant for
a license.
(3) The director is required to regularly report enforcement actions and
other relevant information to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry subject to the provisions contained in section 8-2731.
(4) The director shall establish a process whereby applicants and
licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry by the director.
(5) The department shall ensure that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry adopts a privacy, data security, and breach of security of
the system notification policy. The director shall make available upon written
request a copy of the contract between the department and the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry pertaining to the breach of security of
the system provisions.
(6) The department shall upon written request provide the most recently
available audited financial report of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry.
(7) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing
information to the United States Department of Justice or any other
governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal
Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section.
Sec. 36. Section 8-2731, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2731 (1) An applicant for a money transmission license shall provide,
and a licensee at all times shall maintain, security consisting of a surety
bond in a form satisfactory to the director.
(2) The amount of the surety bond required by subsection (1) of this
section shall be the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or an amount equal
to one hundred percent of the licensee's average daily money transmission
liability in this state calculated for the most recently completed three-month
period, up to a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars. A licensee that
maintains a bond in the maximum amount provided for in this subsection shall
not be required to calculate its average daily money transmission liability in
this state for purposes of this subsection.
(3) The surety bond required by subsection (1) of this section shall
remain in effect until cancellation, which may occur only after thirty days'
written notice to the director. Cancellation shall not affect any liability
incurred or accrued during the period the surety bond was in effect.
(4) Any claimant against the licensee may file a claim or bring suit
directly on the surety bond required by subsection (1) of this section. The
director may also file a claim or bring suit on behalf of any claimant, either
in one action or in successive actions.
(1) In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce the
regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the requirements under
any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any
information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including
the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or
material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the
information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all
federal and state regulatory officials with money transmitter industry
-22-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of
confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law;
(b) Information or material that is subject to privilege or
confidentiality under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall not be subject
to:
(i) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to
the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal
government or the respective state; or
(ii) Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil
action or administrative process unless, with respect to any privilege held by
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to such
information or material, the person to whom such information or material
pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that
privilege;
(c) Any state statute relating to the disclosure of confidential
supervisory information or any information or material described in subdivision
(a) of this subsection that is inconsistent with such subdivision shall be
superseded by the requirements of this section; and
(d) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or
material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated
disciplinary and enforcement actions against, applicants and licensees that is
included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by
the public.
(2) For these purposes, the director is authorized to enter into
agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential
Mortgage Regulators, the Money Transmitter Regulators Association, or other
associations representing governmental agencies as established by adopting and
promulgating rules and regulations or an order of the director.
Sec. 37. Section 8-2732, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2732 (1) A licensee shall maintain at all times permissible investments
that have a market value computed in accordance with United States generally
accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of
its outstanding money transmission obligations.
(2) Except for permissible investments described in subsection (1) of
section 8-2733, the director, with respect to any licensee, may, by order,
limit the extent to which a specific investment maintained by a licensee within
a class of permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment,
if the specific investment represents undue risk to customers, not reflected in
the market value of the investment.
(3) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the
licensee, are held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of
the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in the event of
insolvency, the filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the
United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization, the filing of a
petition by or against the licensee for receivership, the commencement of any
other judicial or administrative proceeding for dissolution or reorganization,
or in the event of an action by a creditor against the licensee who is not a
beneficiary of this statutory trust.
(4) No permissible investments held in trust pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section shall be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or
sequestration by order of any court, except for a beneficiary of this statutory
trust.
(5) Funds drawn on a letter of credit, and any other permissible
investments held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the
licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations, are deemed held in trust
for the benefit of such purchasers and holders on a pro rata and equitable
basis for permissible investments required to be held in this state, and other
states, as applicable. Any statutory trust established under this subsection
shall be terminated upon extinguishment of all of the licensee's outstanding
money transmission obligations.
(6) The director, by rule or order, may allow any other type of
investment, that the director determines is of sufficient liquidity and
quality, to be a permissible investment. The director is authorized to
participate in efforts with other state regulators to determine whether other
types of investments are of sufficient liquidity and quality to be a
permissible investment.
Each applicant shall submit, with the application, an application fee of
one thousand dollars, and any processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of
section 8-2730 which shall not be subject to refund but which, if the license
is granted, shall constitute the license fee for the first license year or part
thereof.
Sec. 38. Section 8-2733, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2733 (1) The following investments are permissible investments for the
purposes of section 8-2732:
(a) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such
accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers in a federally
insured depository financial institution;
(b) Cash equivalents, including automated clearinghouse items in transit
to the licensee, automated clearinghouse items or international wires in
transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, cash in smart safes, cash
-23-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
in licensee-owned locations, debit card-funded or credit card-funded
transmission receivables owed by any financial institution, or money market
mutual funds rated AAA by Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent
from any other eligible rating service;
(c) Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an insured
depository institution as defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or an
insured credit union as defined in the Federal Credit Union Act;
(d) An obligation of the United States or a commission, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(e) An obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by
the United States;
(f) An obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality thereof; and
(g)(i) The full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of
credit, for which the stated beneficiary is the director, that stipulates that
the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under the letter of credit and
present it to obtain funds up to the letter of credit amount within seven days
after presentation of the items required by this subdivision.
(ii) The letter of credit shall:
(A) Be issued by a federally insured depository financial institution, a
foreign bank that is authorized under federal law to maintain a federal agency
or federal branch office in a state or states, or a foreign bank that is
authorized under state law to maintain a branch in a state and such bank bears
an eligible rating or whose parent company bears an eligible rating and is
regulated, supervised, and examined by United States federal or state
authorities having regulatory authority over banks, credit unions, and trust
companies;
(B) Be irrevocable and unconditional and indicate that such letter of
credit is not subject to any condition or qualifications outside of the letter
of credit;
(C) Not contain reference to any other agreements, documents, or entities,
or otherwise provide for any security interest in the licensee; and
(D) Contain an issue date and expiration date and expressly provide for
automatic extension, without a written amendment, for an additional period of
one year from the present or each future expiration date, unless the issuer of
the letter of credit notifies the director in writing, by certified or
registered mail or courier mail or other receipted means, at least sixty days
prior to any expiration date that the irrevocable letter of credit will not be
extended.
(iii) In the event of any notice of expiration or nonextension of a letter
of credit, the licensee shall be required to demonstrate to the satisfaction of
the director, fifteen days prior to expiration, that the licensee maintains and
will maintain permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of
section 8-2732 upon the expiration of the letter of credit. If the licensee is
not able to do so, the director may draw on the letter of credit in an amount
up to the amount necessary to meet the licensee's requirements to maintain
permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732.
Any such draw shall be offset against the licensee's outstanding money
transmission obligations. The drawn funds shall be held in trust by the
director or the director's designated agent, to the extent authorized by law,
as agent for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's
outstanding money transmission obligations.
(iv) The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of the letter of
credit will honor, at sight, a presentation made by the beneficiary to the
issuer of the following documents on or prior to the expiration date of the
letter of credit:
(A) The original letter of credit, including any amendments; and
(B) A written statement from the beneficiary stating that any of the
following events have occurred:
(I) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the United
States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(II) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership
or the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for
dissolution or reorganization;
(III) The seizure of assets of a licensee by a director pursuant to an
emergency order issued in accordance with applicable law, on the basis of an
action, violation, or condition that has caused or is likely to cause the
insolvency of the licensee; or
(IV) The beneficiary has received notice of expiration or nonextension of
a letter of credit and the licensee failed to demonstrate to the satisfaction
of the beneficiary that the licensee will maintain permissible investments in
accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732 upon the expiration or
nonextension of the letter of credit.
(v) The director may designate an agent to serve on the director's behalf
as beneficiary to a letter of credit so long as the agent and letter of credit
meet requirements established by the director. The director's agent may serve
as agent for multiple licensing authorities for a single irrevocable letter of
credit if the proceeds of the drawable amount for the purposes of this section
are assigned to the director.
(vi) The director is authorized to participate in multistate processes
designed to facilitate the issuance and administration of letters of credit,
including, but not limited to, services provided by the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry and State Regulatory Registry LLC.
-24-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(2) Unless permitted by the director, by rule or order, to exceed the
limit as set forth in this section, the following investments are permissible
investments for the purposes of section 8-2732 to the extent specified:
(a) Receivables that are payable to a licensee from authorized delegates
in the ordinary course of business, received by the authorized delegates less
than seven days old, and combined not exceeding fifty percent of the aggregate
value of the licensee's total permissible investments, and receivables that are
payable to a licensee from a single authorized delegate in the ordinary course
of business, received by the authorized delegate less than seven days before,
and combined not exceeding ten percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's
total permissible investments;
(b) The following investment categories are permissible up to twenty
percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments
for each investment category and up to fifty percent of the aggregate value of
the licensee's total permissible investments for all of the investment
categories combined:
(i) A short-term, up to six months, investment bearing an eligible rating;
(ii) Commercial paper bearing an eligible rating;
(iii) A bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible rating;
(iv) A United States tri-party repurchase agreement collateralized at one
hundred percent or more with United States Government or agency securities,
municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an eligible rating;
(v) A money market mutual fund rated less than AAA and equal to or higher
than A- by Standard and Poor's Corporation, or the equivalent from any other
eligible rating service; and
(vi) A mutual fund or other investment fund composed solely and
exclusively of one or more permissible investments described in subdivisions
(1)(a) through (c) of this section; and
(c) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in such
accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers, at foreign
depository institutions are permissible up to ten percent of the aggregate
value of the licensee's total permissible investments if the licensee has
received a satisfactory rating in the licensee's most recent examination and
the foreign depository institution:
(i) Has an eligible rating;
(ii) Is registered under the Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act;
(iii) Is not located in any country subject to sanctions from the Office
of Foreign Assets Control; and
(iv) Is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative jurisdiction as
designated by the Financial Action Task Force.
(1) Upon the filing of a complete application under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, the director shall investigate the financial condition and
responsibility, financial and business experience, character, and general
fitness of the applicant. The director may conduct an onsite investigation of
the applicant, the reasonable cost of which shall be borne by the applicant. If
the director finds that the applicant's business will be conducted honestly,
fairly, and in a manner commanding the confidence and trust of the community
and that the applicant has fulfilled the requirements imposed by the act and
has paid the required application or license fee, the director shall issue a
license to the applicant authorizing the applicant to engage in money
transmission in this state. If these requirements have not been met, the
director shall deny the application in writing, setting forth the reasons for
the denial.
(2) The director shall approve or deny every application for an original
license within one hundred twenty days after the date a complete application is
submitted, which period may be extended by the written consent of the
applicant. The director shall notify the applicant of the date when the
application is deemed complete.
(3) Any applicant aggrieved by a denial issued by the director under the
act may, at any time within fifteen business days after the date of the denial,
request a hearing before the director. The hearing shall be held in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act and rules and regulations of the
department.
(4) If an applicant for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act does not complete the license application and fails to respond to a notice
or notices from the department to correct the deficiency or deficiencies for a
period of one hundred twenty days or more after the date the department sends
the initial notice to correct the deficiency or deficiencies, the department
may deem the application as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of
the application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the
application.
Sec. 39. Section 8-2734, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2734 (1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, suspend or revoke a license or order a licensee
to revoke the designation of an authorized delegate if:
(a) The licensee violates the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule or
regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act;
(b) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation
by the director;
(c) The licensee willfully failed to make any report required by the act;
(d) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross
negligence;
-25-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(e) An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or
federal anti-money laundering statute, or violates a rule or regulation adopted
and promulgated or an order issued under the act, as a result of the licensee's
willful misconduct or willful blindness;
(f) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee, key individual,
or responsible person of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in
the public interest to permit the person to provide money transmission;
(g) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice;
(h) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of the licensee's
obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; or
(i) The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after the director
issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a finding that the
authorized delegate has violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound
practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the licensee's
money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, and the previous conduct of the person
involved.
(3) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of the surrender.
(4) If a licensee fails to maintain a surety bond as required by section
8-2731, the department may issue a notice of cancellation of the license in
lieu of revocation proceedings.
(5) Suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration of a
license shall not impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting lawful
contract between the licensee and any person.
(6) Suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration of a
license shall not affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before
the suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration or liability
for any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of its key
individuals, executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other
persons exercising managerial authority of a licensee for acts committed before
the suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration.
(1) Initial licenses shall remain in full force and effect until the next
succeeding December 31. Each licensee shall, annually on or before December 31
of each year, file a license renewal application and pay to the director a
license fee of two hundred fifty dollars and any processing fee allowed under
subsection (2) of section 8-2730, both of which shall not be subject to refund.
(2) The renewal application and license fee shall be accompanied by a
report, in a form prescribed by the director, which shall include:
(a) A copy of the licensee's most recent audited consolidated annual
financial statement including balance sheet, statement of income or loss,
statement of changes in shareholders' equity, and statement of changes in
financial position, or, if a licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another
corporation, the consolidated audited annual financial statement of the parent
corporation may be filed in lieu of the licensee's audited annual financial
statement;
(b) The number of payment instruments sold by the licensee in the state,
the dollar amount of those instruments, and the dollar amount of payment
instruments currently outstanding, for the most recent quarter for which data
is available before the date of the filing of the renewal application, but in
no event more than one hundred twenty days before the renewal date;
(c) Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the
licensee on its original application which have not previously been reported to
the director on any other report required to be filed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act; and
(d) A list of the licensee's permissible investments.
Sec. 40. Section 8-2735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-2735 (1) The director may issue an order suspending or revoking the
designation of an authorized delegate if the director finds that:
(a) The authorized delegate violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the
act;
(b) The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the director;
(c) The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
(d) The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or
federal anti-money-laundering statute;
(e) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized delegate indicates
that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized delegate to
provide money transmission; or
(f) The authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice.
(2) In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe
or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the
authorized delegate's provision of money transmission, the magnitude of the
loss, the gravity of the violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a
rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or order issued under the act, and
the previous conduct of the authorized delegate.
(3) An authorized delegate may apply for relief from a suspension or
-26-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
revocation of designation as an authorized delegate according to procedures
prescribed by the director.
(1) A licensee shall file notice with the director within thirty calendar
days after any material change in information provided in a licensee's
application as prescribed by the director.
(2) A licensee shall file a report with the director within five business
days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of any of the
following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under any
bankruptcy law of the United States for liquidation or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership,
the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its
dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the
benefit of its creditors;
(c) The filing of an action to revoke or suspend the licensee's license in
a state or country in which the licensee engages in business or is licensed;
(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee's bond or other
security;
(e) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of an executive officer,
manager, or director of, or controlling person of, the licensee, for a felony;
or
(f) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection,
a licensee shall notify the director in writing or through the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within three business days from the time
that the licensee becomes aware of any breach of security of the system of
computerized data owned or licensed by the licensee, which contains personal
information about a Nebraska resident, or the unauthorized access to or use of
such information about a Nebraska resident as a result of the breach.
(b) If a licensee would be required under Nebraska law to provide
notification to a Nebraska resident regarding such incident, then the licensee
shall provide a copy of such notification to the department prior to or
simultaneously with the licensee's notification to the Nebraska resident.
(c) Notice required by this subsection may be delayed if a law enforcement
agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation. Notice
shall be made in good faith, without unreasonable delay, and as soon as
possible after the law enforcement agency determines that notification will no
longer impede the investigation.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the terms breach of the security of
the system and personal information have the same meaning as in section 87-802.
Sec. 41. Section 8-2736, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2736 (1) If the director determines that a violation of the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act or of a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an
order issued under the act by a licensee or authorized delegate is likely to
cause immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, the licensee's customers,
or the public as a result of the violation, or cause insolvency or significant
dissipation of assets of the licensee, the director may issue an order
requiring the licensee or authorized delegate to cease and desist from the
violation. The order becomes effective upon service of the order upon the
licensee or authorized delegate.
(2) The director may issue an order against a licensee to cease and desist
from providing money transmission through an authorized delegate that is the
subject of a separate order by the director.
(3) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending
the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(4) A licensee or an authorized delegate that is served with an order to
cease and desist may petition the district court of Lancaster County for a
judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement,
operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an
administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) Upon entry of an order to cease and desist, the director shall
promptly notify the affected person that such order has been entered and
provide opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(1) No person acting personally or as an authorized delegate shall acquire
control of any licensee under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act without first
giving thirty days' notice to the director on forms prescribed by the director
of such proposed acquisition.
(2) The director, upon receipt of such notice, shall act upon the proposed
acquisition within thirty days, and unless he or she disapproves the proposed
acquisition within that period of time, the acquisition shall become effective
on the thirty-first day after receipt without the director's approval, except
that the director may extend the thirty-day period an additional thirty days
if, in his or her judgment, any material information submitted is substantially
inaccurate or the acquiring person has not furnished all the information
required by the director.
(3) An acquisition may be made prior to the expiration of the disapproval
period if the director issues written notice of his or her intent not to
disapprove the action.
(4)(a) The director may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:
(i) The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might
-27-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
jeopardize the financial stability of the acquired licensee;
(ii) The business experience, character, and general fitness of any
acquiring person or of any of the proposed management personnel of the
acquiring person indicate that the acquired licensee would not be operated
honestly, carefully, or efficiently; or
(iii) Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish all
information required by the director.
(b) The director may require that any acquiring person comply with the
application requirements of section 8-2729.
(c) The director shall notify the acquiring person in writing of
disapproval of the acquisition. The notice shall provide a statement of the
basis for the disapproval.
(d) Within fifteen business days after receipt of written notice of
disapproval, the acquiring person may request a hearing on the proposed
acquisition. The hearing shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act and rules and regulations of the department. Following such
hearing, the director shall, by order, approve or disapprove the proposed
acquisition on the basis of the record made at the hearing.
Sec. 42. Section 8-2737, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2737 The director may enter into a consent order at any time with a
person to resolve a matter arising under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or
a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or order issued under the act. A
consent order shall be signed by the person to whom the order is issued or by
the person's authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement with the
terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not
constitute an admission by a person that the act or a rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act has been violated. (1)
The director may conduct an examination of a licensee upon reasonable written
notice to the licensee. The director may examine a licensee without prior
notice if the director has a reasonable basis to believe that the licensee is
in noncompliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) An examination may be conducted in conjunction with examinations to be
performed by representatives of agencies of another state or states or
departments or agencies of the United States. The director, in lieu of an
examination, may accept the examination report of an agency of another state or
a department or an agency of the United States or a report prepared by an
independent accounting firm. Reports so accepted are considered for all
purposes as an official report of the department.
(3) The director may make investigations regarding complaints of alleged
violations of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, any rule and regulation or
order under the act, or any state or federal law applicable to a licensee, an
authorized delegate, or an applicant for a license, as the director deems
necessary, and to the extent necessary for this purpose, the director may
examine such licensee, authorized delegate, or any other person, interview
officers, principals, employees, and customers of the licensee, authorized
delegate, or applicant, and compel the production of all relevant books,
records, accounts, and documents.
(4) The director may request financial data from a licensee in addition to
that required under section 8-2734.
(5) The director may conduct an examination of any authorized delegate of
a licensee within this state upon reasonable written notice to the licensee and
the authorized delegate. The director may conduct an examination of any
authorized delegate without prior notice to the authorized delegate or licensee
only if the director has a reasonable basis to believe that the licensee or
authorized delegate is in noncompliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act.
(6) Upon receipt by a licensee, an authorized delegate, or any other
person of a notice of investigation or inquiry request for information from the
department, the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person shall respond
within twenty-one calendar days. Failure to respond is a violation of the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. Each day a licensee, authorized delegate, or
other person fails to respond as required by this subsection shall constitute a
separate violation.
(7) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has violated
subsection (6) of this section, the director may order such person to pay (a)
an administrative fine of not more than two thousand dollars for each separate
violation and (b) the costs of investigation. The department shall remit fines
collected under this subsection to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(8) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, a lien in the
amount of such fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of
such person in this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the
director. The lien shall attach to the real property of such person when notice
of the lien is filed and indexed against the real property in the office of the
register of deeds in the county where the real property is located. The lien
shall attach to any other property of such person when notice of the lien is
filed against the property in the manner prescribed by law. Failure of the
person to pay such fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(9) For purposes of any investigation, examination, or proceeding under
-28-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, the director or any officer designated by
the director may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers,
correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the
director deems relevant or material to the inquiry. If any person refuses to
comply with a subpoena issued under this subsection or to testify with respect
to any matter relevant to the proceeding, the district court of Lancaster
County may, on application of the director, issue an order requiring the person
to comply with the subpoena and to testify. Failure to obey an order of the
court to comply with the subpoena may be punished by the court as civil
contempt.
(10) The total charge for an examination under this section shall be paid
by the licensee or authorized delegate as set forth in sections 8-605 and
8-606.
Sec. 43. Section 8-2738, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2738 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
any person violating the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or any rule,
regulation, or order of the director adopted, promulgated, or issued pursuant
to the act or who engages in any act, practice, or transaction declared by the
act to be unlawful is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.
(2) A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation,
or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or who intentionally makes a false entry or
omits a material entry in such a record is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(3) An individual who knowingly engages in money transmission for which a
license is required under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act without being
licensed under the act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(1) Each licensee shall make, keep, and preserve the following books,
accounts, and other records for a period of three years which shall be open to
inspection by the director:
(a) A record of each payment instrument and stored value sold;
(b) A general ledger containing all assets, liability, capital, income,
and expense accounts, which general ledger shall be posted at least monthly;
(c) Settlement sheets received from authorized delegates;
(d) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(e) Records of outstanding payment instruments and stored value;
(f) Records of each payment instrument and stored value paid;
(g) A list of the names and addresses of all of the licensee's authorized
delegates; and
(h) Any other records the director reasonably requires by rule or
regulation or order.
(2) Maintenance of such documents as are required by this section in a
photographic, electronic, or other similar form constitutes compliance with
this section.
(3) Records may be maintained at a location other than within this state
so long as the records are made accessible to the director on seven business
days' written notice.
Sec. 44. Section 8-2739, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2739 The director may assess a fine against a person that violates the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated
or an order issued under the act in an amount not to exceed five thousand
dollars per violation per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus
the department's and the State of Nebraska's costs and expenses for the
investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney's
fees. A licensee desiring to conduct money transmission through an authorized
delegate shall authorize each authorized delegate to operate pursuant to an
express written contract which, for contracts entered into on or after January
1, 2014, shall provide the following:
(1) That the licensee appoints the person as its authorized delegate with
authority to engage in the sale and issue of payment instruments or engage in
the business of money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
(2) That neither a licensee nor an authorized delegate may authorize
subdelegates without the written consent of the director; and
(3) That the licensee is subject to supervision and regulation by the
director.
Sec. 45. Section 8-2740, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2740 (1) If the director has reason to believe that a person has
violated or is violating section 8-2709, the director may issue an order to
cease and desist requiring that the person cease and desist from the violation
of section 8-2709.
(2) In an emergency, the director may petition the district court of
Lancaster County for the issuance of a temporary restraining order ex parte
pursuant to the rules of civil procedure.
(3) An order to cease and desist becomes effective when issued by the
director.
(4) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable pending
the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(5) A person that is served with an order to cease and desist for
violating section 8-2709 may petition the district court of Lancaster County
-29-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement,
operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an
administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
(6) Upon entry of an order to cease and desist, the director shall
promptly notify the affected person that such order has been entered and
provide opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Act.
(1) An authorized delegate shall not make any fraudulent or false
statement or misrepresentation to a licensee or to the director.
(2) An authorized delegate shall conduct all money transmission strictly
in accordance with the licensee's written procedures provided to the authorized
delegate.
(3) An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the licensee in
accordance with the terms of the contract between the licensee and the
authorized delegate.
(4) An authorized delegate is deemed to consent to the director's
inspection with or without prior notice to the licensee or authorized delegate.
(5) An authorized delegate is under a duty to act only as authorized under
the contract with the licensee and the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. An
authorized delegate who exceeds its authority is subject to cancellation of its
contract and further disciplinary action by the director.
(6) All funds, less fees, received by an authorized delegate of a licensee
from the sale or delivery of a payment instrument issued by a licensee or
received by an authorized delegate for transmission shall, from the time such
funds are received by such authorized delegate until such time when the funds
or an equivalent amount are remitted by the authorized delegate to the
licensee, constitute trust funds owned by and belonging to the licensee. If an
authorized delegate commingles any such funds with any other funds or property
owned or controlled by the authorized delegate, all commingled proceeds and
other property is impressed with a trust in favor of the licensee in an amount
equal to the amount of the proceeds due the licensee.
Sec. 46. Section 8-2741, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2741 (1) The department shall remit all fees, charges, and costs
collected by the department pursuant to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash
Fund.
(2) The department shall remit fines collected under the act to the State
Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
(1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, suspend or revoke any license issued pursuant to
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act if he or she finds:
(a) Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time when
the licensee applied for its original or renewal license, would have been
grounds for denying such application;
(b) The licensee's net worth has become inadequate and the licensee, after
ten days' written notice from the director, failed to take such steps as the
director deems necessary to remedy such deficiency;
(c) The licensee knowingly violated any material provision of the act or
any rule or order validly adopted and promulgated under the act;
(d) The licensee conducted money transmission in an unsafe or unsound
manner;
(e) The licensee is insolvent;
(f) The licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, made an
assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or admitted in writing its
inability to pay its debts as they became due;
(g) The licensee filed for liquidation or reorganization under any
bankruptcy law;
(h) The licensee refused to permit the director to make any examination
authorized by the act; or
(i) The licensee willfully failed to make any report required by the act.
(2) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or unsound
practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the licensee's
money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, if any, the gravity of the
violation of the act, and the previous conduct of the licensee.
(3) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license by delivering to the
director written notice of the surrender, but a surrender shall not affect
civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender or
liability for any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of its
officers, directors, key shareholders, partners, or members for acts committed
before the surrender.
(4)(a) If a licensee fails to renew its license as required by section
8-2734 and does not voluntarily surrender the license pursuant to this section,
the department may issue a notice of expiration of the license to the licensee
in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(b) If a licensee fails to maintain a surety bond as required by section
8-2727, the department may issue a notice of cancellation of the license in
lieu of revocation proceedings.
(5) Revocation, suspension, surrender, cancellation, or expiration of a
license shall not impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting lawful
contract between the licensee and any person.
(6) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, or expiration of a license shall
-30-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
not affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the
revocation, suspension, cancellation, or expiration or liability for any fines
which may be levied against the licensee or any of its officers, directors, key
shareholders, partners, or members for acts committed before the revocation,
suspension, cancellation, or expiration.
Sec. 47. Section 8-2742, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
8-2742 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act:
(1) 31 C.F.R. 1010.100 means 31 C.F.R. 1010.100, as such regulation
existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) Bank Secrecy Act means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. 5311 et seq.,
and the implementing regulations of such act, as such act and regulations
existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) Bank Service Company Act means the Bank Service Company Act, 12 U.S.C.
1861 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(4) Commodity Exchange Act means the Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1 et
seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) Edge Act means the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. 611 et seq., as such act
existed on January 1, 2025;
(6) Federal Credit Union Act means the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C.
1751 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(7) Federal Deposit Insurance Act means the Federal Deposit Insurance Act,
12 U.S.C. 1811 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(8) Federal remittance rule means 12 C.F.R. part 1005, subpart B, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(9) Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act means the Foreign Account Tax
Compliance Act, 26 U.S.C. 1471 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(10) International Banking Act of 1978 means the International Banking Act
of 1978, 12 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(11) Securities Exchange Act of 1934 means the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, 15 U.S.C. 78a et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(12) United States Bankruptcy Code means 11 U.S.C. 101 et seq., as such
sections existed on January 1, 2025; and
(13) Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools
Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 means the Uniting and
Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and
Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, Public Law 107-56, as such act existed on
January 1, 2025.
(1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, issue an order suspending or revoking the
designation of an authorized delegate if the director finds that:
(a) The authorized delegate violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the
act;
(b) The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the director;
(c) The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
(d) The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or
federal anti-money laundering statute;
(e) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
authorized delegate or a controlling person of the authorized delegate
indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized
delegate to engage in money transmission services; or
(f) The authorized delegate is engaged in an unsafe or unsound practice.
(2) In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe
or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the
authorized delegate's money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, if any,
the gravity of the violation of the act, and the previous conduct of the
authorized delegate.
(3) Any authorized delegate to whom a final order is issued under this
section may apply to the director to modify or rescind the order. The director
shall not grant the application unless the director finds that (a) it is in the
public interest to do so and (b) it is reasonable to believe that the person
will comply with the act and any rule, regulation, or order issued under the
act if and when that person is permitted to resume being an authorized delegate
of a licensee.
Sec. 48. Section 8-3025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
8-3025 The director may suspend or revoke the charter of a digital asset
depository if, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the director
determines that:
(1) The digital asset depository has failed or refused to comply with an
order issued under section 8-1,136, 8-2504, or 8-2740 8-2743;
(2) The application for a charter contained a materially false statement,
misrepresentation, or omission; or
(3) An officer, a director, or an agent of the digital asset depository,
in connection with an application for a charter, an examination, a report, or
other document filed with the director, knowingly made a materially false
statement, misrepresentation, or omission to the department, the director, or
the duly authorized agent of the department or director.
Sec. 49. Section 8-3027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-31-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
8-3027 (1) If the director finds that a digital asset depository has
failed, is operating in an unsafe or unsound condition, or is endangering the
interests of customers, and the failure, unsafe or unsound condition, or
endangerment has not been remedied within the time prescribed under section
8-1,117 or as directed by order of the director issued pursuant to section
8-1,136, 8-2504, or 8-2740 8-2743, the director shall conduct a liquidation or
appoint a receiver as provided by sections 8-198, 8-1,100, and 8-1,102.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Failed or failure means, consistent with an order or rules and
regulations of the director, a circumstance when a digital asset depository has
not:
(i) Complied with the requirements of section 8-3009;
(ii) Maintained capital and surplus as required by section 8-3013; or
(iii) Paid, in the manner commonly accepted by business practices, its
legal obligations to customers on demand or to discharge any promissory notes,
or other indebtedness when due; and
(b) Unsafe or unsound condition means, consistent with an order or rules
and regulations of the director, a circumstance relating to a digital asset
depository which is likely to:
(i) Cause the failure of the digital asset depository;
(ii) Cause a substantial dissipation of assets or earnings;
(iii) Substantially disrupt the services provided by the digital asset
depository to customers; or
(iv) Otherwise substantially prejudice the interests of customers of the
digital asset depository.
Sec. 50. Section 44-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-502 No policy of life or endowment insurance, except policies of
industrial insurance, shall be issued or delivered in this state unless it
contains in substance the following provisions:
(1) A provision that all premiums shall be payable in advance either at
the home office of the company or to any agent of the company upon delivery of
a receipt signed by one or more of the officers who shall be named in the
policy.
(2) A provision that the insured is entitled to a grace of one month
within which the payment of any premium, after the first year, may be made,
subject, at the option of the company, to an interest charge not in excess of
six percent per annum for the number of days of grace elapsing before the
payment of the premium, during which period of grace the policy shall continue
in force; but in case the policy becomes a claim during the said period of
grace before the overdue premium or the deferred premiums of the current policy
year, if any, are paid, the amount of such premiums, with interest on any
overdue premium, may be deducted from any amount payable under the policy in
settlement.
(3) A provision that the policy shall constitute the entire contract
between the parties; but if the company desires to make the application a part
of the contract, it may do so; Provided, a copy of such application shall be
endorsed upon or attached to the policy when issued, and in such case, the
policy shall contain a provision that the policy and the application therefor
shall constitute the entire contract between the parties.
(4) A provision that all statements made by the insured shall, in the
absence of fraud, be deemed representations and not warranties, and that no
such statement shall avoid the policy unless it is contained in a written
application, and a copy of such application shall be endorsed upon or attached
to the policy when issued.
(5) A provision that the policy shall be incontestable after it shall have
been in force during the lifetime of the insured for two years from its date,
except for nonpayment of premiums and except with respect to limitations of
liability which may be contained in the policy relating to (a) death resulting
from war or acts of war, declared or undeclared, where such limitations shall
have been found by the Director of Insurance to be in keeping with the
interests of the policyholders of the company and to be not unfairly
discriminatory, and (b) aeronautics other than as a fare-paying passenger of a
commercial airline, and flying on a regularly scheduled route between
definitely established airports; and in any such cases the liability of the
company may be limited by the terms of the policy to a sum not less than the
reserve on the face of the policy and the reserve on any paid-up additions
thereto and any dividends standing to the credit of the policy, less any
indebtedness to the company on the policy; and, at the option of the company,
provisions relative to benefits in the event of total and permanent disability,
and provisions which grant additional insurance specifically against death by
accident may be excepted from the incontestable clause; Provided, limitations
with reference to aeronautics shall not be included in any policy where an
extra premium is charged to cover the aeronautic risk, nor shall any such
limitations extending beyond the contestable period be included in or attached
to any policy where the applicant for insurance has not elected in writing to
accept a policy with such limitations, and by such election has agreed to a
reduced coverage for the aviation risk.
(6) A provision that if the age of the insured has been misstated, the
amount payable under the policy shall be such as the premium paid would have
purchased at the correct age.
(7) A provision that the policy shall participate in the surplus of the
company, and that, beginning not later than the end of the third policy year,
-32-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
the company shall annually ascertain and apportion the amount of divisible
surplus to which all such policies, as a separate class, are entitled, which
amount shall be carried as a distinct and separate liability in favor of such
policies. The insured, under any annual dividend policy, shall have the right
each year to have the dividend arising from such participation paid in cash,
and if the policy shall provide other dividend options, it shall further
provide that, if the insured shall not elect any such other options, one of
such dividend options provided shall become effective as provided in the
policy; but such participation and its distribution may, by contract, be
deferred to a fixed or specified time, not exceeding twenty years. Upon written
request of the insured the company shall furnish him or her with a statement of
the amount of the surplus provisionally ascertained or set aside on such policy
and held awaiting distribution at the expiration of the deferred dividend
period.
(8) A provision that after three full years' premiums have been paid, the
company at any time, while the policy is in force, will advance, on proper
assignment or pledge of the policy, and on the sole security thereof, at a
specified rate of interest determined pursuant to section 44-502.03 a sum equal
to, or, at the option of the owner of the policy, less than the amount required
by section 44-405, under the conditions specified thereby, and that the company
will deduct from such loan value any existing indebtedness on the policy, which
has not otherwise entered into the computation of such loan value, together
with any unpaid balance of the premium for the current policy year, and may
collect interest in advance on the loan to the end of the current policy year.
Interest if payable annually in advance shall not exceed an effective rate
equivalent to the specified rate of interest determined pursuant to section
44-502.03. It shall be further stipulated in the policy that failure to repay
any such advance, or to pay interest, shall not avoid the policy unless the
total indebtedness thereon to the company shall equal or exceed such loan value
at the time of such failure, nor until one month after notice shall have been
mailed by the company to the last-known address of the insured and of the
assignee, if any. No condition other than as provided herein, or in section
44-405, shall be exacted as prerequisite to any such advance.
(9) A provision for nonforfeiture benefits and cash surrender values in
accordance with the requirements of sections 44-406 to 44-407.09.
(10) A table showing in figures the loan values, if any, and the options
available under the policies each year upon default in premium payments, during
at least the first twenty years of the policy.
(11) A provision that if, in the event of default in premium payments, the
value of the policy shall be applied to the purchase of other insurance, and if
such insurance shall be in force and the original policy shall not have been
surrendered to the company and canceled, the policy may be reinstated within
three years from such default, upon evidence of insurability satisfactory to
the company and payment of arrears of premiums with interest and the payment or
reinstatement of any other indebtedness to the company upon such policy.
(12) A provision that when a policy shall become a claim by the death of
the insured, settlement shall be made upon receipt of due proof of death, or
not later than two months after receipt of such proof.
(13) In case the proceeds of a policy are payable in installments, or as
an annuity, a table showing the amounts of the installments or annuity
payments.
(14) A title on the face of the policy correctly describing the same. Any
of the foregoing provisions or portions of this section not applicable by
reason of the plan of insurance may, to the extent of inapplicability, be
omitted from the policy. Any such policy may be issued or delivered in this
state which in the opinion of the Department of Insurance contains provisions
on any one or more of the several foregoing requirements more favorable to the
policyholder than hereinbefore required.
(15)(a) For policies issued or delivered in this state on or after January
1, 2026, a provision that, at least fifteen days prior to termination or lapse
by reason of default in payment of any premium due on such policy, a notice
will be sent electronically or mailed to the last-known address of the owner
and any assignee on record with the company.
(b) For policies issued or delivered in this state on or after January 1,
2026, an assignee shall have the same legal standing as the owner with respect
to subdivision (15)(a) of this section.
Sec. 51. Section 44-1703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-1703 All life insurance and all accident and health insurance sold in
connection with loans or other credit transactions shall be subject to sections
44-1701 to 44-1713 except such insurance sold in connection with a loan or
other credit transaction of more than ten years duration or fifteen years
duration when made by licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act. No insurance shall be subject to sections 44-1701 to 44-1713 when the
issuance of such insurance is an isolated transaction on the part of the
insurer and not related to an agreement or a plan for insuring debtors of the
creditor.
Sec. 52. Section 44-4109.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-4109.01 Policies or contracts authorized by sections 44-4109 and
44-4110 are subject to the following requirements:
(1) A prospective insured shall be provided information about the terms
and conditions of the insurance arrangement to enable him or her to make an
-33-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
informed decision about accepting a system of health care delivery. If the
insurance arrangement is described orally to a prospective insured, the
description shall use easily understood, truthful, and objective terms. All
written descriptions shall be in a readable and understandable format. Specific
items that shall be included are:
(a) Coverage provisions, benefits, and any exclusions by category of
service, provider, or physician and, if applicable, by specific service;
(b) Any prior authorization or other review requirements, including
preauthorization review, concurrent review, postservice review, and postpayment
review, the manner in which an insured may obtain review of a denial of
coverage, and the nature of any liability an insured may incur if the insured
does not comply with the authorization requirements of the policy, contract,
certificate, or other materials; and
(c) Information on the insured's financial responsibility for payment for
deductibles, coinsurance, or other noncovered services;
(2) If an insurer conducts customer satisfaction surveys concerning an
insurance arrangement, the results of such surveys shall be made available upon
request to existing and prospective participants in insurance arrangements;
(3) The policy, contract, certificate, or other materials shall establish
a mechanism by which a committee of preferred providers will be involved in
reviewing and advising the insurance arrangement about medical policy,
including coverage of new technology and procedures, quality and credentialing
criteria, and medical management procedures;
(4) All policies or contracts shall have a system for credentialing
participating preferred providers and shall allow all providers within the
insurance arrangement's geographic service area to apply for such credentials
periodically and not less than annually. The credentialing process:
(a) Shall begin upon application of a provider for inclusion in the policy
or contract; and
(b) Shall be based solely on quality, accessibility, or economic
considerations and shall be applied in accordance with reasonable business
judgment.
Credentialing standards or criteria shall be made available, upon request,
to providers and insureds;
(5) If the policy or contract is with an organized delivery system formed
by insurers, hospitals, physicians, or allied health professionals, or a
combination of such entities, participation by a provider may be limited to a
participant in the organized delivery system or to providers having staff
privileges at a particular health care facility;
(6) If an insurer or a participant in an insurance arrangement refuses to
contract with a provider, the provider shall be permitted to appeal the adverse
decision. A person conducting the provider-appeal procedure may be employed by
the insurer or participant in an insurance arrangement if the person does not
initially participate in the decision to take adverse action against the
provider. The provider-appeal procedure shall include, but not be limited to,
notice of the date and time of the hearing, a statement of the criteria or
standards on which the decision was based, an opportunity for the provider to
review information upon which the adverse decision was based, an opportunity
for the provider to appear personally at the hearing and present any additional
information, and a timely decision on the appeal;
(7) If the insurer or participant in an insurance arrangement excludes or
fails to retain a provider previously contracted with to provide health care
services, the provider shall be permitted to appeal the adverse decision in the
same manner as set forth in subdivision (6) of this section. If the provider
disagrees with the decision, the provider shall be permitted to appeal to an
appeals committee consisting of one person selected by each party to the appeal
and one person mutually agreeable to both parties. The parties to the appeal
shall pay to the appeal committee any costs associated with the person they
select and shall share the costs of the person mutually agreeable to both
parties, which costs shall not be recoverable by the other party;
(8) Prior to initiation of a proceeding to terminate a provider's
participation, the provider shall be given an opportunity to enter into and
complete a corrective action plan, except in cases of fraud or imminent harm to
patient health or when the provider's ability to provide services has been
restricted by an action, including probation or any compliance agreements, by
the Department of Health and Human Services or other governmental agency; and
(9) Policies and contracts shall not exclude a provider (a) providers with
a practice practices containing a substantial number of patients having severe
or expensive medical conditions or (b) who holds a visiting faculty permit as
described in section 38-2045. An insurance arrangement shall not be
prohibited , except that this section shall not prohibit plans from excluding a
provider providers who fails fail to meet the insurance arrangement's criteria
for quality, accessibility, or economic considerations.
Sec. 53. Section 45-101.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
45-101.04 The limitation on the rate of interest provided in section
45-101.03 shall not apply to:
(1) Other rates of interest authorized for loans made by any licensee or
permittee operating under a license or permit duly issued by the Department of
Banking and Finance pursuant to the Credit Union Act, the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act, subsection (4) of section 8-319, or sections 8-815 to
8-829;
(2) Loans made to any corporation, partnership, limited liability company,
-34-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
or trust;
(3) The guarantor or surety of any loan to a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or trust;
(4) Loans made when the aggregate principal amount of the indebtedness is
twenty-five thousand dollars or more of the borrower to any one financial
institution, licensee, or permittee;
(5) Loans insured, guaranteed, sponsored, or participated in, either in
whole or part, by any agency, department, or program of the United States or
state government;
(6) Loans or advances of money, repayable on demand, which are made solely
upon securities, as defined in subdivision (15) of section 8-1101, pledged as
collateral for such repayment and in which such loans or advances are used by
the borrower only for the purchase of securities as so defined. It shall be
lawful to contract for and receive any rate of interest on such transaction as
the parties thereto may expressly agree;
(7) Interest charges made on open credit accounts by a person who sells
goods or services on credit when the interest charges do not exceed one and
one-third percent per month for any charges which remain unpaid for more than
thirty days following rendition of the statement of account;
(8) A minimum charge of ten dollars per loan which may be charged by the
lender in lieu of all interest charges;
(9) Loans described in subsection (4) of section 8-319 made by a state or
federal savings and loan association at a rate not to exceed nineteen percent
per annum;
(10) Loans made primarily for business or agricultural purposes or secured
by real property when such loans are made (a) by a licensee, registrant, or
permittee operating under a license, registration, or permit duly issued by the
Department of Banking and Finance except for licensees operating under the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, (b) by any financial institution
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit
Union Administration, or (c) by any insurance company organized under the laws
of this state and subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance;
(11) Loans secured solely by real property when such loans are (a) made by
licensees operating under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act and (b)
made to finance or refinance the purchase of the property or construction on or
improvements to the property, if the Department of Banking and Finance has the
authority to examine such loans for compliance with sections 45-101.02 and
45-101.03. A licensee making a loan pursuant to this subdivision may obtain an
interest in any fixtures attached to such real property and any insurance
proceeds payable in connection with such real property or the loan;
(12) Loans secured by a reverse mortgage pursuant to section 45-702.01;
(13) Interest charges made on any goods or services sold under an
installment contract pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
Subject to section 86 of this act 45-338, it shall be lawful to contract for
and receive any rate of interest on such contract as the parties may expressly
agree to in writing; or
(14) Fees which may be charged by a licensee for services pursuant to the
Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act.
Sec. 54. Section 45-1,110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
45-1,110 Sections 45-1,105 to 45-1,110 shall not apply to any licensee
operating under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
Sec. 55. Section 45-334, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-334 Sections 45-334 to 45-356 and sections 70 and 78 to 101 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
Sec. 56. Section 45-335, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-335 For purposes of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Applicant means a person applying for a license under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act;
(2) Basic time price means the cash sale price of the goods or services
which are the subject matter of an installment sales contract plus the amount
included therein, if a separate identified charge is made therefor and stated
in the contract, for insurance, registration, certificate of title, debt
cancellation contract, debt suspension contract, electronic title and lien
services, guaranteed asset protection waiver, and license fees, filing fees, an
origination fee, and fees and charges prescribed by law which actually are or
will be paid to public officials for determining the existence of or for
perfecting, releasing, or satisfying any security related to the credit
transaction or any charge for nonfiling insurance if such charge does not
exceed the amount of fees and charges prescribed by law which would have been
paid to public officials for filing, perfecting, releasing, and satisfying any
security related to the credit transaction and less the amount of the buyer's
downpayment in money or goods or both;
(3) Branch office means any location, other than the main office location,
at which the business of a licensee is to be conducted, including:
(a) Any offices physically located in Nebraska; and
(b) Any offices that, while not physically located in this state, intend
to transact business with Nebraska residents;
(4) Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of
data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of
-35-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
information;
(5) Buyer means a person who buys goods or obtains services from a seller
in an installment sale;
(6) Cash price or cash sale price means the price stated in an installment
sales contract for which the seller would have sold or furnished to the buyer
and the buyer would have bought or acquired from the seller goods or services
which are the subject matter of the contract if such sale had been a sale for
cash instead of an installment sale. It may include the cash price of
accessories or services related to the sale such as delivery, installation,
alterations, modifications, and improvements and may include taxes to the
extent imposed on the cash sale;
(7) Consumer means an individual who is a resident of Nebraska and who
seeks to obtain, obtains, or has obtained financial products or services that
are to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;
(8)(a) Control in the case of a corporation means (i) direct or indirect
ownership of or the right to control twenty-five percent or more of the voting
shares of the corporation or (ii) the ability of a person or group acting in
concert to elect a majority of the directors or otherwise effect a change in
policy.
(b) Control in the case of any other entity means (i) the power, directly
or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of the entity, (ii) the
contribution of twenty-five percent or more of the capital of the entity, or
(iii) the right to receive, upon dissolution, twenty-five percent or more of
the capital of the entity;
(9) Debt cancellation contract means a loan term or contractual
arrangement modifying loan terms under which a financial institution or
licensee agrees to cancel all or part of a buyer's obligation to repay an
extension of credit from the financial institution or licensee upon the
occurrence of a specified event. The debt cancellation contract may be separate
from or a part of other loan documents. The term debt cancellation contract
does not include loan payment deferral arrangements in which the triggering
event is the buyer's unilateral election to defer repayment or the financial
institution's or licensee's unilateral decision to allow a deferral of
repayment;
(10) Debt suspension contract means a loan term or contractual arrangement
modifying loan terms under which a financial institution or licensee agrees to
suspend all or part of a buyer's obligation to repay an extension of credit
from the financial institution or licensee upon the occurrence of a specified
event. The debt suspension contract may be separate from or a part of other
loan documents. The term debt suspension contract does not include loan payment
deferral arrangements in which the triggering event is the buyer's unilateral
election to defer repayment or the financial institution's or licensee's
unilateral decision to allow a deferral of repayment;
(11) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(12) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(13) Financial institution has the same meaning as in section 8-101.03;
(14) Goods means all personal property, except money or things in action,
and includes goods which, at the time of sale or subsequently, are so affixed
to realty as to become part thereof whether or not severable therefrom;
(15) Guaranteed asset protection waiver means a waiver that is offered,
sold, or provided in accordance with the Guaranteed Asset Protection Waiver
Act;
(16) Installment sale means any transaction, whether or not involving the
creation or retention of a security interest, in which a buyer acquires goods
or services from a seller pursuant to an agreement which provides for a time-
price differential and under which the buyer agrees to pay all or part of the
time-sale price in one or more installments and within one hundred forty-five
months, except that the purchase of mobile homes may exceed such one-hundred-
forty-five-month limitation. Installment sale does not include a consumer
rental purchase agreement defined in and regulated by the Consumer Rental
Purchase Agreement Act;
(17) Installment sales contract means an agreement entered into in this
state evidencing an installment sale except those otherwise provided for in
separate acts;
(1) Goods means all personal property, except money or things in action,
and includes goods which, at the time of sale or subsequently, are so affixed
to realty as to become part thereof whether or not severable therefrom;
(2) Services means work, labor, and services of any kind performed in
conjunction with an installment sale but does not include services for which
the prices charged are required by law to be established and regulated by the
government of the United States or any state;
(3) Buyer means a person who buys goods or obtains services from a seller
in an installment sale;
(4) Seller means a person who sells goods or furnishes services to a buyer
under an installment sale;
(5) Installment sale means any transaction, whether or not involving the
creation or retention of a security interest, in which a buyer acquires goods
or services from a seller pursuant to an agreement which provides for a time-
price differential and under which the buyer agrees to pay all or part of the
time-sale price in one or more installments and within one hundred forty-five
months, except that installment contracts for the purchase of mobile homes may
exceed such one-hundred-forty-five-month limitation. Installment sale does not
include a consumer rental purchase agreement defined in and regulated by the
-36-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act;
(6) Installment contract means an agreement entered into in this state
evidencing an installment sale except those otherwise provided for in separate
acts;
(7) Cash price or cash sale price means the price stated in an installment
contract for which the seller would have sold or furnished to the buyer and the
buyer would have bought or acquired from the seller goods or services which are
the subject matter of the contract if such sale had been a sale for cash
instead of an installment sale. It may include the cash price of accessories or
services related to the sale such as delivery, installation, alterations,
modifications, and improvements and may include taxes to the extent imposed on
the cash sale;
(8) Basic time price means the cash sale price of the goods or services
which are the subject matter of an installment contract plus the amount
included therein, if a separate identified charge is made therefor and stated
in the contract, for insurance, registration, certificate of title, debt
cancellation contract, debt suspension contract, electronic title and lien
services, guaranteed asset protection waiver, and license fees, filing fees, an
origination fee, and fees and charges prescribed by law which actually are or
will be paid to public officials for determining the existence of or for
perfecting, releasing, or satisfying any security related to the credit
transaction or any charge for nonfiling insurance if such charge does not
exceed the amount of fees and charges prescribed by law which would have been
paid to public officials for filing, perfecting, releasing, and satisfying any
security related to the credit transaction and less the amount of the buyer's
downpayment in money or goods or both;
(9) Time-price differential, however denominated or expressed, means the
amount, as limited in the Nebraska Installment Sales Act, to be added to the
basic time price;
(10) Time-sale price means the total of the basic time price of the goods
or services, the amount of the buyer's downpayment in money or goods or both,
and the time-price differential;
(11) Sales finance company means a person purchasing one or more
installment contracts from one or more sellers or acquiring any rights of
ownership, servicing, or other forms of participation in or otherwise engaging
with a consumer on behalf of the purchaser of one or more installment sales
contracts from one or more sellers. Sales finance company includes, but is not
limited to, a financial institution or installment loan licensee, if so
engaged;
(12) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(13) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(14) Financial institution has the same meaning as in section 8-101.03;
(15) Debt cancellation contract means a loan term or contractual
arrangement modifying loan terms under which a financial institution or
licensee agrees to cancel all or part of a buyer's obligation to repay an
extension of credit from the financial institution or licensee upon the
occurrence of a specified event. The debt cancellation contract may be separate
from or a part of other loan documents. The term debt cancellation contract
does not include loan payment deferral arrangements in which the triggering
event is the buyer's unilateral election to defer repayment or the financial
institution's or licensee's unilateral decision to allow a deferral of
repayment;
(16) Debt suspension contract means a loan term or contractual arrangement
modifying loan terms under which a financial institution or licensee agrees to
suspend all or part of a buyer's obligation to repay an extension of credit
from the financial institution or licensee upon the occurrence of a specified
event. The debt suspension contract may be separate from or a part of other
loan documents. The term debt suspension contract does not include loan payment
deferral arrangements in which the triggering event is the buyer's unilateral
election to defer repayment or the financial institution's or licensee's
unilateral decision to allow a deferral of repayment;
(17) Guaranteed asset protection waiver means a waiver that is offered,
sold, or provided in accordance with the Guaranteed Asset Protection Waiver
Act;
(18) Licensee means any person who obtains a license under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act;
(19) Loan or installment loan means a loan or any extension of credit to a
consumer originated or made with an interest rate greater than the maximum
interest rate allowed under section 45-101.03, a minimum loan term of six
months, and a principal balance of less than twenty-five thousand dollars;
(20) Mortgage loan originator has the same meaning as in section 45-702;
(19) Person means individual, partnership, limited liability company,
association, financial institution, trust, corporation, and any other legal
entity;
(20) Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of
data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the
information maintained by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry, its affiliates, or its subsidiaries;
(21) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means a licensing
system, also known as the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry,
developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the
American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and
registration of mortgage loan originators, mortgage bankers, installment loan
-37-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
companies, and other state-regulated financial services entities and
industries;
(22) Person means individual, partnership, limited liability company,
association, financial institution, trust, corporation, or any other legal
entity;
(23) Real property means an owner-occupied single-family, two-family,
three-family, or four-family dwelling which is located in this state, which is
occupied, used, or intended to be occupied or used for residential purposes,
and which is, or is intended to be, permanently affixed to the land;
(24) Sales finance company means a person purchasing one or more
installment sales contracts from one or more sellers or acquiring any rights of
ownership, servicing, or other forms of participation in or otherwise engaging
with a consumer on behalf of the purchaser of one or more installment sales
contracts from one or more sellers. Sales finance company includes, but is not
limited to, a financial institution or installment loan licensee, if so
engaged;
(25) Seller means a person who sells goods or furnishes services to a
buyer under an installment sale;
(26) Services means work, labor, and services of any kind performed in
conjunction with an installment sale but does not include services for which
the prices charged are required by law to be established and regulated by the
government of the United States or any state;
(27) Time-price differential, however denominated or expressed, means the
amount, as limited in the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, to be added
to the basic time price; and
(28) Time-sale price means the total of the basic time price of the goods
or services, the amount of the buyer's downpayment in money or goods or both,
and the time-price differential.
(22)(a) Control in the case of a corporation means (i) direct or indirect
ownership of or the right to control twenty-five percent or more of the voting
shares of the corporation or (ii) the ability of a person or group acting in
concert to elect a majority of the directors or otherwise effect a change in
policy.
(b) Control in the case of any other entity means (i) the power, directly
or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of the entity, (ii) the
contribution of twenty-five percent or more of the capital of the entity, or
(iii) the right to receive, upon dissolution, twenty-five percent or more of
the capital of the entity; and
(23) Branch office means any location, other than the main office
location, at which the business of a licensee is to be conducted, including (a)
any offices physically located in Nebraska, and (b) any offices that, while not
physically located in this state, intend to transact business with Nebraska
residents.
Sec. 57. Section 45-336, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-336 (1) An installment loan license shall be required for:
(a) Any person engaging in the business of making loans;
(b) Any person that holds or acquires any rights of ownership, servicing,
or other forms of participation in a loan or that engages with, or conducts
loan activity with, an installment loan borrower in connection with a loan; or
(c) Any person that is not a financial institution who, at or after the
time a loan is made by a financial institution, markets, owns in whole or in
part, holds, acquires, services, or otherwise participates in a loan.
(2) Any person may, after procuring an installment loan license from the
department, engage or continue in the business of making loans of money and
charge, contract for, and receive the maximum for interest and other charges in
accordance with the authorization and requirements of the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act.
(3) An installment loan license shall not be required for:
(a)(i) A financial institution.
(ii) While no financial institution is eligible for an installment loan
license or to make loans under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, an
installment loan license shall be required for any person that is not a
financial institution who, at or after the time a loan is made by a financial
institution, markets, owns in whole or in part, holds, acquires, services, or
otherwise participates in such loan;
(b)(i) An affiliate of an installment loan licensee if the activities of
the affiliate in this state are limited solely to the securitization of loans
made by the licensee and the servicing rights to the loans are retained by the
licensee or assigned or otherwise transferred to a financial institution,
licensee, or permittee.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (b) of this subsection:
(A) Affiliate means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with another entity;
(B) Control means to own directly or indirectly or to control in any
manner twenty-five percent of the voting shares of an entity or to control in
any manner the election of the majority of directors of any entity; and
(C) Securitization means the placing of individual installment loans made
by licensees into a commingled or pooled security that is subsequently sold or
otherwise transferred to another entity.
(iii) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to exempt a licensee
or affiliate from the Securities Act of Nebraska; and
(c) Any person, who is not an installment loan licensee, that only makes
-38-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
loans that do not exceed the maximum rate of interest permitted by section
45-101.03.
(4) An installment sales license shall be required for any person who acts
as a sales finance company in this state, whether or not such person maintains
an office, place of doing business, or agent in this state.
(5) An installment sales license shall not be required for:
(a) A financial institution or an installment loan licensee;
(b) A seller who does not otherwise act as a sales finance company, but
such seller shall comply with all of the other provisions of the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act in order to charge the time-price differential
allowed by section 86 of this act; or
(c) Persons that negotiate and enter into installment sales contracts by
United States mail without personal solicitation by salespersons or other
representatives of the seller and based upon the catalog of the seller or other
printed solicitation of business, which is distributed and made available
generally to the public, if such catalog or other printed solicitation clearly
sets forth the cash and time-sale prices and other terms of sales to be made
through such medium. All provisions of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act shall apply to such sales, except that the seller shall not be required to
deliver a copy of the contract to the buyer pursuant to section 85 of this act
and if the contract when received by the seller contains any blank spaces, the
seller may insert in the appropriate blank space the amounts of money and other
terms which are set forth in the seller's catalog or other printed solicitation
which is then in effect. In lieu of sending the buyer a copy of the contract
pursuant to section 85 of this act, the seller shall furnish to the buyer a
written statement of any items inserted in the blank spaces in the contract
received from the buyer.
(6) Loans made by financial institutions that are serviced by or purchased
by a licensee shall not be subject to the interest rate limitations of the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
(1) Each retail installment contract shall be in writing, shall be signed
by both the buyer and the seller, and shall contain the following items and a
copy thereof shall be delivered to the buyer at the time the instrument is
signed, except for contracts made in conformance with section 45-340: (a) The
cash sale price; (b) the amount of the buyer's downpayment, and whether made in
money or goods, or partly in money and partly in goods, including a brief
description of any goods traded in; (c) the difference between subdivisions (a)
and (b) of this subsection; (d) the amount included for insurance if a separate
charge is made therefor, specifying the types of coverages; (e) the amount
included for a debt cancellation contract or a debt suspension contract if the
debt cancellation contract or debt suspension contract is a contract of a
financial institution or licensee, such contract is sold directly by such
financial institution or licensee or by an unaffiliated, nonexclusive agent of
such financial institution or licensee in accordance with 12 C.F.R. part 37, as
such part existed on January 1, 2011, and the financial institution or licensee
is responsible for the unaffiliated, nonexclusive agent's compliance with such
part, and a separate charge is made therefor; (f) the amount included for
electronic title and lien services other than fees and charges prescribed by
law which actually are or will be paid to public officials for determining the
existence of or for perfecting, releasing, or satisfying any security related
to the credit transaction; (g) the basic time price, which is the sum of
subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection; (h) the time-price
differential; (i) the amount of the time-price balance, which is the sum of
subdivisions (g) and (h) of this subsection, payable in installments by the
buyer to the seller; (j) the number, amount, and due date or period of each
installment; (k) the time-sales price; and (l) the amount included for a
guaranteed asset protection waiver.
(2) The contract shall contain substantially the following notice: NOTICE
TO THE BUYER. DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT BEFORE YOU READ IT OR IF IT CONTAINS
BLANK SPACES. YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A COPY OF THE CONTRACT YOU SIGN.
(3) The items listed in subsection (1) of this section need not be stated
in the sequence or order set forth in such subsection. Additional items may be
included to explain the computations made in determining the amount to be paid
by the buyer. No installment contract shall be signed by the buyer or proffered
by seller when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after execution, except
that if delivery of the goods or services is not made at the time of the
execution of the contract, the identifying numbers or marks of the goods, or
similar information, and the due date of the first installment may be inserted
in the contract after its execution.
(4) If a seller proffers an installment contract as part of a transaction
which delays or cancels, or promises to delay or cancel, the payment of the
time-price differential on the contract if the buyer pays the basic time price,
cash price, or cash sale price within a certain period of time, the seller
shall, in clear and conspicuous writing, either within the installment contract
or in a separate document, inform the buyer of the exact date by which the
buyer must pay the basic time price, cash price, or cash sale price in order to
delay or cancel the payment of the time-price differential. The seller or any
subsequent purchaser of the installment contract, including a sales finance
company, shall not be allowed to change such date.
(5) Upon written request from the buyer, the holder of an installment
contract shall give or forward to the buyer a written statement of the dates
and amounts of payments and the total amount unpaid under such contract. A
buyer shall be given a written receipt for any payment when made in cash.
-39-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(6) After payment of all sums for which the buyer is obligated under a
contract, the holder shall deliver or mail to the buyer at his or her last-
known address one or more good and sufficient instruments or copies thereof to
acknowledge payment in full and shall release all security in the goods and
mark canceled and return to the buyer the original agreement or copy thereof or
instruments or copies thereof signed by the buyer. For purposes of this
section, a copy shall meet the requirements of section 25-12,112.
Sec. 58. Section 45-337, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-337 (1) An application for either an installment loan license or an
installment sales license shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the
director and shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The applicant's name and any trade name or doing business as
designation which the applicant intends to use in this state;
(b) The applicant's main office address;
(c) All branch office addresses of the applicant at which business is to
be conducted;
(d) The names and titles of each director and principal officer of the
applicant;
(e) The names of all shareholders, partners, or members of the applicant;
(f) A description of the activities of the applicant in such detail as the
department may require;
(g) If the applicant is an individual, such individual's social security
number;
(h) Audited financial statements of the applicant showing a minimum net
worth of one hundred thousand dollars;
(i) Background checks of the applicant as provided in section 94 of this
act; and
(j) A surety bond as provided in section 45-338.
(2) All applications for licenses must be accompanied by any processing
fee allowed for by section 94 of this act, any application and processing fees
for associated branch applications pursuant to section 45-339, and a filing fee
of:
(a) One hundred fifty dollars for an installment sales license; and
(b) Five hundred dollars for an installment loan license.
(3) The director shall, after an application has been filed for a license
under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, investigate the applicant to
determine whether all requirements for licensure have been met and to determine
if a finding can be made that the experience, character, and general fitness of
the applicant, of the members thereof if the applicant is a corporation or
association, and of the officers and directors thereof if the applicant is a
corporation, are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated
honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act.
(4) The director may, within the director's discretion, make an
examination and inspection concerning the propriety of the issuance of a
license to any applicant. The cost of such examination and inspection shall be
borne by the applicant.
(5) If all requirements to obtain a license under the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act are met and a finding can be made that the experience,
character, and general fitness of the applicant, of the members thereof if the
applicant is a corporation or association, and of the officers and directors
thereof if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to warrant belief that
the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the
purpose of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, the director shall
issue and deliver a license to the applicant to do business in accordance with
the license and the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. The director shall
have the power to deny for cause any application for a license.
(6) The department shall approve or deny every application for a license
under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act within ninety days after the
filing of an application, if the application is substantially complete and is
accompanied by the required fees and the approved bond.
(7) A license issued under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act is
nontransferable and nonassignable.
(8) An initial license shall remain in full force and effect until the
next succeeding December 31. Each license shall remain in force until revoked,
suspended, canceled, expired, or surrendered.
(9) If an applicant for a license under the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act does not complete the license application and fails to respond to a
notice or notices from the department to correct the deficiency or deficiencies
for a period of one hundred twenty days or more after the date the department
sends the initial notice to correct the deficiency or deficiencies, the
department may deem the application as abandoned and may issue a notice of
abandonment of the application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny
the application.
(10) Obtaining a license constitutes sufficient contact with this state
for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the licensee in any action
arising out of the licensee's activity in this state.
(1) The amount, if any, included for insurance, which may be purchased by
the holder of the contract, shall not exceed the applicable premium rates
chargeable in accordance with filings, if any, with the Department of
Insurance. If dual interest insurance on the goods is purchased by the holder
it shall, within thirty days after execution of the installment contract, send
-40-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
or cause to be sent to the buyer a policy or policies or certificate of
insurance, written by an insurance company authorized to do business in this
state, clearly setting forth the amount of the premium, the kind or kinds of
insurance, the coverages, and all the terms and conditions of the contract or
contracts of insurance.
(2) If any insurance is canceled or the premium adjusted during the term
of the installment contract, any refund of the insurance premium plus the
unearned time-price differential thereon received by the holder shall be
credited by the holder to the last maturing installment of the contract except
to the extent applied toward payment for similar insurance protecting the
interests of the buyer and the holder or either of them.
(3) If any insurance is canceled due to the payment of all sums for which
the buyer is liable under an installment contract, the holder of the
installment contract shall, upon receipt of payment of all sums due, send
notice to the buyer within fifteen business days of the name, address, and
telephone number of the insurance company which issued the insurance contract
or the party responsible for any refund, and notice that the buyer may be
eligible for a refund. A copy of such notice shall be retained by the holder of
the installment contract. This subsection does not apply if the holder of the
loan contract previously credited the refund of the insurance premium to the
loan contract or otherwise refunded the insurance premium to the buyer.
(4) The holder may also purchase nonfiling insurance and charge a
reasonable fee. The fee shall not exceed the amount of fees and charges
prescribed by law which would have been paid to public officials for filing,
perfecting, releasing, and satisfying any lien or security interest in the
goods or services.
Sec. 59. Section 45-338, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-338 (1) An applicant for a license to be issued pursuant to the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act shall file with the department a surety
bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars, furnished by a surety company
authorized to do business in this state. Such bond shall be increased by an
additional fifty thousand dollars for each branch location of the applicant
that is licensed under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. The bond
shall be for the use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may
have claims or causes of action against the applicant. The surety may cancel
the bond only upon thirty days' prior written notice to the director.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an
installment loan licensee who employs or enters into an independent agent
agreement with an individual required to obtain a mortgage loan originator
license pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act shall maintain the
surety bond required by subsection (1) of this section and a supplemental
surety bond. The supplemental surety bond posted by such installment loan
licensee shall cover all mortgage loan originators who are employees or
independent agents of such licensee. The supplemental surety bond shall be for
the use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may have claims
or causes of action against such licensee arising from a transaction involving
a residential mortgage loan, as defined in section 45-702, or against an
individual who is a mortgage loan originator employed by, or in an independent
agent relationship with, the licensee. The initial amount of the supplemental
surety bond shall be one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) Upon filing of the mortgage report of condition required by section
45-345, a licensee shall maintain or increase its supplemental surety bond to
reflect the total dollar amount of the closed residential mortgage loans
originated or serviced in this state in the preceding year in accordance with
the table in this subsection. A licensee may decrease its supplemental surety
bond in accordance with the table in this subsection if the supplemental surety
bond required is less than the amount of the supplemental surety bond on file
with the department.
Dollar Amount of Closed or Serviced Surety Bond Required
Residential Mortgage Loans
$0.00 through $5,000,000.00 $100,000
$5,000,000.01 through $10,000,000.00 $125,000
$10,000,000.01 through $25,000,000.00 $150,000
$25,000,000.01 and over $200,000
(3)(a) A person who employs or enters into an independent agent agreement
with an individual required to obtain a mortgage loan originator license
pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act shall maintain a surety bond
for each license that he, she, or it holds as required in subsection (1) of
this section and shall also post one supplemental surety bond which shall cover
all licenses held by such person. The supplemental surety bond posted by such
person shall cover all mortgage loan originators who are employees or
independent agents of such person. The supplemental surety bond shall be for
the use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may have claims
or causes of action against such person arising from a transaction involving a
residential mortgage loan or against an individual who is a mortgage loan
-41-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
originator employed by, or in an independent agent relationship with, the
person. The amount of such supplemental surety bond shall be as follows:
(i) The initial supplemental surety bond shall be in the amount of one
hundred thousand dollars; and
(ii) Upon filing of the mortgage report of condition required by section
45-345, the person's supplemental surety bond shall be maintained in accordance
with subdivision (2)(b) of this section. For purposes of calculating the amount
of the bond that is required, the total dollar amount of the closed loans shall
include all residential mortgage loans in this state closed by the person.
(b) A person who holds one or more installment loan licenses pursuant to
the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act and a mortgage banker license
pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act shall not be required to
post and maintain a supplemental surety bond if such person meets the following
conditions:
(i) The person maintains a surety bond as provided in subsection (1) of
this section for each installment loan license the person holds;
(ii) The person maintains a mortgage banker surety bond as provided in
section 45-724; and
(iii) The mortgage banker surety bond covers all transactions involving
residential mortgage loans, including such transactions done pursuant to the
person's installment loan license or licenses.
(4) Should the department determine that an installment loan licensee does
not maintain a supplemental surety bond in the amount required by subsection
(2) or (3) of this section, the department shall give written notification to
the licensee requiring the licensee to increase the surety bond within thirty
days to the amount required by subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(5) The bond or a substitute bond required by subsection (1) of this
section, applicable to all licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act, shall remain in effect or the licensee shall immediately cease
conducting licensable activity. If a licensee fails to maintain a surety bond
as required under this section, the department may issue a notice of
cancellation of the license in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(1)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the time-price
differential for any goods or services sold under an installment contract shall
be stated as a fixed or variable annual percentage rate and shall be at a rate
agreed to in writing, not to exceed eighteen percent per annum, except that a
minimum time-price differential of ten dollars may be charged on any
installment contract.
(b)(i) A buyer may be required, upon the execution of the installment
contract, to pay an origination fee of not to exceed ten dollars, except that
if the installment contract is for an installment sale of agricultural
machinery or equipment for use in commercial agriculture or if the installment
contract is for an installment sale of industrial machinery or equipment the
buyer may be required to pay (A) an origination fee of not to exceed one
hundred dollars if the cash sale price is less than twenty-five thousand
dollars or (B) an origination fee of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars if
the cash sale price is twenty-five thousand dollars or more.
(ii) The origination fee shall be refundable if the installment contract
is canceled during the first thirty days. The origination fee may be collected
from the buyer or included in the principal balance of the installment contract
at the time the contract is made and shall not be considered interest or a
time-price differential.
(c) Nothing in the Nebraska Installment Sales Act prohibits a seller or
holder of an installment contract from contracting for, computing, and charging
a time-price differential based upon the application of the rate charged to the
unpaid principal balance for the number of days actually elapsed. The charges
so computed shall be used for the purpose of calculating the time-price
differential, the time-price balance, the amount of each installment, and the
time-sale price.
(d) When the installment contract is payable in substantially equal and
consecutive monthly installments, the time-price differential shall be computed
on the basic time price of each contract, as determined under the provisions of
section 45-336, from the date of the contract until the due date of the final
installment, notwithstanding that the time-price balance is required to be paid
in installments.
(2) When an installment contract provides for payment other than in
substantially equal and consecutive monthly installments, the time-price
differential may be at a rate which will provide the same return as is
permitted on substantially equal monthly payment contracts under subdivision
(1)(d) of this section, having due regard for the schedule of payments.
(3) Every contract payable in two or more installments shall provide for
payment of such installments by stating the date and amount of each installment
or the method by which any variable rate or installment shall be determined.
Sec. 60. Section 45-339, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-339 (1) Licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act may
apply to establish branch offices, whether in this state, or in another state
or United States territory, at which the licensable business activities of the
licensee may be conducted.
(2) Such application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the
director and shall be accompanied by a branch application fee, along with any
processing fee allowed for by section 94 of this act. Such branch application
fees shall be:
-42-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for an installment loan branch license; and
(b) One hundred dollars for an installment sales branch license.
Where a buyer makes any subsequent purchases of goods or services from a
seller from whom he has previously purchased goods or services under one or
more installment contracts and the amounts under such contract or contracts to
the extent of cash sale price thereof have not been fully paid the subsequent
purchases may be included in and consolidated with one or more of the prior
contract or contracts. A memorandum of such additional purchases shall be
prepared by the seller and inserted in or attached to the seller's counterpart
of the contract and shall set forth:
(1) The names of the seller and the buyer and a description of the
additional goods or services sold and all the information with respect to the
additional purchase required by section 45-336 to be included in an installment
contract;
(2) The consolidated time-price balance to be paid by the buyer; and
(3) The revised payments.
A copy of such memorandum shall be delivered to the buyer as provided in
and subject to the provisions of section 45-336. When such subsequent purchases
are made, the entire amount of all payments made prior to such subsequent
purchases shall be deemed to have been applied on previous purchases.
Each payment thereafter made on a consolidated installment contract shall
be deemed to be allocated to all of the various purchases in the same ratio or
proportion as the original cash sale prices of the various purchases bear to
one another. Where the amount of each deferred payment is increased in
connection with such subsequent purchase, the subsequent payments, at the
seller's option, may be deemed to be allocated as follows: An amount equal to
the original installment payment to the previous purchase, the balance to the
subsequent purchase. The amount of any initial payment or downpayment on the
subsequent purchase shall be allocated in its entirety to such subsequent
purchase. The provisions of this section shall not apply to cases involving
equipment, parts, or to other merchandise attached or affixed to goods
previously purchased, or to repairs or services in connection therewith
rendered by the seller at the buyer's request.
Sec. 61. Section 45-340, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-340 (1) For the annual renewal of an original license under the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, the licensee shall file a renewal
application containing such information as the director may require to indicate
any material change in the information contained in the original application or
succeeding renewal applications, along with a renewal fee and any processing
fee allowed for by section 94 of this act.
(2) The renewal fee shall be:
(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for an installment loan license;
(b) One hundred twenty-five dollars for an installment loan branch
license;
(c) One hundred fifty dollars for an installment sales license; and
(d) One hundred dollars for an installment sales branch license.
(3) If a licensee fails to renew such licensee's license and does not
voluntarily surrender the license pursuant to this section, the department may
issue a notice of expiration of the license to the licensee in lieu of
revocation proceedings.
(4) Renewal of a license originally granted under the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act may be denied by the director on the following grounds:
(a) Material misstatement in the application for a license;
(b) Willful failure to comply with any provision of the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act relating to installment sales contracts or
installment loans;
(c) Failure to continue to meet the conditions under which the original
license was granted;
(d) Defrauding any buyer to the buyer's damage; or
(e) Fraudulent misrepresentation, circumvention, or concealment by the
licensee through whatever subterfuge or device of any of the material
particulars or the nature thereof required to be stated or furnished to a
consumer.
(5) Any person, licensee, or applicant potentially aggrieved by an order
of the director entered under this section may appeal the order. The appeal
shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Installment contracts negotiated and entered into by mail without personal
solicitation by salespersons or other representatives of the seller and based
upon the catalog of the seller or other printed solicitation of business, which
is distributed and made available generally to the public, if such catalog or
other printed solicitation clearly sets forth the cash and time-sale prices and
other terms of sales to be made through such medium, may be made as provided in
this section. All provisions of the Nebraska Installment Sales Act shall apply
to such sales except that the seller shall not be required to deliver a copy of
the contract to the buyer as provided in section 45-336 and if the contract
when received by the seller contains any blank spaces the seller may insert in
the appropriate blank space the amounts of money and other terms which are set
forth in the seller's catalog or other printed solicitation which is then in
effect. In lieu of sending the buyer a copy of the contract as provided in
section 45-336, the seller shall furnish to the buyer a written statement of
any items inserted in the blank spaces in the contract received from the buyer.
Sec. 62. Section 45-341, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
-43-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
to read:
45-341 (1) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license at any time by
delivering to the director written notice of the surrender. The department
shall cancel the license following such surrender.
(2) The director may, following a hearing under the Administrative
Procedure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
department under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, suspend or revoke
any license issued pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. The
director may also impose an administrative fine on the licensee for each
separate violation of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. The
department shall remit fines collected under this subsection to the State
Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska. The director may suspend or revoke a license or fine
a licensee under this subsection if the director finds:
(a) The licensee has materially violated or demonstrated a continuing
pattern of violating the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act, any order issued under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act,
or any other state or federal law applicable to the conduct of the licensee's
business;
(b) A fact or condition exists which if such fact or condition had existed
at the time of the original application for the license, would have warranted
the director to deny the license application of the licensee;
(c) The licensee has violated a voluntary consent or compliance agreement
which had been entered into with the director;
(d) The licensee has knowingly provided or caused to be provided to the
director any false or fraudulent representation of a material fact or any false
or fraudulent financial statement or suppressed or withheld from the director
any information which, if submitted by the licensee, would have resulted in
denial of the license application of the licensee;
(e) The licensee has refused to permit an examination of the licensee by
the director or failed to comply with a notice of investigation or inquiry
pursuant to section 45-346 or failed to make any report required under section
45-345. Each day the licensee continues in violation of this subdivision
constitutes a separate violation;
(f) The licensee has failed to maintain records as required by the
director following written notice. Each day the licensee continues in violation
of this subdivision constitutes a separate violation;
(g) The licensee knowingly has employed any individual or knowingly has
maintained a contractual relationship with any individual acting as an agent,
if such individual has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or was found
guilty after a plea of nolo contendere to:
(i) A misdemeanor under any state or federal law which involves dishonesty
or fraud or which involves any aspect of the installment sales business,
installment loan business, mortgage banking business, or financial institution
business; or
(ii) Any felony under state or federal law;
(h) The licensee has violated the written restrictions or conditions under
which the license was issued;
(i) The licensee or, if the licensee is a business entity, one of the
officers, directors, members, partners, or controlling shareholders was found
guilty after a plea of nolo contendere to:
(i) A misdemeanor under any state or federal law which involves dishonesty
or fraud or which involves any aspect of the installment sales business,
installment loan business, mortgage banking business, or financial institution
business; or
(ii) Any felony under state or federal law; or
(j) The licensee knowingly has employed any individual or knowingly has
maintained a contractual relationship with any individual acting as an agent,
if such individual is conducting activities requiring a mortgage loan
originator license in this state without first obtaining such license.
(3) If a licensee is a partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation, it shall be sufficient cause for the suspension or
revocation of a license that any officer, director, or trustee of a licensed
association or corporation or any member of a licensed partnership or limited
liability company has so acted or failed to act as would be cause for
suspending or revoking a license to such party as an individual.
(4) No license shall be denied, suspended, or revoked except after hearing
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The director shall give a
licensee at least ten days' written notice, in the form of an order to show
cause, of the time and place of such hearing by either registered or certified
mail addressed to the principal place of business in this state of such
licensee. Such notice shall contain the grounds of complaint against the
licensee. Any order suspending or revoking such license shall recite the
grounds upon which the order is based. The order shall be entered upon the
records of the director and shall not be effective until after thirty days'
written notice thereof given after such entry forwarded by either registered or
certified mail to the licensee at the principal place of business in this state
of such licensee.
(5) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender of any
license shall not impair or affect the obligation of any lawful contract
entered into or acquired previously thereto by the licensee.
(6) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender of any
-44-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
license shall not affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before
the revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender or affect
liability for any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of the
licensee's officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or members pursuant to
the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act for acts committed before the
revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender of the license.
(7) Whenever, for any cause, a license is revoked, the department shall
not issue another license to the licensee unless the department is otherwise
ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to do so.
(8) At the request of the licensee or any other aggrieved person, the
department shall prepare a written record which includes a transcript of the
evidence, the findings with respect to the evidence, the order, and the reasons
supporting the suspension, revocation, or denial of a license, and shall, after
being paid for the cost of the written record, deliver to the licensee or other
aggrieved person a copy of the written record in person or by certified or
registered mail.
(9) Any person, licensee, or applicant potentially aggrieved by an order
of the director entered under this section may appeal the order. The appeal
shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
An installment contract may provide and the holder thereof may collect, in
addition to any time-price differential, a delinquency charge on each
installment in default for a period of not less than fifteen days, if provided
for in the contract, not in excess of five percent of each installment or
twenty-five dollars, whichever is less, or, in lieu thereof, interest after
maturity on each such installment not exceeding the highest permissible
contract rate. If the time-price differential is computed by application of the
rate charged to the unpaid principal balance for the number of days actually
elapsed, such delinquency charge may not exceed five percent of each
installment or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less. If any installment
payment is made by a check, draft, or similar signed order which is not honored
because of insufficient funds, no account, or any other reason except an error
of a third party to the contract, the holder may charge and collect a fee of
not more than fifteen dollars. The delinquency charge and such fee may be
collected when due or at any time thereafter.
When an installment contract is for a commercial or business purpose (1) a
delinquency charge not to exceed five percent of each unpaid installment may be
contracted for and received and (2) the holder of any check or draft or similar
order which is not honored for any reason, except for error of a third party,
may charge and collect a fee as stated in the contract. As used in this
section, commercial or business purpose means primarily for a purpose other
than a personal, family, or household purpose.
Sec. 63. Section 45-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-342 Any person who, by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever,
engages in or continues any of the kinds of business or enterprise permitted to
licensees by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act without having
obtained the license required by the act, with intent to evade the provisions
of the act, is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, any
buyer may prepay in full at any time before maturity the obligation of any
contract.
(2) If such obligation is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, or
otherwise after the first installment due date, the borrower shall receive a
rebate of an amount which shall be not less than the amount obtained by
applying to the unpaid principal balances as originally scheduled or, if
deferred, as deferred, for the period following prepayment, according to the
actuarial method, the rate of the time-price differential previously stated to
the borrower. The licensee may round the rate of the time-price differential to
the nearest one-half of one percent if such procedure is not consistently used
to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted. Any default and
deferment charges which are due and unpaid may be deducted from any rebate. No
rebate shall be required for any partial prepayment. No rebate of less than one
dollar need be made. Acceleration of the maturity of the contract shall not in
itself require a rebate. If judgment is obtained before the final installment
date, the contract balance shall be reduced by the rebate which would be
required for prepayment in full as of the date judgment is obtained.
Sec. 64. Section 45-343, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-343 A licensee may move its main office or may relocate a branch office
from one location to another without obtaining a new license if the licensee
gives notice thereof to the director through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry at least thirty days prior to such move and pays a filing
fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The director may, at the director's
discretion, hold a hearing on the relocation request, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act. The expense of any such hearing shall be paid by
the licensee.
Any person who violates any provision of the Nebraska Installment Sales
Act or acts as a sales finance company in this state without a license therefor
as provided in the Nebraska Installment Sales Act shall be guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor.
Sec. 65. Section 45-344, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-344 (1) No person acting personally or as an agent shall acquire
-45-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
control of any licensee under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act
without first (a) giving thirty days' notice to the department on a form
prescribed by the department of such proposed acquisition and (b) paying a
filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars and any processing fee allowed under
subsection (2) of section 94 of this act.
(2) The director, upon receipt of such notice, shall approve or deny the
acquisition within thirty days.
(3) If the director does not deny the acquisition within such thirty-day
time period, the acquisition shall become effective on the thirty-first day
after the receipt of the notice, except that the director may extend the
thirty-day period an additional thirty days if, in the director's judgment, any
material information submitted is substantially inaccurate or the acquiring
party has not furnished all the information required by the department.
(4) An acquisition may become effective prior to the expiration of the
thirty-day period if the director issues written notice of the director's
approval of such acquisition or the director's intent not to deny the
acquisition.
(5)(a) The director may deny any proposed acquisition if:
(i) The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might
jeopardize the financial stability of the acquired licensee;
(ii) The character and general fitness of any acquiring person or of any
of the proposed management personnel indicate that the acquired installment
sales licensee or installment loan licensee would not be operated honestly,
fairly, or efficiently within the purposes of the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act; or
(iii) Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish all
information required by the department.
(b) The director shall notify the acquiring party in writing of denial of
the acquisition. The notice shall provide a statement of the basis for the
denial.
(c) Within fifteen business days after receipt of written notice of
denial, the acquiring party may make a written request for a hearing on the
proposed acquisition in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department under the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. The director shall, by order, approve
or deny the proposed acquisition on the basis of the record made at the
hearing.
If any seller or sales finance company, in the making or collection of an
installment contract, shall, directly or indirectly, contract for, take, or
receive charges in excess of those authorized by the Nebraska Installment Sales
Act except as a result of an accidental and bona fide error such contract shall
be void and uncollectible as to (1) all of the excessive portion of the time-
price differential, (2) the first one thousand dollars of the time-price
differential authorized by section 45-338, and (3) the first four thousand
dollars of the principal of the contract. If any seller or sales finance
company violates any provision of the act, other than the violations described
above, except as a result of an accidental and bona fide error, such
installment contract shall be void and uncollectible as to the first five
hundred dollars of the time-price differential and the first one thousand
dollars of the principal of such contract. If any of such money has been paid
by the buyer, such buyer or his or her assignee may recover under the act in a
civil suit brought within one year after the due date, or any extension
thereof, of the last installment of the contract.
Sec. 66. Section 45-345, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-345 (1) A licensee shall notify the director through the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry at least thirty days prior to the
occurrence of any change of the licensee's name, trade name, or doing business
as designation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection,
a licensee shall notify the director in writing or through the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within three business days from the time
that the licensee becomes aware of any breach of the security of the system of
computerized data owned or licensed by the licensee, which contains personal
information about a Nebraska resident, or the unauthorized access to or use of
such information about a Nebraska resident as a result of the breach.
(b) If a licensee would be required under Nebraska law to provide
notification to a Nebraska resident regarding such incident, then the licensee
shall provide a copy of such notification to the department prior to or
simultaneously with the licensee's notification to the Nebraska resident.
(c) Notice required by this subsection may be delayed if a law enforcement
agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation. Notice
shall be made in good faith, without unreasonable delay, and as soon as
possible after the law enforcement agency determines that notification will no
longer impede the investigation.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the terms breach of the security of
the system and personal information have the same meaning as in section 87-802.
(3) A licensee shall maintain the minimum net worth required by section
45-337 while a license issued to the licensee under the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act is in effect. The minimum net worth shall be proven by an
annual audit conducted by a certified public accountant. A licensee shall
submit a copy of the annual audit to the director as required by section 45-337
or upon written request of the director. If a licensee fails to maintain the
-46-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
required minimum net worth, the department may issue a notice of cancellation
of the license in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(4)(a) Every licensee shall, at the time any loan is made, give to the
borrower, or if there are two or more borrowers, to one of the borrowers, a
statement in the English language disclosing in clear and distinct terms the
information required to be disclosed under the federal Consumer Credit
Protection Act.
(b) The licensee shall also give to the borrower a copy of any writing
evidencing a loan if the writing requires or provides for the signature of the
borrower. The writing evidencing the borrower's obligation to pay a loan shall
contain a clear and conspicuous notice in form and content substantially as
follows:
NOTICE TO CONSUMER: 1. Do not sign this paper before you read it. 2. You
are entitled to a copy of this paper. 3. You may prepay the unpaid balance at
any time without penalty and may be entitled to receive a refund of unearned
charges in accordance with law.
(5) All licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act shall,
on or before March 1 of each year, file with the department a report of the
licensee's earnings and operations for the preceding calendar year, the
licensee's assets at the end of the year, and any other relevant information as
the department may reasonably require. The report shall be made under oath and
shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the department.
(6) All installment loan licensees shall submit a mortgage report of
condition as required by section 45-726 on or before a date or dates
established by rule, regulation, or order of the director.
(7) Upon written request of a borrower, the licensee shall provide a
written statement of the dates and amounts of payments made and the amounts of
any default and deferment charges assessed preceding the month in which the
request is received and the total amount unpaid as of the end of the period
covered by the statement and a copy of the loan agreement and security
agreement, and a facsimile of any insurance certificate issued as part of the
transaction, if applicable. The licensee may charge a reasonable fee for such
copies, not to exceed fifty cents per page.
(8) A licensee shall answer in writing, within ten business days after
receipt, any written request for payoff information from a borrower or a
borrower's representative. This service shall be provided without charge to the
borrower, except that when such information is provided upon request within
sixty days after the fulfillment of a previous request, a processing fee of up
to ten dollars may be charged for the subsequent request.
(1) No person shall act as a sales finance company in this state without
obtaining a license therefor from the department as provided in the Nebraska
Installment Sales Act whether or not such person maintains an office, place of
doing business, or agent in this state, unless such person meets the
requirements of section 45-340.
(2) No financial institution or installment loan licensee authorized to do
business in this state shall be required to obtain a license under the act but
shall comply with all of the other provisions of the act.
(3) A seller who does not otherwise act as a sales finance company shall
not be required to obtain a license under the act but shall comply with all of
the other provisions of the act in order to charge the time-price differential
allowed by section 45-338.
Sec. 67. Section 45-346, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
45-346 (1) The department shall be charged with the duty of inspecting the
business, records, and accounts of all persons who engage in business
activities requiring a license under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act. The department may examine or investigate complaints about or reports of
alleged violations by a licensee made to the department. The director shall
have the power to appoint examiners who shall, under the director's direction,
investigate the installment sales contracts, installment loans, and business
and examine the books and records of licensees when the director shall so
determine. Such examinations shall be conducted as often as determined by the
director.
(2) The director or the director's duly authorized representative shall
have the power to make such investigations as the director or authorized
representative shall deem necessary, and to the extent necessary for this
purpose, the director or authorized representative may examine a licensee or
any other person and shall have the power to compel the production of all
relevant books, records, accounts, and documents.
(3) The expenses of the director incurred in the examination of the books
and records of licensees shall be charged to the licensees as set forth in
sections 8-605 and 8-606. The director may charge the costs of an investigation
of a nonlicensed person to such person, and such costs shall be paid within
thirty days after receipt of billing.
(4) Upon receipt by a licensee of a notice of investigation or inquiry
request for information from the department, the licensee shall respond within
twenty-one calendar days. Each day a licensee fails to respond as required by
this subsection shall constitute a separate violation.
(5) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has willfully
and intentionally violated any provision of the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act, or any order issued by the director under the
-47-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, the director may order such person to
pay (a) an administrative fine of not more than five thousand dollars for each
separate violation and (b) the costs of investigation. The department shall
remit fines collected under this subsection to the State Treasurer for
distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(6) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, a lien in the
amount of such fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of
such person in this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the
director. The lien shall attach to the real property of such person when notice
of the lien is filed and indexed against the real property in the office of the
register of deeds in the county where the real property is located. The lien
shall attach to any other property of such person when notice of the lien is
filed against the property in the manner prescribed by law. Failure of the
person to pay such fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
(1) A license issued under the Nebraska Installment Sales Act is
nontransferable and nonassignable. The same person may obtain additional
licenses for each place of business operating as a sales finance company in
this state upon compliance with the act as to each license, except that on or
after January 1, 2020, a person is no longer required to obtain a new license
for each place of business and may maintain a branch office or offices upon
compliance with the act.
(2) Application for a license shall be on a form prescribed and furnished
by the director and shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the applicant's
name and any trade name or doing business as designation which the applicant
intends to use in this state, (b) the applicant's main office address, (c) all
branch office addresses at which business is to be conducted, (d) the names and
titles of each director and principal officer of the applicant, (e) the names
of all shareholders, partners, or members of the applicant, (f) a description
of the activities of the applicant in such detail as the department may
require, (g) if the applicant is an individual, his or her social security
number, (h) audited financial statements showing a minimum net worth of one
hundred thousand dollars, and (i) background checks as provided in section
45-354.
(3) An applicant for a license shall file with the department a surety
bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars, furnished by a surety company
authorized to do business in this state. Such bond shall be increased by an
additional fifty thousand dollars for each branch location of the applicant
that is licensed under the Nebraska Installment Sales Act. The bond shall be
for the use of the State of Nebraska and any Nebraska resident who may have
claims or causes of action against the applicant. The surety may cancel the
bond only upon thirty days' written notice to the director.
(4) A license fee of one hundred fifty dollars, and, if applicable, a one-
hundred-dollar fee for each branch office listed in the application, and any
processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 45-354 shall be
submitted along with each application.
(5) An initial license shall remain in full force and effect until the
next succeeding December 31. Each license shall remain in force until revoked,
suspended, canceled, expired, or surrendered.
(6) The director shall, after an application has been filed for a license
under the act, investigate the facts, and if he or she finds that the
experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant, of the members
thereof if the applicant is a corporation or association, and of the officers
and directors thereof if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to warrant
belief that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently
within the purpose of the act, the director shall issue and deliver a license
to the applicant to do business as a sales finance company in accordance with
the license and the act. The director shall have the power to reject for cause
any application for a license.
(7) The director shall, within his or her discretion, make an examination
and inspection concerning the propriety of the issuance of a license to any
applicant. The cost of such examination and inspection shall be borne by the
applicant.
(8) If an applicant for a license under the act does not complete the
license application and fails to respond to a notice or notices from the
department to correct the deficiency or deficiencies for a period of one
hundred twenty days or more after the date the department sends the initial
notice to correct the deficiency or deficiencies, the department may deem the
application as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of the
application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the application.
Sec. 68. Section 45-347, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-347 The payment in money, credit, goods, or things in action, as
consideration for any sale or assignment of, or order for, the payment of
wages, salary, commission, or other compensation for services, whether earned
or to be earned, shall, for purposes of regulation under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act, be deemed a loan secured by such assignment,
and the amount by which the assigned compensation exceeds the amount of the
consideration actually paid, shall, for the purposes of regulation under the
act, be deemed interest or charges upon the loan from the date of payment to
the date the compensation is payable. Such transaction shall be governed by and
-48-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
be subject to the act.
All money collected under the authority of the Nebraska Installment Sales
Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial
Institution Assessment Cash Fund.
Sec. 69. Section 45-348, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-348 Every installment loan licensee shall permit payment to be made in
advance in any amount equal to one or more full installments on any loan
contract at any time during regular business hours, but the licensee may apply
such payment first to all accrued charges in full up to the date of such
payment.
(1) An installment sales license may be renewed annually on or before
December 31 by paying to the director a fee of one hundred fifty dollars, plus
one hundred dollars for each branch office, if applicable, and any processing
fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 45-354 and by submitting such
information as the director may require to indicate any material change in the
information contained in the original application or succeeding renewal
applications, including a copy of the licensee's most recent annual audit.
(2) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license at any time by
delivering to the director written notice of the surrender. The department
shall cancel the license following such surrender.
(3) If a licensee fails to renew its license and does not voluntarily
surrender the license pursuant to this section, the department may issue a
notice of expiration of the license to the licensee in lieu of revocation
proceedings.
Sec. 70. (1) Except as provided in section 45-350 and subsection (6) of
this section, every installment loan licensee may make loans and may contract
for and receive on such loans charges at a rate not exceeding twenty-four
percent per annum on that part of the unpaid principal balance on any loan not
in excess of one thousand dollars, and twenty-one percent per annum on any
remainder of such unpaid principal balance. Except for loans secured by mobile
homes, an installment loan licensee may not make loans for a period in excess
of one hundred forty-five months if the amount of the loan is greater than
three thousand dollars but less than twenty-five thousand dollars. Unless
otherwise allowed for by law, charges on loans made under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act shall not be paid, deducted, or received in
advance. The contracting for, charging of, or receiving of charges as provided
for in subsection (2) of this section shall not be deemed to be the payment,
deduction, or receipt of such charges in advance.
(2) When the loan contract requires repayment in substantially equal and
consecutive monthly installments of principal and charges combined, the
installment loan licensee may, at the time the loan is made, precompute the
charges at the agreed rate on scheduled unpaid principal balances according to
the terms of the contract and add such charges to the principal of the loan.
Every payment may be applied to the combined total of principal and precomputed
charges until the contract is fully paid. All payments made on account of any
loan except for default and deferment charges shall be deemed to be applied to
the unpaid installments in the order in which the unpaid installments are due.
The portion of the precomputed charges applicable to any particular month of
the contract, as originally scheduled or following a deferment, shall be that
proportion of such precomputed charges, excluding any adjustment made for a
first installment period of more than one month and any adjustment made for
deferment, which the balance of the contract scheduled to be outstanding during
such month bears to the sum of all monthly balances originally scheduled to be
outstanding by the contract. This section shall not limit or restrict the
manner of calculating charges, whether by way of add-on, single annual rate, or
otherwise, if the rate of charges does not exceed what is permitted by this
section. Charges may be contracted for and earned at a single annual rate,
except that the total charges from such rate shall not be greater than the
total charges from the several rates otherwise applicable to the different
portions of the unpaid balance according to subsection (1) of this section. All
loan contracts made pursuant to this subsection are subject to the following
adjustments:
(a) Notwithstanding the requirement for substantially equal and
consecutive monthly installments, the first installment period may not exceed
one month by more than twenty-one days and may not fall short of one month by
more than eleven days. The charges for each day exceeding one month shall be
one-thirtieth of the charges which would be applicable to a first installment
period of one month. The charge for extra days in the first installment period
may be added to the first installment and such charges for such extra days
shall be excluded in computing any rebate;
(b) If prepayment in full by cash, a new loan, or otherwise occurs before
the first installment due date, the charges shall be recomputed at the rate of
charges contracted for in accordance with this section upon the actual unpaid
principal balance of the loan for the actual time outstanding by applying the
payment, or payments, first to charges at the agreed rate and the remainder to
the principal. The amount of charges so computed shall be retained in lieu of
all precomputed charges;
(c) If a contract is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, or otherwise
after the first installment due date, the borrower shall receive a rebate of an
amount which is not less than the amount obtained by applying to the unpaid
principal balances as originally scheduled or, if deferred, as deferred, for
the period following prepayment, according to the actuarial method, the rate of
-49-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
charge contracted for in accordance with this section. The licensee may round
the rate of charge to the nearest one-half of one percent if such procedure is
not consistently used to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be
permitted. Any default and deferment charges which are due and unpaid may be
deducted from any rebate. No rebate shall be required for any partial
prepayment. No rebate of less than one dollar need be made. Acceleration of the
maturity of the contract shall not in itself require a rebate. If judgment is
obtained before the final installment date, the contract balance shall be
reduced by the rebate which would be required for prepayment in full as of the
date judgment is obtained;
(d) If any installment on a precomputed or interest-bearing loan is unpaid
in full for ten or more consecutive days, Sundays and holidays included, after
it is due, the licensee may charge and collect a default charge not exceeding
an amount equal to five percent of such installment. If any installment payment
is made by a check, draft, or similar signed order which is not honored because
of insufficient funds, no account, or any other reason except an error of a
third party to the loan contract, the licensee may charge and collect a
fifteen-dollar bad check charge. Such default or bad check charges may be
collected when due or at any time thereafter;
(e) If, as of an installment due date, the payment date of all wholly
unpaid installments is deferred one or more full months and the maturity of the
contract is extended for a corresponding period, the licensee may charge and
collect a deferment charge not exceeding the charge applicable to the first of
the installments deferred, multiplied by the number of months in the deferment
period. The deferment period is that period during which no payment is made or
required by reason of such deferment. The deferment charge may be collected at
the time of deferment or at any time thereafter. The portion of the precomputed
charges applicable to each deferred balance and installment period following
the deferment period shall remain the same as that applicable to such balance
and periods under the original loan contract. No installment on which a default
charge has been collected, or on account of which any partial payment has been
made, shall be deferred or included in the computation of the deferment charge
unless such default charge or partial payment is refunded to the borrower or
credited to the deferment charge. Any payment received at the time of deferment
may be applied first to the deferment charge and the remainder, if any, applied
to the unpaid balance of the contract, except that if such payment is
sufficient to pay, in addition to the appropriate deferment charge, any
installment which is in default and the applicable default charge, it shall be
first so applied and any such installment shall not be deferred or subject to
the deferment charge. If a loan is prepaid in full during the deferment period,
the borrower shall receive, in addition to the required rebate, a rebate of
that portion of the deferment charge applicable to any unexpired full month or
months of such deferment period; and
(f) If two or more full installments are in default for one full month or
more at any installment date and if the contract so provides, the installment
loan licensee may reduce the contract balance by the rebate which would be
required for prepayment in full as of such installment date and the amount
remaining unpaid shall be deemed to be the unpaid principal balance and
thereafter in lieu of charging, collecting, receiving, and applying charges as
provided in this subsection, charges may be charged, collected, received, and
applied at the agreed rate as otherwise provided by this section until the loan
is fully paid.
(3) The charges, as referred to in subsection (1) of this section, shall
not be compounded. The charging, collecting, and receiving of charges as
provided in subsection (2) of this section shall not be deemed compounding. If
part or all of the consideration for a loan contract is the unpaid principal
balance of a prior loan, then the principal amount payable under such loan
contract may include any unpaid charges on the prior loan which have accrued
within sixty days before the making of such loan contract and may include the
balance remaining after giving the rebate required by subsection (2) of this
section. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, charges shall
(a) be computed and paid only as a percentage per month of the unpaid principal
balance or portions thereof and (b) be computed on the basis of the number of
days actually elapsed. For purposes of computing charges, whether at the
maximum rate or less, a month shall be that period of time from any date in a
month to the corresponding date in the next month but if there is no such
corresponding date then to the last day of the next month, and a day shall be
considered one-thirtieth of a month when computation is made for a fraction of
a month.
(4) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, in
addition to that provided for under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act, no further or other amount whatsoever shall be directly or indirectly
charged, contracted for, or received. If any amount, in excess of the charges
permitted, is charged, contracted for, or received, the loan contract shall not
on that account be void, but the installment loan licensee shall have no right
to collect or receive any interest or other charges whatsoever. If such
interest or other charges have been collected or contracted for, the licensee
shall refund to the borrower all interest and other charges collected and shall
not collect any interest or other charges contracted for and thereafter due on
the loan involved, as liquidated damages, and the installment loan licensee or
its assignee, if found liable, shall pay the costs of any action relating
thereto, including reasonable attorney's fees. No installment loan licensee
shall be found liable under this subsection if it shows by a preponderance of
-50-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
the evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona
fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to
avoid any such error.
(5) A borrower may be required to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in
connection with the making, closing, disbursing, extending, readjusting, or
renewing of loans. Such expenses may include abstracting, recording, releasing,
and registration fees; premiums paid for nonfiling insurance; premiums paid on
insurance policies covering tangible personal property securing the loan;
amounts charged for a debt cancellation contract or a debt suspension contract,
as agreed upon by the parties, if the debt cancellation contract or debt
suspension contract is a contract of a financial institution or installment
loan licensee and such contract is sold directly by such financial institution
or licensee or by an unaffiliated, nonexclusive agent of such financial
institution or licensee in accordance with 12 C.F.R. part 37, as such part
existed on January 1, 2025, and the financial institution or installment loan
licensee is responsible for the unaffiliated, nonexclusive agent's compliance
with such part; title examinations; credit reports; survey; taxes or charges
imposed upon or in connection with the making and recording or releasing of any
mortgage; amounts charged for a guaranteed asset protection waiver; and fees
and expenses charged for electronic title and lien services. Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, a borrower may also be required to pay a
nonrefundable loan origination fee not to exceed the lesser of five hundred
dollars or an amount equal to seven percent of that part of the original
principal balance of any loan not in excess of two thousand dollars and five
percent on that part of the original principal balance in excess of two
thousand dollars, if the installment loan licensee has not made another loan to
the borrower within the previous twelve months. If the licensee has made
another loan to the borrower within the previous twelve months, a nonrefundable
loan origination fee may only be charged on new funds advanced on each
successive loan. Such reasonable initial charges may be collected from the
borrower or included in the principal balance of the loan at the time the loan
is made and shall not be considered interest or a charge for the use of the
money loaned.
(6)(a) Loans secured solely by real property that are not made pursuant to
subdivision (11) of section 45-101.04 on real property shall not be subject to
the limitations on the rate of interest provided in subsection (1) of this
section or the limitations on the nonrefundable loan origination fee under
subsection (5) of this section if (i) the principal amount of the loan is seven
thousand five hundred dollars or more and (ii) the sum of the principal amount
of the loan and the balances of all other liens against the property do not
exceed one hundred percent of the appraised value of the property. Acceptable
methods of determining appraised value shall be made by the department pursuant
to rule, regulation, or order.
(b) An origination fee on such loan shall be computed only on the
principal amount of the loan reduced by any portion of the principal that
consists of the amount required to pay off another loan made under this
subsection by the same licensee.
(c) A prepayment penalty on such loan shall be permitted only if (i) the
maximum amount of the penalty to be assessed is stated in writing at the time
the loan is made, (ii) the loan is prepaid in full within two years from the
date of the loan, and (iii) the loan is prepaid with money other than the
proceeds of another loan made by the same licensee. Such prepayment penalty
shall not exceed six months' interest on eighty percent of the original
principal balance computed at the agreed rate of interest on the loan.
(d) An installment loan licensee making a loan pursuant to this subsection
may obtain an interest in any fixtures attached to such real property and any
insurance proceeds payable in connection with such real property or the loan.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, principal amount of the loan means
the total sum owed by the borrower including, but not limited to, insurance
premiums, loan origination fees, or any other amount that is financed, except
that for purposes of subdivision (6)(b) of this section, loan origination fees
shall not be included in calculating the principal amount of the loan.
Sec. 71. Section 45-350, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-350 (1) Installment loan licensees may charge, contract for, or receive
any amount or rate of interest permitted by section 45-101.03 or 45-101.04 or
section 70 of this act upon any loan or upon any part or all of any aggregate
indebtedness of the same person. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the charging, contracting for, or receiving of a rate of interest
permitted by section 45-101.04 does not exempt the licensee from compliance
with the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
(2)(a) Loans made by an installment loan licensee pursuant to subdivision
(4) of section 45-101.04 are not subject to the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act if such loans are not made on real property.
(b) Loans made by an installment loan licensee pursuant to subdivision
(11) of section 45-101.04 on real property are not subject to the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act. An installment loan licensee making such loans
shall comply with and be subject to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act with
respect to such loans, except that the installment loan licensee shall not be
required to obtain a mortgage banker license under the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act.
(c) Any mortgage loan originator who works as an employee or independent
agent of an installment loan licensee shall be required to obtain a mortgage
-51-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
loan originator license and shall be subject to the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act.
(3) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(a) of section 70 of this act, no
installment loan licensee shall enter into any loan contract under the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act under which the borrower agrees to make any
payment of principal more than thirty-six calendar months from the date of
making such contract when the principal balance is not more than three thousand
dollars. Every loan contract precomputed pursuant to subsection (2) of section
70 of this act shall provide for repayment of principal and charges in
installments which shall be payable at approximately equal periodic intervals
of time and so arranged that no installment is substantially greater in amount
than any preceding installment. When necessary in order to facilitate payment
in accordance with the borrower's principal source of income or when the loan
contract is not precomputed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 70 of this
act, the payment schedule may reduce or omit installment payments. Any loan
contract made in violation of this section, either knowingly or without the
exercise of due care to prevent the violation, shall not on that account be
void, but the licensee has no right to collect or receive any interest or
charges on such loan. If any interest or other charges have been collected or
contracted for, the installment loan licensee shall refund to the borrower all
interest and other charges collected and shall not collect thereafter any
interest or other charges contracted for and thereafter due on the loan
involved, as liquidated damages, and the installment loan licensee or its
assignee, if found liable, shall pay the costs of any action relating thereto,
including reasonable attorney's fees. No installment loan licensee shall be
found liable under this subsection if it shows by a preponderance of the
evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide
error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid
any such error.
(1) Renewal of a license originally granted under the Nebraska Installment
Sales Act may be denied or a license may be suspended or revoked by the
director on the following grounds: (a) Material misstatement in the application
for license; (b) willful failure to comply with any provision of the Nebraska
Installment Sales Act relating to installment contracts; (c) defrauding any
buyer to the buyer's damage; or (d) fraudulent misrepresentation,
circumvention, or concealment by the licensee through whatever subterfuge or
device of any of the material particulars or the nature thereof required to be
stated or furnished to the buyer under the Nebraska Installment Sales Act.
(2) If a licensee is a partnership, limited liability company,
association, or corporation, it shall be sufficient cause for the suspension or
revocation of a license that any officer, director, or trustee of a licensed
association or corporation or any member of a licensed partnership or limited
liability company has so acted or failed to act as would be cause for
suspending or revoking a license to such party as an individual.
(3) No license shall be denied, suspended, or revoked except after hearing
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The director shall give
the licensee at least ten days' written notice, in the form of an order to show
cause, of the time and place of such hearing by either registered or certified
mail addressed to the principal place of business in this state of such
licensee. Such notice shall contain the grounds of complaint against the
licensee. Any order suspending or revoking such license shall recite the
grounds upon which the same is based. The order shall be entered upon the
records of the director and shall not be effective until after thirty days'
written notice thereof given after such entry forwarded by either registered or
certified mail to the licensee at such principal place of business.
(4) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender of any
license shall not impair or affect the obligation of any lawful installment
contract acquired previously thereto by the licensee.
(5) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender of any
license shall not affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before
the revocation, suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender or affect
liability for any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of its
officers, directors, shareholders, partners, or members pursuant to the
Nebraska Installment Sales Act for acts committed before the revocation,
suspension, cancellation, expiration, or surrender.
(6) Any person, licensee, or applicant considering himself or herself
aggrieved by an order of the director entered under the provisions of this
section may appeal the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 72. Section 45-351, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-351 (1) Except as otherwise provided by the Nebraska Installment Loan
and Sales Act or other law, an installment loan licensee shall not contact any
individual who is not living, residing, or present in the household of the
borrower regarding the borrower's obligation to pay a debt, other than the
borrower's spouse, the borrower's attorney, another creditor, or a credit
reporting agency.
(2) The borrower may waive the benefits of this section at any time by
giving consent if such consent is given at a time subsequent to the date the
debt arises.
(1) The department shall be charged with the duty of inspecting the
business, records, and accounts of all persons who engage in the business of a
sales finance company subject to the Nebraska Installment Sales Act. The
-52-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
director shall have the power to appoint examiners who shall, under his or her
direction, investigate the installment contracts and business and examine the
books and records of licensees when the director shall so determine. Such
examinations shall not be conducted more often than annually except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The director or his or her duly authorized representative shall have
the power to make such investigations as he or she shall deem necessary, and to
the extent necessary for this purpose, he or she may examine such licensee or
any other person and shall have the power to compel the production of all
relevant books, records, accounts, and documents.
(3) The expenses of the director incurred in the examination of the books
and records of licensees shall be charged to the licensees as set forth in
sections 8-605 and 8-606. The director may charge the costs of an investigation
of a nonlicensed person to such person, and such costs shall be paid within
thirty days after receipt of billing.
(4) Upon receipt by a licensee of a notice of investigation or inquiry
request for information from the department, the licensee shall respond within
twenty-one calendar days. Each day a licensee fails to respond as required by
this subsection shall constitute a separate violation.
(5) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has willfully
and intentionally violated any provision of the Nebraska Installment Sales Act,
any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act, or any order
issued by the director under the act, the director may order such person to pay
(a) an administrative fine of not more than one thousand dollars for each
separate violation and (b) the costs of investigation. The department shall
remit fines collected under this subsection to the State Treasurer for
distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(6) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, a lien in the
amount of such fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of
such person in this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the
director. The lien shall attach to the real property of such person when notice
of the lien is filed and indexed against the real property in the office of the
register of deeds in the county where the real property is located. The lien
shall attach to any other property of such person when notice of the lien is
filed against the property in the manner prescribed by law. Failure of the
person to pay such fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the
Nebraska Installment Sales Act.
Sec. 73. Section 45-352, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-352 (1) Section 45-351 shall not prohibit the licensee from:
(a) Contacting any person in order to discover property belonging to the
borrower that may be seized to satisfy a debt that has been reduced to
judgment;
(b) Making amicable demand and filing suit on the debt; or
(c) Contacting persons related to the borrower if permission is
specifically given in writing at the time the debt arises or at any time after
such debt arises.
(2) An installment loan licensee may contact any person without the
borrower's consent:
(a) To ascertain information relating to a borrower's credit worthiness,
credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics, or mode of living which is used or expected to be used or
collected in whole or in part for the purpose of serving as a factor in
establishing the borrower's eligibility for credit or insurance if such
contacts are not designed to collect a delinquent debt; or
(b) To locate the borrower when the licensee has reason to believe the
borrower has changed his or her employment or has moved from his or her last-
known address.
The director shall have the power to make such general rules and
regulations and specific rulings, demands, and findings as may be necessary for
the proper conduct of the business licensed under the Nebraska Installment
Sales Act, and the enforcement of the act, in addition thereto and not
inconsistent therewith.
Sec. 74. Section 45-353, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-353 (1) An agreement of the parties to a loan, with respect to default
on the part of the borrower, is enforceable only to the extent that:
(a) The borrower fails to make a payment on the loan or other charges
required by the agreement; or
(b) The prospect of payment, performance, or realization of collateral is
significantly impaired. The burden of establishing the prospect of significant
impairment is on the installment loan licensee.
(2) If the borrower has defaulted on his or her promise to pay and if he
or she has given specific notice in writing, by registered or certified mail,
instructing the licensee to cease further contacts with the borrower in regard
to the indebtedness, the installment loan licensee shall, after such notice,
except as provided in section 45-352, limit contacts to one notice per month by
mail. No notice shall be designed to threaten action not otherwise permitted by
law.
(3) With respect to a loan, after a borrower has been in default for ten
-53-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
days for failure to make a required payment, an installment loan licensee may
give the borrower the notice described in this section. An installment loan
licensee gives notice to the borrower under this section when it delivers the
notice to the borrower or delivers or mails the notice to the last-known
address of the borrower's residence.
(4) The notice shall be in writing and shall conspicuously state:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the installment loan
licensee to which payment is to be made;
(b) A brief identification of the loan;
(c) The borrower's right to cure the default;
(d) The amount of payment and date by which payment must be made to cure
the default; and
(e) That any credit insurance issued in connection with the loan contract
may be canceled unless the borrower cures the default.
(5) With respect to a loan, after a default consisting only of the
borrower's failure to make a required payment, an installment loan licensee may
neither accelerate maturity of the unpaid balance of the obligation nor take
possession of collateral, except voluntarily surrendered collateral, because of
such default until twenty days after a notice of the borrower's right to cure
is given. The borrower shall have twenty days after the notice is given to cure
any default consisting of a failure to make the required payment by tendering
the amount of all unpaid sums due at the time of the tender, without
acceleration, plus any unpaid charges. Cure restores the borrower to his or her
rights under the agreement as though the default had not occurred.
(6) With respect to defaults on the same obligation after an installment
loan licensee has once given a notice of the borrower's right to cure, the
borrower shall have no further right to cure and the installment loan licensee
has no obligation to proceed against the borrower or the collateral.
(7) Upon default by a borrower with respect to a loan, unless the borrower
voluntarily surrenders possession of the collateral to the licensee, the
licensee may take possession of the collateral without judicial process only if
possession can be taken without entry into a dwelling or a locked, unoccupied
motor vehicle, and without the use of force or other breach of the peace.
(1) Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any person
is violating or is threatening to or intends to violate any of the provisions
of the Nebraska Installment Sales Act, he or she may, in addition to all
actions provided for in the act and without prejudice thereto, enter an order
requiring such person to desist or to refrain from such violation. An action
may also be brought, on the relation of the Attorney General or the director,
to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or from
doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof.
(2) In any such action an order or judgment may be entered awarding such
preliminary or final injunction as may be deemed proper. In addition to all
other means provided by law for the enforcement of a restraining order or
injunction, the court, in which such action is brought, shall have power and
jurisdiction to impound and appoint a receiver for the property and business of
the defendant, including books, papers, documents, and records pertaining
thereto or so much thereof as the court may deem reasonably necessary to
prevent violations of the Nebraska Installment Sales Act through or by means of
the use of such property and business. Such receiver, when so appointed and
qualified, shall have such powers and duties as to custody, collection,
administration, winding up and liquidation of such property and business as
shall, from time to time, be conferred upon him or her by the court.
Sec. 75. Section 45-354, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
45-354 (1) A borrower is not liable for a deficiency unless the licensee
has disposed of the collateral in good faith and in a commercially reasonable
manner.
(2) If the installment loan licensee takes possession or voluntarily
accepts surrender of goods in which the licensee has a security interest to
secure a loan and at the time thereof the unpaid balance due on the loan is
three thousand dollars or less, the borrower is not personally liable to the
installment loan licensee for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the
loan and the licensee's duty to dispose of the collateral is governed by the
provisions on disposition of collateral, article 9, Uniform Commercial Code.
(3) The borrower may be liable in damages to the installment loan licensee
if the borrower has wrongfully damaged the collateral or if, after default,
failure to cure, and demand, the borrower has wrongfully failed to make the
collateral available to the installment loan licensee.
(4) If the installment loan licensee elects to bring an action against the
borrower for a debt arising from a loan, when under this section the
installment loan licensee would not be entitled to a deficiency judgment if the
installment loan licensee took possession of the collateral, and obtains
judgment, (a) the installment loan licensee may not take possession of the
collateral and (b) the collateral is not subject to levy or sale on execution
or similar proceedings pursuant to the judgment.
(1) Effective January 1, 2013, or within one hundred eighty days after the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry is capable of accepting
licenses issued under the Nebraska Installment Sales Act, whichever is later,
the department shall require such licensees under the act to be licensed and
registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In
order to carry out this requirement, the department is authorized to
participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this
-54-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
purpose, the department may establish, by adopting and promulgating rules and
regulations or by order, requirements as necessary. The requirements may
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Background checks of applicants and licensees, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Fingerprints of every executive officer, director, partner, member,
sole proprietor, or shareholder submitted to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and any other governmental agency or entity authorized to receive
such information for a state, national, and international criminal history
record information check;
(ii) Civil or administrative records;
(iii) Credit history; or
(iv) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry;
(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew a license through the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(c) Compliance with prelicensure education and testing and continuing
education;
(d) The setting or resetting, as necessary, of renewal processing or
reporting dates; and
(e) Amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the
director deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the Nebraska Installment Sales
Act, the department is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities
designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect
and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to
licensees or other persons subject to the act. The department may allow such
system to collect licensing fees on behalf of the department and allow such
system to collect a processing fee for the services of the system directly from
each licensee or applicant for a license.
(3) The director is required to regularly report enforcement actions and
other relevant information to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry subject to the provisions contained in section 45-355.
(4) The director shall establish a process whereby applicants and
licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry by the director.
(5) The department shall ensure that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry adopts a privacy, data security, and breach of security of
the system notification policy. The director shall make available upon written
request a copy of the contract between the department and the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry pertaining to the breach of security of
the system provisions.
(6) The department shall upon written request provide the most recently
available audited financial report of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry.
(7) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing
information to the United States Department of Justice or any other
governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal
Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section.
Sec. 76. Section 45-355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-355 (1) No individual, other than the spouse of the borrower, is
obligated as a cosigner, comaker, guarantor, endorser, surety, or similar party
with respect to a loan unless, before or contemporaneously with signing any
separate agreement of loan or any writing setting forth the terms of the
borrower's agreement, the individual receives a separate written notice that
contains a completed identification of the loan the individual may have to pay
and reasonably informs the individual of the obligation with respect to it.
(2) Such notice shall be in the form prescribed by the department.
(3) An individual entitled to notice under this section shall also be
given a copy of any writing setting forth the terms of the borrower's agreement
and of any separate agreement of obligation signed by the individual entitled
to the notice.
(1) In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce the
regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the requirements under
any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any
information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including
the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or
material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the
information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all
federal and state regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight
authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality
protections provided by federal or state law;
(b) Information or material that is subject to privilege or
confidentiality under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall not be subject
to:
-55-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(i) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to
the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal
government or the respective state; or
(ii) Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private civil
action or administrative process unless, with respect to any privilege held by
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to such
information or material, the person to whom such information or material
pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that
privilege;
(c) Any state statute relating to the disclosure of confidential
supervisory information or any information or material described in subdivision
(a) of this subsection that is inconsistent with such subdivision shall be
superseded by the requirements of this section; and
(d) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or
material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated
disciplinary and enforcement actions against, applicants and licensees that is
included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by
the public.
(2) For these purposes, the director is authorized to enter into
agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential
Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing governmental agencies
as established by adopting and promulgating rules and regulations or an order
of the director.
Sec. 77. Section 45-356, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-356 (1) No licensee shall receive any security agreement or assignment
of salary or wages signed in blank. All blank spaces shall be filled in with
ink or typewritten or printed with the proper names and amounts showing the
name of the person by whom the individual making the conveyance or assignment
is employed. No assignment or order for wages is valid if it contains an amount
in excess of the sum borrowed together with the interest and charges as
provided in the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
(2) No assignment of or order for wages to secure a loan or advancement is
valid when made by a married man or woman unless the written consent of the
wife or husband to the making of such loan is attached thereto.
(3) No licensee shall take a power of attorney, or any instrument signed
by an attorney in fact and not personally, or any instrument signed in which
blanks are left to be filled after execution.
(1) No person acting personally or as an agent shall acquire control of
any licensee under the Nebraska Installment Sales Act without first (a) giving
thirty days' notice to the department on a form prescribed by the department of
such proposed acquisition and (b) paying a filing fee of one hundred fifty
dollars and any processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 45-354.
(2) The director, upon receipt of such notice, shall act upon the
acquisition within thirty days, and unless he or she disapproves of the
proposed acquisition within such period of time, the acquisition shall become
effective on the thirty-first day after receipt without the director's
approval, except that the director may extend the thirty-day period an
additional thirty days if, in his or her judgment, any material information
submitted is substantially inaccurate or the acquiring party has not furnished
all the information required by the department.
(3) An acquisition may become effective prior to the expiration of the
disapproval period if the director issues written notice of his or her intent
not to disapprove the action.
(4)(a) The director may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:
(i) The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might
jeopardize the financial stability of the acquired licensee;
(ii) The character and general fitness of any acquiring person or of any
of the proposed management personnel indicate that the acquired installment
sales licensee would not be operated honestly, fairly, or efficiently within
the purpose of the Nebraska Installment Sales Act; or
(iii) Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish all
information required by the department.
(b) The director shall notify the acquiring party in writing of
disapproval of the acquisition. The notice shall provide a statement of the
basis for the disapproval.
(c) Within fifteen business days after receipt of written notice of
disapproval, the acquiring party may make a written request for a hearing on
the proposed acquisition in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department under the
Administrative Procedure Act. The director shall, by order, approve or
disapprove the proposed acquisition on the basis of the record made at the
hearing.
Sec. 78. Within thirty days after repayment of the loan in full, the
licensee shall mark plainly every obligation or copy of the obligation and
security or copy of the security signed by any obligor with the word Paid or
Canceled and shall release any mortgage, trust deed, or lien, restore any
pledge, and cancel and return any note or copy of the note and any assignment
or copy of the assignment given to the licensee. For purposes of this section,
a copy shall meet the requirements of section 25-12,112.
Sec. 79. Nothing in sections 45-351 and 45-353 shall limit a borrower's
right to bring an action for damages. When the licensee has filed suit and
-56-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
obtained judgment, the licensee shall be permitted to resume contacts with the
borrower against whom judgment has been obtained.
Sec. 80. (1) The following types of insurance or one or more of the
following types of insurance may be written in connection with loans made by
installment loan licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act:
(a) Fire, theft, windstorm, or comprehensive, including fire, theft, and
windstorm, fifty dollars or more deductible collision, and bodily injury
liability and property damage liability upon motor vehicles;
(b) Fire and extended-coverage insurance upon real property;
(c) Fire and extended-coverage insurance upon tangible personal property,
limited to the principal amount of the loan;
(d) Involuntary unemployment or job protection insurance. In the event of
a renewal of a loan contract, this type of insurance shall be canceled and a
refund of the unearned premium credited or made before new insurance of this
type may be rewritten. Such insurance shall not be required as a condition
precedent to the making of such loan; and
(e) Life, health, and accident insurance or any of them, except that the
amount of such insurance shall not exceed the total amount to be repaid under
the loan contract and the term shall not extend beyond the final maturity date
of the loan contract. In the event of a renewal of a loan contract, this type
of insurance shall be canceled and a refund of the unearned premium credited or
made before new insurance of this type may be written in connection with such
loan. Such insurance shall not be required as a condition precedent to the
making of such loan.
(2) In addition to the types of insurance written under subsection (1) of
this section by licensees under the act, any other type of insurance or motor
club service as defined in section 44-3707 may be provided for the benefit of a
licensee's borrower or the borrower's immediate family whether or not in
connection with a loan, except that such insurance or motor club service shall
not be required as a condition precedent to the making of any loan. Nothing in
this subsection alters or eliminates any insurance licensing requirements or
certificate of authority requirements under the Motor Club Services Act.
(3) Notwithstanding section 70 of this act and section 45-350, any gain or
advantage, in the form of commission or otherwise, to the licensee or to any
employee, affiliate, or associate of the licensee from such insurance or motor
club service or the sale thereof shall not be deemed to be an additional or
further charge in connection with the loan contract. The insurance premium or
motor club service contract fee may be collected from the borrower or financed
through the loan contract at the time the loan is made.
(4)(a) Insurance permitted under this section shall be obtained through a
duly licensed insurance agent, agency, or broker. Premiums shall not exceed
those fixed by law or current applicable manual rates. Insurance written, as
authorized by this section, may contain a mortgage clause or other appropriate
provision to protect the insurable interest of the licensee.
(b) Motor club services permitted under this section shall be obtained
through a motor club which holds a certificate of authority under the Motor
Club Services Act.
(5) In the event of a renewal of a loan contract, any insurance or motor
club service sold pursuant to this section shall be canceled and (a) a refund
of the unearned premium or motor club service contract fee credited or made
before new insurance or motor club service of the same type as that being
canceled may be rewritten or (b) the holder of the loan contract shall send
notice to the buyer within fifteen business days after cancellation of the
name, address, and telephone number of the insurance company or motor club
which issued the insurance contract or motor club service contract or the party
responsible for any refund and notice that the buyer may be eligible for a
refund. A copy of such notice shall be retained by the holder of the loan
contract.
(6) If any insurance or motor club service sold pursuant to this section
is canceled or the premium or motor club service contract fee adjusted during
the term of the loan contract, any refund of the insurance premium or motor
club service contract fee plus the unearned interest thereon received by the
holder shall be credited by the holder to the loan contract or otherwise
refunded, except to the extent applied toward payment for similar insurance or
motor club service protecting the interests of the buyer and the holder or
either of them.
(7) If any insurance or motor club service sold pursuant to this section
is canceled due to the payment of all sums for which the buyer is liable under
a loan contract, the holder of the loan contract shall, upon receipt of payment
of all sums due, send notice to the buyer within fifteen business days after
payment of the sums due of the name, address, and telephone number of the
insurance company or motor club which issued the insurance contract or motor
club service contract or the party responsible for any refund and notice that
the buyer may be eligible for a refund. A copy of such notice shall be retained
by the holder of the loan contract. This subsection does not apply if the
holder of the loan contract previously credited the refund of the insurance
premium or motor club service contract fee to the loan contract or otherwise
refunded the insurance premium or motor club service contract fee to the buyer.
(8) The licensee shall, at the time the loan is made, give to the
borrower, or if more than one, to one of them, a statement concerning any
insurance procured by or through the licensee, which includes the amount of any
premium which the borrower has paid or is obligated to pay, the expiration date
of the policy, and a concise description of the risks insured. If a borrower
-57-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
procures insurance by or through a licensee, the licensee shall deliver to the
borrower within fifteen days after the making of the loan an executed copy of
the insurance policy or certificate of insurance.
Sec. 81. (1) Licensees holding an active installment loan license may
make preauthorized loans. Preauthorized loan means a loan made by a licensee
pursuant to an agreement between the licensee and the borrower whereby:
(a) The licensee may permit the borrower to obtain advances of money from
the licensee from time to time or the licensee may advance money on behalf of
the borrower from time to time as directed by the borrower;
(b) The amount of each advance and permitted charge and cost is debited to
the borrower's account and payments and other credits are credited to the same
account;
(c) The charges are computed on the unpaid principal balance or balances
of the account from time to time;
(d) The borrower has the privilege of paying the account in full at any
time or, if the account is not in default, in monthly installments or fixed or
determinable amounts as provided in the agreement; and
(e) The loan agreement expressly states that it covers preauthorized
loans. Preauthorized loan does not mean a transaction, resulting in either a
credit or a debit to the borrower's account, which is initiated by the use or
application of a plastic, metal, or other type of credit or transaction card.
(2) For purposes of computations relating to preauthorized loans made
pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, billing cycle means
the time interval between periodic billing dates. A billing cycle shall be
considered monthly if the closing date of the cycle is the same date each month
or does not vary by more than four days from such date.
Sec. 82. (1) A licensee may make preauthorized loans and may contract for
and receive charges on such loans as set forth in subsection (1) of section 70
of this act, subject to the following requirements:
(a) A licensee shall not compound charges by adding any unpaid charges
authorized by section 70 of this act or this section to the unpaid principal
balance of the borrower's account, except that the unpaid principal balance may
include additional charges for credit life insurance or credit disability
insurance provided in connection with the preauthorized loan, subject to the
requirements and restrictions contained in section 83 of this act;
(b) Charges authorized by section 70 of this act or this section shall be
deemed not to exceed the maximum charges permitted by such sections if such
charges are computed in each billing cycle by any of the following methods:
(i) By converting each graduated monthly rate to a daily rate and
multiplying such daily rate by the applicable portion of the daily unpaid
principal balance of the account, in which case each daily rate is determined
by multiplying the authorized monthly rate by twelve and dividing by three
hundred sixty-five;
(ii) By multiplying each graduated monthly rate by the applicable portion
of the average daily unpaid principal balance of the account in the billing
cycle, in which case the average daily unpaid principal balance is the sum of
the amount unpaid each day during the cycle divided by the number of days in
the cycle; or
(iii) By converting each graduated monthly rate to a daily rate and
multiplying such daily rate by the applicable portion of the average daily
unpaid principal balance of the account in the billing cycle, in which case
each daily rate is determined by multiplying the authorized monthly rate by
twelve and dividing by three hundred sixty-five, and the average daily unpaid
principal balance is the sum of the amount unpaid each day during the cycle
divided by the number of days in the cycle; and
(c) For each method of computation set forth in this section, the billing
cycle shall be monthly and the unpaid principal balance on any day shall be
determined by adding to any balance unpaid as of the beginning of that day all
advances and other permissible amounts charged to the borrower and deducting
all payments and other credits made or received that day.
(2) The borrower under a preauthorized loan may at any time pay all or any
part of the unpaid balance in his or her account, or, if the account is not in
default, the borrower may pay the unpaid principal balance in monthly
installments. Minimum monthly payment requirements shall be determined by the
licensee and set forth in the preauthorized loan agreement, except that the
minimum monthly payment shall not be less than one and one-half percent of the
average daily unpaid principal balance of an account having an average daily
balance of more than three thousand dollars nor less than two percent of the
average daily unpaid principal balance of an account having an average daily
balance of three thousand dollars or less.
(3) A licensee may retain any security interest, including a mortgage on
real property, until the preauthorized account is terminated.
(4) Subsection (4) of section 45-345, subsection (3) of section 45-350,
and section 78 of this act shall not apply to preauthorized loans.
(5) The department may approve record-keeping systems for licensees and
may prescribe policies and procedures necessary to the administration of
preauthorized loans made pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales
Act.
Sec. 83. In addition to the charges permitted under section 82 of this
act, a licensee may contract for and receive the fees, costs, and expenses
permitted by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act on other loans,
subject to all the conditions and restrictions set forth in the act with the
following variations:
-58-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(1) If credit life or disability insurance is provided and if the insured
dies or becomes disabled when there is an outstanding preauthorized loan
indebtedness, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay the total balance of the
loan due on the date of the borrower's death or the amount due as of the end of
the previous billing cycle, whichever is less, in the case of credit life
insurance, or all minimum payments which become due on the loan during the
covered period of disability in the case of credit disability insurance. The
additional charge for credit life insurance or credit disability insurance
shall be calculated in each billing cycle by applying the current monthly
premium rate for such insurance, as such rate may be determined by the Director
of Insurance, to the unpaid balances in the borrower's account, using either of
the methods specified in section 82 of this act for the calculation of loan
charges;
(2) No credit life or disability insurance written in connection with a
preauthorized loan shall be canceled by the licensee because of delinquency of
the borrower in the making of the required minimum payments on the loan unless
one or more of such payments is past due for a period of ninety days or more,
and the licensee shall advance to the insurer the amounts required to keep the
insurance in force during such period, which amounts may be debited to the
borrower's account;
(3) The department may, by rule and regulation or order, require a
statement of insurance that will be appropriate for preauthorized loans in lieu
of that required by section 80 of this act; and
(4) The amount, terms, and conditions of any insurance against loss or
damage to property must be reasonable in relation to the character and value of
the property insured and the maximum anticipated amount of credit to be
extended.
Sec. 84. (1) For purposes of this section, reverse-mortgage loan means a
loan made by a licensee which (a) is secured by residential real estate, (b) is
nonrecourse to the borrower except in the event of fraud by the borrower or
waste to the residential real estate given as security for the loan, (c)
provides cash advances to the borrower based upon the equity in the borrower's
owner-occupied principal residence, (d) requires no payment of principal or
interest until the entire loan becomes due and payable, and (e) otherwise
complies with the terms of this section.
(2) Reverse-mortgage loans shall be governed by the following rules
without regard to the requirements set out elsewhere for other types of
mortgage transactions: (a) Payment in whole or in part is permitted without
penalty at any time during the period of the loan; (b) an advance and interest
on the advance have priority over a lien filed after the closing of a reverse-
mortgage loan; (c) an interest rate may be fixed or adjustable and may also
provide for interest that is contingent on appreciation in the value of the
residential real estate; and (d) the advance shall not be reduced in amount or
number based on an adjustment in the interest rate when a reverse-mortgage loan
provides for periodic advances to a borrower.
(3) Reverse-mortgage loans may be made or acquired without regard to the
following provisions for other types of mortgage transactions: (a) Limitations
on the purpose and use of future advances or any other mortgage proceeds; (b)
limitations on future advances to a term of years or limitations on the term of
credit line advances; (c) limitations on the term during which future advances
take priority over intervening advances; (d) requirements that a maximum
mortgage amount be stated in the mortgage; (e) limitations on loan-to-value
ratios; (f) prohibitions on balloon payments; (g) prohibitions on compounded
interest and interest on interest; and (h) requirements that a percentage of
the loan proceeds must be advanced prior to loan assignment.
(4) A licensee may, in connection with a reverse-mortgage loan, charge to
the borrower (a) a nonrefundable loan origination fee which does not exceed two
percent of the appraised value of the owner-occupied principal residence at the
time the loan is made, (b) a reasonable fee paid to third parties originating
loans on behalf of the licensee, and (c) such other fees as are necessary and
required, including fees for inspections, insurance, appraisals, and surveys.
(5) Licensees failing to make loan advances as required in the loan
documents and failing to cure the default as required in the loan documents
shall forfeit an amount equal to the greater of two hundred dollars or one
percent of the amount of the loan advance the licensee failed to make.
Sec. 85. (1) Each retail installment sales contract shall be in writing,
shall be signed by both the buyer and the seller, and shall contain the
following items, and a copy thereof shall be delivered to the buyer at the time
the instrument is signed, except for contracts made in conformance with
subdivision (5)(c) of section 45-336:
(a) The cash sale price;
(b) The amount of the buyer's downpayment, and whether made in money or
goods, or partly in money and partly in goods, including a brief description of
any goods traded in;
(c) The difference between subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection;
(d) The amount included for insurance if a separate charge is made
therefor, specifying the types of coverages;
(e) The amount included for a debt cancellation contract or a debt
suspension contract if the debt cancellation contract or debt suspension
contract is a contract of a financial institution or licensee, such contract is
sold directly by such financial institution or licensee or by an unaffiliated,
nonexclusive agent of such financial institution or licensee in accordance with
12 C.F.R. part 37, as such part existed on January 1, 2025, and the financial
-59-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
institution or licensee is responsible for the unaffiliated, nonexclusive
agent's compliance with such part, and a separate charge is made therefor;
(f) The amount included for electronic title and lien services other than
fees and charges prescribed by law which actually are or will be paid to public
officials for determining the existence of or for perfecting, releasing, or
satisfying any security related to the credit transaction;
(g) The basic time price, which is the sum of subdivisions (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection;
(h) The time-price differential;
(i) The amount of the time-price balance, which is the sum of subdivisions
(g) and (h) of this subsection, payable in installments by the buyer to the
seller;
(j) The number, amount, and due date or period of each installment;
(k) The time-sales price; and
(l) The amount included for a guaranteed asset protection waiver.
(2) The contract shall contain substantially the following notice: NOTICE
TO THE BUYER. DO NOT SIGN THIS CONTRACT BEFORE YOU READ IT OR IF IT CONTAINS
BLANK SPACES. YOU ARE ENTITLED TO A COPY OF THE CONTRACT YOU SIGN.
(3) The items listed in subsection (1) of this section need not be stated
in the sequence or order set forth in such subsection. Additional items may be
included to explain the computations made in determining the amount to be paid
by the buyer. No installment sales contract shall be signed by the buyer or
proffered by the seller when it contains blank spaces to be filled in after
execution, except that if delivery of the goods or services is not made at the
time of the execution of the contract, the identifying numbers or marks of the
goods, or similar information, and the due date of the first installment may be
inserted in the contract after its execution.
(4) If a seller proffers an installment sales contract as part of a
transaction which delays or cancels, or promises to delay or cancel, the
payment of the time-price differential on the contract if the buyer pays the
basic time price, cash price, or cash sale price within a certain period of
time, the seller shall, in clear and conspicuous writing, either within the
installment sales contract or in a separate document, inform the buyer of the
exact date by which the buyer must pay the basic time price, cash price, or
cash sale price in order to delay or cancel the payment of the time-price
differential. The seller or any subsequent purchaser of the installment sales
contract, including a sales finance company, shall not be allowed to change
such date.
(5) Upon written request from the buyer, the holder of an installment
sales contract shall give or forward to the buyer a written statement of the
dates and amounts of payments and the total amount unpaid under such contract.
A buyer shall be given a written receipt for any payment when made in cash.
(6) After payment of all sums for which the buyer is obligated under a
contract, the holder shall deliver or mail to the buyer at his or her last-
known address one or more good and sufficient instruments or copies thereof to
acknowledge payment in full and shall release all security in the goods and
mark canceled and return to the buyer the original agreement or copy thereof or
instruments or copies thereof signed by the buyer. For purposes of this
section, a copy shall meet the requirements of section 25-12,112.
Sec. 86. (1)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the
time-price differential for any goods or services sold under an installment
sales contract shall be stated as a fixed or variable annual percentage rate
and shall be at a rate agreed to in writing, not to exceed eighteen percent per
annum, except that a minimum time-price differential of ten dollars may be
charged on any installment sales contract.
(b) Origination fees may be required to be made by the buyer, subject to
the following requirements:
(i) A buyer may be required, upon the execution of the installment sales
contract, to pay an origination fee in an amount not to exceed ten dollars,
except that if the installment sales contract is for an installment sale of
agricultural machinery or equipment for use in commercial agriculture or if the
installment sales contract is for an installment sale of industrial machinery
or equipment, the buyer may be required to pay (A) an origination fee of not to
exceed one hundred dollars if the cash sale price is less than twenty-five
thousand dollars or (B) an origination fee of not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars if the cash sale price is twenty-five thousand dollars or more; and
(ii) The origination fee shall be refundable if the installment sales
contract is canceled during the first thirty days. The origination fee may be
collected from the buyer or included in the principal balance of the
installment sales contract at the time the contract is made and shall not be
considered interest or a time-price differential.
(c) Nothing in the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act prohibits a
seller or holder of an installment sales contract from contracting for,
computing, and charging a time-price differential based upon the application of
the rate charged to the unpaid principal balance for the number of days
actually elapsed. The charges so computed shall be used for the purpose of
calculating the time-price differential, the time-price balance, the amount of
each installment, and the time-sale price.
(d) When the installment sales contract is payable in substantially equal
and consecutive monthly installments, the time-price differential shall be
computed on the basic time price of each contract, as determined under section
85 of this act, from the date of the contract until the due date of the final
installment, notwithstanding that the time-price balance is required to be paid
-60-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
in installments.
(2) When an installment sales contract provides for payment other than in
substantially equal and consecutive monthly installments, the time-price
differential may be at a rate which will provide the same return as is
permitted on substantially equal monthly payment contracts under subdivision
(1)(d) of this section, having due regard for the schedule of payments.
(3) Every contract payable in two or more installments shall provide for
payment of such installments by stating the date and amount of each installment
or the method by which any variable rate or installment shall be determined.
Sec. 87. (1) The amount, if any, included for insurance, which may be
purchased by the holder of the contract, shall not exceed the applicable
premium rates chargeable in accordance with filings, if any, with the
Department of Insurance. If dual interest insurance on the goods is purchased
by the holder, it shall, within thirty days after execution of the installment
sales contract, send or cause to be sent to the buyer a policy or policies or
certificate of insurance, written by an insurance company authorized to do
business in this state, clearly setting forth the amount of the premium, the
kind or kinds of insurance, the coverages, and all the terms and conditions of
the contract or contracts of insurance.
(2) If any insurance is canceled or the premium adjusted during the term
of the installment sales contract, any refund of the insurance premium plus the
unearned time-price differential thereon received by the holder shall be
credited by the holder to the last maturing installment of the contract except
to the extent applied toward payment for similar insurance protecting the
interests of the buyer and the holder or either of them.
(3) If any insurance is canceled due to the payment of all sums for which
the buyer is liable under an installment sales contract, the holder of the
installment sales contract shall, upon receipt of payment of all sums due, send
notice to the buyer within fifteen business days of the name, address, and
telephone number of the insurance company which issued the insurance contract
or the party responsible for any refund, and notice that the buyer may be
eligible for a refund. A copy of such notice shall be retained by the holder of
the installment sales contract. This subsection does not apply if the holder of
the loan contract previously credited the refund of the insurance premium to
the loan contract or otherwise refunded the insurance premium to the buyer.
(4) The holder may also purchase nonfiling insurance and charge a
reasonable fee. The fee shall not exceed the amount of fees and charges
prescribed by law which would have been paid to public officials for filing,
perfecting, releasing, and satisfying any lien or security interest in the
goods or services.
Sec. 88. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the
contrary, any buyer may prepay in full at any time before maturity the
obligation of any contract.
(2) If such obligation is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, or
otherwise after the first installment due date, the borrower shall receive a
rebate of an amount which shall be not less than the amount obtained by
applying to the unpaid principal balances as originally scheduled or, if
deferred, as deferred, for the period following prepayment, according to the
actuarial method, the rate of the time-price differential previously stated to
the borrower. The licensee may round the rate of the time-price differential to
the nearest one-half of one percent if such procedure is not consistently used
to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted. Any default and
deferment charges which are due and unpaid may be deducted from any rebate. No
rebate shall be required for any partial prepayment. No rebate of less than one
dollar need be made. Acceleration of the maturity of the contract shall not in
itself require a rebate. If judgment is obtained before the final installment
date, the contract balance shall be reduced by the rebate which would be
required for prepayment in full as of the date judgment is obtained.
Sec. 89. (1) Where a buyer makes any subsequent purchases of goods or
services from a seller from whom such buyer has previously purchased goods or
services under one or more installment sales contracts and the amounts under
such contract or contracts to the extent of cash sale price thereof have not
been fully paid, the subsequent purchases may be included in and consolidated
with one or more of the prior contract or contracts. A memorandum of such
additional purchases shall be prepared by the seller and inserted in or
attached to the seller's counterpart of the contract and shall set forth:
(a) The names of the seller and the buyer and a description of the
additional goods or services sold and all the information with respect to the
additional purchase required by section 85 of this act to be included in an
installment sales contract;
(b) The consolidated time-price balance to be paid by the buyer; and
(c) The revised payments.
(2) A copy of such memorandum shall be delivered to the buyer as provided
in and subject to section 85 of this act. When such subsequent purchases are
made, the entire amount of all payments made prior to such subsequent purchases
shall be deemed to have been applied on previous purchases.
(3) Each payment thereafter made on a consolidated installment sales
contract shall be deemed to be allocated to all of the various purchases in the
same ratio or proportion as the original cash sale prices of the various
purchases bear to one another. Where the amount of each deferred payment is
increased in connection with such subsequent purchase, the subsequent payments,
at the seller's option, may be deemed to be allocated as follows: An amount
equal to the original installment payment to the previous purchase, the balance
-61-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
to the subsequent purchase. The amount of any initial payment or downpayment on
the subsequent purchase shall be allocated in its entirety to such subsequent
purchase. This section shall not apply to cases involving equipment, parts, or
other merchandise attached or affixed to goods previously purchased, or to
repairs or services in connection therewith rendered by the seller at the
buyer's request.
Sec. 90. (1) An installment sales contract may provide and the holder
thereof may collect, in addition to any time-price differential, a delinquency
charge on each installment in default for a period of not less than fifteen
days, if provided for in the contract, not in excess of five percent of each
installment or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less, or, in lieu thereof,
interest after maturity on each such installment not exceeding the highest
permissible contract rate. If the time-price differential is computed by
application of the rate charged to the unpaid principal balance for the number
of days actually elapsed, such delinquency charge may not exceed five percent
of each installment or twenty-five dollars, whichever is less. If any
installment payment is made by a check, draft, or similar signed order which is
not honored because of insufficient funds, no account, or any other reason
except an error of a third party to the contract, the holder may charge and
collect a fee of not more than fifteen dollars. The delinquency charge and such
fee may be collected when due or at any time thereafter.
(2) When an installment sales contract is for a commercial or business
purpose (a) a delinquency charge not to exceed five percent of each unpaid
installment may be contracted for and received and (b) the holder of any check
or draft or similar order which is not honored for any reason, except for error
of a third party, may charge and collect a fee as stated in the contract. As
used in this section, commercial or business purpose means primarily for a
purpose other than a personal, family, or household purpose.
Sec. 91. The holder of a retail installment sales contract may, upon
agreement with the buyer:
(1) Extend the scheduled due date or defer the scheduled payment of any
installment payment under the retail installment sales contract; and
(2) Charge and collect a reasonable flat service fee for such extension or
deferment in addition to the time-price differential calculated for the period
of such extension or deferment at the rate originally agreed upon in the retail
installment sales contract on the outstanding balance.
Sec. 92. (1) If any seller or sales finance company, in the making or
collection of an installment sales contract, shall, directly or indirectly,
contract for, take, or receive charges in excess of those authorized by the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act except as a result of an accidental and
bona fide error, such contract shall be void and uncollectible as to (a) all of
the excessive portion of the time-price differential, (b) the first one
thousand dollars of the time-price differential authorized by section 86 of
this act, and (c) the first four thousand dollars of the principal of the
contract.
(2) If any seller or sales finance company violates any provision of the
act, other than the violations described in subsection (1) of this section,
except as a result of an accidental and bona fide error, such installment sales
contract shall be void and uncollectible as to the first five hundred dollars
of the time-price differential and the first one thousand dollars of the
principal of such contract. If any of such money has been paid by the buyer,
such buyer or his or her assignee may recover under the act in a civil suit
brought within one year after the due date, or any extension thereof, of the
last installment of the contract.
Sec. 93. (1) A licensee shall not refuse to enter into a loan or impose
finance charges or other terms or conditions of credit more onerous than those
regularly extended by that licensee to borrowers of similar economic
backgrounds because of the age, color, creed, national origin, political
affiliation, race, religion, sex, marital status, or disability of the borrower
or because the borrower receives public assistance, social security benefits,
pension benefits, or the like.
(2) No licensee shall conduct the business of making loans under the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act within any office, room, or place of
business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in, or in
association or conjunction with any other business, if the director finds that
the other business is of such nature that the conducting of such other business
tends to conceal evasion of the act or of the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act. In such case, the director shall order such licensee
in writing to cease and desist from such conduct.
(3) No licensee shall, directly or indirectly, require a borrower as a
condition of granting a loan to such borrower to reaffirm or otherwise obligate
the borrower to pay a former debt to the licensee which has been discharged in
bankruptcy proceedings.
(4) Any person who makes a false statement to secure a loan is guilty of a
Class III misdemeanor. The punishment shall not be exacted, however, when such
a loan is made after the licensee is aware of the falsity of the statement.
(5) No licensee or other person subject to the Nebraska Installment Loan
and Sales Act shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or
broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published,
distributed, or broadcast in any manner whatsoever any false, misleading, or
deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or
conditions for the lending of money, credit, goods, or things in action. The
director may order any licensee to cease and desist from any conduct which he
-62-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
or she finds to be a violation of this section. The director may require that
rates of charge, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in such
manner as the director deems necessary to prevent misunderstanding by
prospective borrowers.
(6) No loan, made outside this state, in the amount or of the value of
three thousand dollars or less, for which a greater rate of interest,
consideration, or charges than is permitted by section 45-350 has been charged,
contracted for, or received, shall be enforced in this state. Every person
participating in such loan in this state is subject to the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act, except that the act shall not apply to loans legally made
in any state under and in accordance with a regulatory small loan law similar
in principle to such act.
(7) In connection with the collection of any loan, a licensee may not:
(a) Use or threaten to use violence;
(b) Use obscene or profane language;
(c) Cause a telephone to ring or engage a person in telephone conversation
at times known to be inconvenient to the borrower;
(d) Falsely represent the character, amount, or legal status of any debt;
(e) Falsely represent that an individual is an attorney when he or she is
not;
(f) Falsely represent that nonpayment of any debt will result in the
arrest or imprisonment of the borrower or any member of the borrower's
household;
(g) Threaten to take any action that the licensee knows cannot legally be
taken at the time the threat is made;
(h) Falsely represent that the borrower committed any crime when the
borrower did not;
(i) Communicate or threaten to communicate to any person credit
information which is known to be false;
(j) Use or distribute any written communication which falsely represents
that it is a document authorized, issued, or approved by any court, official,
or agency of the United States or any state;
(k) Charge or collect any fees, charges, or expenses, incidental to the
collection of any loan, unless such amount is expressly authorized by the loan
agreement or permitted by law;
(l) Accept from any person a check or other payment instrument postdated
by more than five days unless such person is notified in writing of the
licensee's intent to deposit such check or instrument not more than ten nor
less than three business days prior to such deposit;
(m) Solicit any postdated check or other postdated payment instrument for
the purpose of threatening or instituting criminal prosecution;
(n) Deposit or threaten to deposit any postdated check prior to the date
on such check;
(o) Cause charges to be made to any person for communications by
concealment of the true purpose of the communication, including, but not
limited to, collect telephone calls and telegram fees;
(p) Communicate with a borrower regarding a debt by postcard; or
(q) Communicate with a borrower at the borrower's place of employment if
the licensee has received actual notice that the borrower's employer prohibits
the borrower from receiving such communication.
Sec. 94. (1) The department shall require licensees to be licensed and
registered through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In
order to carry out this requirement, the department is authorized to
participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For this
purpose, the department may establish, by adopting and promulgating rules and
regulations or by order, requirements as necessary. The requirements may
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Background checks of applicants and licensees, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Fingerprints of every executive officer, director, partner, member,
sole proprietor, or shareholder submitted to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and any other governmental agency or entity authorized to receive
such information for a state, national, and international criminal history
record information check;
(ii) Civil or administrative records;
(iii) Credit history; or
(iv) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry;
(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew a license through the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(c) Compliance with prelicensure education and testing and continuing
education;
(d) The setting or resetting, as necessary, of renewal processing or
reporting dates; and
(e) Amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities as the
director deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act, the department is authorized to establish relationships or contracts
with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities
designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect
and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to
licensees or other persons subject to the act. The department may allow such
-63-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
system to collect licensing fees on behalf of the department and allow such
system to collect a processing fee for the services of the system directly from
each licensee or applicant for a license.
(3) The director is required to regularly report violations of the act
pertaining to residential mortgage loans, as defined in section 45-702, as well
as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry subject to the provisions contained in
this section.
(4) The director shall establish a process whereby applicants and
licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry by the director.
(5) The department shall ensure that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry adopts a privacy, data security, and security breach
notification policy. The director shall make available upon written request a
copy of the contract between the department and the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry pertaining to the breach of security of the
system provisions.
(6) The department shall upon written request provide the most recently
available audited financial report of the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry.
(7) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing
information to the United States Department of Justice or any other
governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal
Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (1) of
this section.
(8) In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce the
regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the requirements under
any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any
information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including
the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or
material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the
information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all
federal and state regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight
authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality
protections provided by federal or state law;
(b) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or
confidentiality under subdivision (8)(a) of this section shall not be subject
to:
(i) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to
the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal
government or the respective state; or
(ii) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private
civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege
held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry with respect to
such information or material, the person to whom such information or material
pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that
privilege;
(c) Any state statute relating to the disclosure of confidential
supervisory information or any information or material described in subdivision
(1)(a) of this section that is inconsistent with such subdivision shall be
superseded by the requirements of this section; and
(d) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or
material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated
disciplinary and enforcement actions against, applicants and licensees that is
included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by
the public.
(9) For these purposes, the director is authorized to enter into
agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential
Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing governmental agencies
as established by adopting and promulgating rules and regulations or an order
of the director.
Sec. 95. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and
issue orders, rulings, demands, and findings to carry out the purposes of the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
Sec. 96. Any person violating subsection (4) of section 45-345, section
70 of this act, section 45-356, or section 80 of this act is guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor. If, in the making of, or collection on, any loan contract, any
act is done which constitutes a Class II misdemeanor under this section, that
loan shall not be void, but the licensee shall have no right to collect or
receive any interest or charges whatsoever. If any interest or other charges
have been collected, the licensee shall forfeit and refund to the borrower all
interest and other charges collected on the loan involved and shall not collect
thereafter any interest or other charges contracted for and thereafter due on
the loan involved, as liquidated damages, and the licensee or its assignee, if
found liable, shall pay the costs of any action relating thereto, including
reasonable attorney's fees. No licensee shall be found liable under this
section if the licensee shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the
violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error
-64-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid any
such error.
Sec. 97. Any violation of section 93 of this act, in connection with any
loan transaction, however acquired, shall not render the indebtedness, any
interest, or other charges void or uncollectible. In an action, other than a
class action, the borrower may recover from the licensee violating section 93
of this act an award of liquidated damages in an amount determined by the
court, but not less than five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand
dollars. In any legal action brought pursuant to this section in which the
licensee is found liable, the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney's
fees to the borrower. A licensee is not liable under this section if the
licensee notifies the borrower of an error before the licensee receives from
the borrower written notice of the error or before the borrower has brought an
action under this section and the licensee corrects the error within thirty
days after notifying the borrower. A licensee may not be held liable in any
action brought under this section if the licensee shows by a preponderance of
evidence that the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide
error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid
the error.
Sec. 98. Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any
person is violating or is threatening to or intends to violate the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act, the director may, in addition to any action
provided in the act and without prejudice thereto, enter an order requiring
such person to cease and desist or to refrain from such violation. An action
may also be brought, on the relation of the Attorney General and the director,
to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or from
doing any act or acts in furtherance of such violation. In any such action, an
order or judgment may be entered awarding such preliminary or final injunction
as may be deemed proper. In addition to all other means provided by law for the
enforcement of a restraining order or injunction, the court, in which such
action is brought, has power and jurisdiction to impound and appoint a receiver
for the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers,
documents, and records pertaining thereto or so much thereof as the court may
deem reasonably necessary to prevent violations of the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act through or by means of the use of such property and
business. Such receiver, when so appointed and qualified, has such powers and
duties as to custody, collection, administration, winding up, and liquidation
of such property and business as shall, from time to time, be conferred upon
the receiver by the court.
Sec. 99. (1) The department may order any person to cease and desist
whenever the department determines that the person has violated any provision
of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. Upon entry of a cease and
desist order, the director shall promptly notify the affected person that such
order has been entered, of the reasons for such order, and that upon receipt,
within fifteen business days after the date of the order, of written request
from the affected person a hearing will be scheduled within thirty business
days after the date of receipt of the written request unless the parties
consent to a later date or the hearing officer sets a later date for good
cause. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the director, the
order shall remain in effect until it is modified or vacated.
(2) The director may vacate or modify a cease and desist order if he or
she finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is
otherwise in the public interest to do so.
(3) A person aggrieved by a cease and desist order of the director may
obtain judicial review of the order in the manner prescribed in the
Administrative Procedure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the department under the act. The director may obtain an order
from the district court of Lancaster County for the enforcement of the cease
and desist order.
(4) A person who violates a cease and desist order of the director may,
after notice and hearing and upon further order of the director, be subject to
a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for each act in violation of
the cease and desist order. The department shall remit fines collected under
this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 100. (1) The director may, following a hearing under the
Administrative Procedure Act, impose an administrative fine against any
officer, director, shareholder, partner, or member of a licensee, if the
director finds the licensee or any such person participated in or had knowledge
of any act prohibited by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act or
otherwise violated the act. Such administrative fine shall be in addition to or
separate from any fine imposed against a licensee pursuant to section 45-346.
(2) If the director finds, after notice and hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has knowingly committed any act
prohibited by section 93 of this act or otherwise violated the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act or any rule and regulation or order adopted
thereunder, the director may order such person to pay (a) an administrative
fine of not more than five thousand dollars for each separate violation and (b)
the costs of investigation.
(3) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to this section, a lien in the amount of such
fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of such person in
this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the director. The lien
-65-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
shall attach to the real property of such person when notice of the lien is
filed and indexed against the real property in the office of the register of
deeds in the county where the real property is located. The lien shall attach
to any other property of such person when notice of the lien is filed against
the property in the manner prescribed by law. Failure of the person to pay such
fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the act.
(4) The department shall remit fines collected under this section to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of
the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 101. All original license fees, annual renewal fees, investigation
and examination fees, charges, and costs collected by or paid to the department
pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution Assessment Cash
Fund and shall be available for the uses and purposes of the fund.
Sec. 102. Section 45-702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-702 For purposes of the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act:
(1) Borrower means the mortgagor or mortgagors under a real estate
mortgage or the trustor or trustors under a trust deed;
(2) Branch office means any location at which the business of a mortgage
banker or mortgage loan originator is to be conducted, including (a) any
offices physically located in Nebraska, (b) any offices that, while not
physically located in this state, intend to transact business with Nebraska
residents, and (c) any third-party or home-based locations that mortgage loan
originators, agents, and representatives intend to use to transact business
with Nebraska residents;
(3) Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of
data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the
information maintained by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry, its affiliates, or its subsidiaries;
(4) Clerical or support duties means tasks which occur subsequent to the
receipt of a residential mortgage loan application including (a) the receipt,
collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing
or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan or (b) communication with a
consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting
of a residential mortgage loan, to the extent that such communication does not
include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms or counseling consumers
about residential mortgage loan rates or terms;
(5) Control means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the
management or policies of a mortgage banking business, whether through
ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise. Any person who (a) is a
director, a general partner, or an executive officer, including the president,
chief executive officer, chief financial officer, chief operating officer,
chief legal officer, chief compliance officer, and any individual with similar
status and function, (b) directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten
percent or more of a class of voting security or has the power to sell or
direct the sale of ten percent or more of a class of voting securities, (c) in
the case of a limited liability company, is a managing member, or (d) in the
case of a partnership, has the right to receive, upon dissolution, or has
contributed, ten percent or more of the capital, is presumed to control that
mortgage banking business;
(6) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(7) Depository institution means any person (a) organized or chartered
under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States relating to
banks, savings institutions, trust companies, savings and loan associations,
credit unions, or industrial banks or similar depository institutions which the
Board of Directors of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation finds to be
operating substantially in the same manner as an industrial bank and (b)
engaged in the business of receiving deposits other than funds held in a
fiduciary capacity, including, but not limited to, funds held as trustee,
executor, administrator, guardian, or agent;
(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(9) Dwelling means a residential structure located or intended to be
located in this state that contains one to four units, whether or not that
structure is attached to real property, including an individual condominium
unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, or trailer, if it is used as a residence;
(10) Federal banking agencies means the Board of Governors of the Federal
Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Consumer
Financial Protection Bureau, the National Credit Union Administration, and the
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(11) Immediate family member means a spouse, child, sibling, parent,
grandparent, or grandchild, including stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings,
and adoptive relationships;
(12) Installment loan company means any person that has been issued an
installment loan license licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act;
(13) Licensee means any person licensed under the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act as either a mortgage banker or mortgage loan originator;
(14) Loan processor or underwriter means an individual who (a) performs
clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to
the supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from licensing,
under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act or Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act and (b) does not represent to the public, through advertising or
-66-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
other means of communicating or providing information including the use of
business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional
items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a
mortgage loan originator;
(15) Mortgage banker or mortgage banking business means any person (a)
other than (i) a person exempt under section 45-703, (ii) an individual who is
a loan processor or underwriter, or (iii) an individual who is licensed in this
state as a mortgage loan originator and (b) who, for compensation or gain or in
the expectation of compensation or gain, directly or indirectly makes,
originates, services, negotiates, acquires, sells, arranges for, or offers to
make, originate, service, negotiate, acquire, sell, or arrange for a
residential mortgage loan;
(16)(a) Mortgage loan originator means an individual who for compensation
or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain (i) takes a residential
mortgage loan application or (ii) offers or negotiates terms of a residential
mortgage loan.
(b) Mortgage loan originator does not include (i) an individual engaged
solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in
section 45-727, (ii) a person or entity that only performs real estate
brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Nebraska
law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker,
or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator, and (iii) a person solely involved
in extensions of credit relating to time-share programs as defined in section
76-1702;
(17) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means a licensing
system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and
the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing
and registration of mortgage loan originators, mortgage bankers, installment
loan companies, and other state-regulated financial services entities and
industries;
(18) Nontraditional mortgage product means any residential mortgage loan
product other than a thirty-year fixed rate residential mortgage loan;
(19) Offer means every attempt to provide, offer to provide, or
solicitation to provide a residential mortgage loan or any form of mortgage
banking business. Offer includes, but is not limited to, all general and public
advertising, whether made in print, through electronic media, or by the
Internet;
(20) Person means an association, joint venture, joint-stock company,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business
corporation, nonprofit corporation, individual, or any group of individuals
however organized;
(21) Purchase-money mortgage means a mortgage issued to the borrower by
the seller of the property as part of the purchase transaction;
(22) Real estate brokerage activity means any activity that involves
offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including
(a) acting as a real estate salesperson or real estate broker for a buyer,
seller, lessor, or lessee of real property, (b) bringing together parties
interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property,
(c) negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to
the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, other than in
connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction, (d)
engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required
to be registered or licensed as a real estate salesperson or real estate broker
under any applicable law, and (e) offering to engage in any activity or act in
any capacity described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this
subdivision;
(23) Registered bank holding company means any bank holding company
registered with the department pursuant to the Nebraska Bank Holding Company
Act of 1995;
(24) Registered mortgage loan originator means any individual who (a)
meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of (i) a
depository institution, (ii) a subsidiary that is (A) wholly owned and
controlled by a depository institution and (B) regulated by a federal banking
agency, or (iii) an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration and
(b) is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(25) Registrant means a person registered pursuant to section 45-704;
(26) Residential mortgage loan means any loan or extension of credit,
including a refinancing of a contract of sale or an assumption or refinancing
of a prior loan or extension of credit, which is primarily for personal,
family, or household use and is secured by a mortgage, trust deed, or other
equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real
estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;
(27) Residential real estate means any real property located in this state
upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;
(28) Reverse-mortgage loan means a loan made by a licensee which (a) is
secured by residential real estate, (b) is nonrecourse to the borrower except
in the event of fraud by the borrower or waste to the residential real estate
given as security for the loan, (c) provides cash advances to the borrower
based upon the equity in the borrower's owner-occupied principal residence, (d)
requires no payment of principal or interest until the entire loan becomes due
and payable, and (e) otherwise complies with the terms of section 45-702.01;
-67-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(29) Service means accepting payments or maintenance of escrow accounts in
the regular course of business in connection with a residential mortgage loan;
(30) State means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the
Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the Northern
Mariana Islands; and
(31) Unique identifier means a number or other identifier assigned by
protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.
Sec. 103. Section 45-703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-703 (1) Except as provided in section 45-704, the following shall be
exempt from the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act:
(a) Any depository institution or wholly owned subsidiary thereof;
(b) Any registered bank holding company;
(c) Any insurance company that is subject to regulation by the Department
of Insurance and is either (i) organized or chartered under the laws of
Nebraska or (ii) organized or chartered under the laws of any other state if
such insurance company has a place of business in Nebraska;
(d) Any person licensed to practice law in this state in connection with
activities that are (i) considered the practice of law by the Supreme Court,
(ii) carried out within an attorney-client relationship, and (iii) accomplished
by the attorney in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, ethics, and
standards;
(e) Any person licensed in this state as a real estate broker or real
estate salesperson pursuant to section 81-885.02 who is engaging in real estate
brokerage activities unless such person is compensated by a lender, a mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender,
mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;
(f) Any registered mortgage loan originator when acting for an entity
described in subdivision (24)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of section 45-702;
(g) Any sales finance company licensed pursuant to the Nebraska
Installment Loan and Sales Act if such sales finance company does not engage in
mortgage banking business in any capacity other than as a purchaser or servicer
of an installment sales contract, as defined in section 45-335, which is
secured by a mobile home or trailer;
(h) Any trust company chartered pursuant to the Nebraska Trust Company
Act;
(i) Any wholly owned subsidiary of an organization listed in subdivisions
(b) and (c) of this subsection if the listed organization maintains a place of
business in Nebraska;
(j) Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential
mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the
individual;
(k) Any individual who does not repetitively and habitually engage in the
business of a mortgage banker, a mortgage loan originator, or a loan processor
or underwriter, either inside or outside of this state, who (i) makes a
residential mortgage loan with his or her own funds for his or her own
investment, (ii) makes a purchase-money mortgage, or (iii) finances the sale of
a dwelling or residential real estate owned by such individual without the
intent to resell the residential mortgage loan;
(l) Any employee or independent agent of a mortgage banker licensed or
registered pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act or exempt from
the act if such employee or independent agent does not conduct the activities
of a mortgage loan originator or loan processor or underwriter;
(m) The United States of America; the State of Nebraska; any other state,
district, territory, commonwealth, or possession of the United States of
America; any city, county, or other political subdivision; and any agency or
division of any of the foregoing;
(n) The Nebraska Investment Finance Authority;
(o) Any individual who is an employee of an entity described in
subdivision (m) or (n) of this subsection and who acts as a mortgage loan
originator or loan processor or underwriter only pursuant to his or her
official duties as an employee of such entity;
(p) A bona fide nonprofit organization which has received a certificate of
exemption pursuant to section 45-703.01; and
(q) Any employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization which has received
a certificate of exemption pursuant to section 45-703.01 if such employee acts
as a mortgage loan originator or mortgage loan processor or underwriter (i)
only with respect to his or her work duties for the nonprofit organization and
(ii) only with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms that are
favorable to the borrower.
(2) It shall not be necessary to negate any of the exemptions provided in
this section in any complaint, information, indictment, or other writ or
proceedings brought under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act, and the
burden of establishing the right to any exemption shall be upon the person
claiming the benefit of such exemption.
Sec. 104. Section 45-705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-705 (1) No person shall act as a mortgage banker or use the title
mortgage banker in this state unless he, she, or it is licensed as a mortgage
banker, is registered with the department as provided in section 45-704, is
licensed as an installment loan company under the Nebraska Installment Loan and
Sales Act, or is otherwise exempt from the act pursuant to section 45-703.
-68-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(2) Applicants for a license as a mortgage banker shall submit to the
department an application on a form prescribed by the department. The
application shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the applicant's corporate
name and no more than one trade name or doing business as designation which the
applicant intends to use in this state, if applicable, (b) the applicant's main
office address, (c) all branch office addresses at which business is to be
conducted, (d) the names and titles of each director and principal officer of
the applicant, (e) the names of all shareholders, partners, or members of the
applicant, (f) a description of the activities of the applicant in such detail
as the department may require, (g) if the applicant is an individual, his or
her social security number, and (h) fingerprints of any principal officer,
director, partner, member, or sole proprietor for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and any other governmental agency or entity authorized
to receive such information for a state, national, and international criminal
history record information check.
(3) The application for a license as a mortgage banker shall include or be
accompanied by, in a manner as prescribed by the director, (a) the name and
street address in this state of a registered agent appointed by the licensee
for receipt of service of process and (b) the written consent of the registered
agent to the appointment. A post office box number may be provided in addition
to the street address.
(4) The application for a license as a mortgage banker shall be
accompanied by an application fee of four hundred dollars and, if applicable, a
seventy-five-dollar fee for each branch office listed in the application and
any processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 45-748.
(5) The application for a license as a mortgage banker shall include or be
accompanied by, in a manner as prescribed by the director, a background
investigation of each applicant by means of fingerprints and a check of his or
her criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. If
the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or other form of
business organization, the director shall require a criminal history record
information check on each member, director, or principal officer of each
applicant or any individual acting in the capacity of the manager of an office
location. Fingerprints of any principal officer, director, partner, member, or
sole proprietor shall be submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and
any other governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information
for a state, national, and international criminal history record information
check. The applicant shall be responsible for the direct costs associated with
criminal history record information checks performed. The information obtained
thereby may be used by the director to determine the applicant's eligibility
for licensing under this section. Except as authorized pursuant to subsection
(2) of section 45-748, receipt of criminal history record information by a
private person or entity is prohibited.
(6) In order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of
Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (5) of this
section, the director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing
information to the United States Department of Justice or any other
governmental agency.
(7) A license as a mortgage banker granted under the Residential Mortgage
Licensing Act shall not be assignable.
(8) An application is deemed filed when accepted as substantially complete
by the director.
Sec. 105. Section 45-729, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-729 (1) The director shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license
unless the director makes at a minimum the following findings:
(a) The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked
in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of
such revocation shall not be deemed a revocation;
(b) The applicant has not been convicted of, or pleaded guilty or nolo
contendere or its equivalent to, in a domestic, foreign, or military court:
(i) A misdemeanor under any state or federal law which involves dishonesty
or fraud or which involves any aspect of the business of a mortgage banker,
depository institution, or installment loan company unless such individual has
received a pardon for such conviction or such conviction has been expunged,
except that the director may consider the underlying crime, facts, and
circumstances of a pardoned or expunged conviction in determining the
applicant's eligibility for a license pursuant to subdivision (c) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Any felony under state or federal law unless such individual has
received a pardon for such conviction or such conviction has been expunged,
except that the director may consider the underlying crime, facts, and
circumstances of a pardoned or expunged conviction in determining the
applicant's eligibility for a license pursuant to subdivision (c) of this
subsection;
(c) The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character,
and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to
warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate
honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act. For purposes of this subsection, an individual has
shown that he or she is not financially responsible when he or she has shown a
-69-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
disregard in the management of his or her own financial condition. The director
may consider the following factors in making a determination as to financial
responsibility:
(i) The applicant's current outstanding judgments except judgments solely
as a result of medical expenses;
(ii) The applicant's current outstanding tax liens or other government
liens and filings;
(iii) The applicant's foreclosures within the past three years; and
(iv) A pattern of seriously delinquent accounts within the past three
years by the applicant;
(d) The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirements
described in section 45-730;
(e) The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test
requirement described in section 45-731; and
(f) The applicant is covered by a surety bond as required pursuant to
section 45-724 or a supplemental surety bond as required pursuant to section
45-338 45-1007.
(2)(a) If the director determines that a mortgage loan originator license
application should be denied, the director shall notify the applicant in
writing of the denial and of the reasons for the denial.
(b) The director shall not deny an application for a mortgage loan
originator license because of the failure to submit information required under
the act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act without
first giving the applicant an opportunity to correct the deficiency by
supplying the missing information.
(c) If an applicant for a mortgage loan originator license does not
complete his or her license application and fails to respond to a notice or
notices from the department to correct the deficiency or deficiencies for a
period of one hundred twenty days or more after the date the department sends
the initial notice after initial filing of the application, the department may
deem the application as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of the
application to the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the application.
(d) A decision of the director denying a mortgage loan originator license
application pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act may be appealed.
The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.
(3) A mortgage loan originator license shall not be assignable.
Sec. 106. Section 45-734, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-734 (1) A mortgage loan originator whose license is placed on inactive
status under this section shall not act as a mortgage loan originator in this
state until such time as the license is reactivated.
(2) The department shall place a mortgage loan originator license on
inactive status upon the occurrence of one of the following:
(a) Upon receipt of a notice from either the licensed mortgage banker,
registrant, installment loan company, or mortgage loan originator that the
mortgage loan originator's relationship as an employee or independent agent of
a licensed mortgage banker or installment loan company has been terminated;
(b) Upon the cancellation of the employing licensed mortgage banker's
license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the cancellation of the employing
installment loan company's license pursuant to subsection (5) subdivision (3)
(b) of section 45-338 45-1033 for failure to maintain the required surety bond;
(c) Upon the voluntary surrender of the employing licensed mortgage
banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the voluntary surrender of
the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to section 45-341
45-1032;
(d) Upon the expiration of the employing licensed mortgage banker's
license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the expiration of the employing
installment loan company's license pursuant to subsection (3) subdivision (3)
(a) of section 45-340 45-1033 if such mortgage loan originator has renewed his
or her license pursuant to section 45-732;
(e) Upon the revocation or suspension of the employing licensed mortgage
banker's license pursuant to section 45-742 or upon the revocation or
suspension of the employing installment loan company's license pursuant to
subsection (2) (1) of section 45-341 45-1033; or
(f) Upon the cancellation, surrender, or expiration of the employing
registrant's registration with the department.
(3) If a mortgage loan originator license becomes inactive under this
section, the license shall remain inactive until the license expires, the
licenseholder surrenders the license, the license is revoked or suspended
pursuant to section 45-742, or the license is reactivated.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a mortgage loan
originator who holds an inactive mortgage loan originator license may renew
such inactive license if he or she remains otherwise eligible for renewal
pursuant to section 45-732 except for being covered by a surety bond pursuant
to subdivision (1)(f) of section 45-729. Such renewal shall not reactivate the
license.
(5) A mortgage loan originator who holds an inactive mortgage loan
originator license that has been renewed one time may not renew such inactive
license for a second annual licensing period unless (a) the inactive license
was reactivated after such inactive license was renewed or (b) the mortgage
loan originator demonstrates good cause to the director to allow renewal of the
inactive license for an additional annual licensing period.
-70-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(6) The department has the authority to reactivate a mortgage loan
originator license upon receipt of a notice pursuant to section 45-735 that the
mortgage loan originator licensee has been hired as a mortgage loan originator
by a licensed mortgage banker, registrant, or installment loan company and if
such mortgage loan originator meets the conditions for licensing at the time
the reactivation notice is received, including, but not limited to, coverage by
a surety bond pursuant to subdivision (1)(f) of section 45-729.
Sec. 107. Section 45-804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
45-804 A credit services organization, a salesperson, an agent, or a
representative of a credit services organization, or an independent contractor
who sells or attempts to sell the services of a credit services organization
shall not:
(1) Charge a buyer or receive from a buyer money or other valuable
consideration before completing performance of all services, other than those
described in subdivision (2) of this section, which the credit services
organization has agreed to perform for the buyer unless the credit services
organization has obtained a surety bond or established and maintained a surety
account as provided in section 45-805;
(2) Charge a buyer or receive from a buyer money or other valuable
consideration for obtaining or attempting to obtain an extension of credit that
the credit services organization has agreed to obtain for the buyer before the
extension of credit is obtained;
(3) Charge a buyer or receive from a buyer money or other valuable
consideration solely for referral of the buyer to a retail seller who will or
may extend credit to the buyer if the credit that is or will be extended to the
buyer is substantially the same as that available to the general public;
(4) Make or use a false or misleading representation in the offer or sale
of the services of a credit services organization, including (a) guaranteeing
to erase bad credit or words to that effect unless the representation clearly
discloses that this can be done only if the credit history is inaccurate or
obsolete and (b) guaranteeing an extension of credit regardless of the person's
previous credit problem or credit history unless the representation clearly
discloses the eligibility requirements for obtaining an extension of credit;
(5) Engage, directly or indirectly, in a fraudulent or deceptive act,
practice, or course of business in connection with the offer or sale of the
services of a credit services organization;
(6) Make or advise a buyer to make a statement with respect to a buyer's
credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity that is false or
misleading or that should be known by the exercise of reasonable care to be
false or misleading to a consumer reporting agency or to a person who has
extended credit to a buyer or to whom a buyer is applying for an extension of
credit;
(7) Advertise or cause to be advertised, in any manner whatsoever, the
services of a credit services organization without filing a registration
statement with the Secretary of State under section 45-806 unless otherwise
provided by the Credit Services Organization Act; or
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, charge any brokerage fees
or any other fees or charges whatsoever in connection with a loan governed by
the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.
Sec. 108. Section 69-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
69-2103 For purposes of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act:
(1) Advertisement means a commercial message in any medium that aids,
promotes, or assists directly or indirectly a consumer rental purchase
agreement but does not include in-store merchandising aids such as window signs
and ceiling banners;
(2) Cash price means the price at which the lessor would have sold the
property to the consumer for cash on the date of the consumer rental purchase
agreement for the property;
(3) Consumer means a natural person who rents property under a consumer
rental purchase agreement;
(4) Consumer rental purchase agreement means an agreement which is for the
use of property by a consumer primarily for personal, family, or household
purposes, which is for an initial period of four months or less, whether or not
there is any obligation beyond the initial period, which is automatically
renewable with each payment, and which permits the consumer to become the owner
of the property. A consumer rental purchase agreement in compliance with the
act shall not be construed to be a lease or agreement which constitutes a
credit sale as defined in 12 C.F.R. 1026.2(a)(16), as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2024, and 15 U.S.C. 1602(h), as such section existed on January
1, 2024, or a lease which constitutes a consumer lease as defined in 12 C.F.R.
1013.2, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2024. Consumer rental purchase
agreement does not include:
(a) Any lease for agricultural, business, or commercial purposes;
(b) Any lease made to an organization;
(c) A lease or agreement which constitutes an installment sale or
installment sales contract as defined in section 45-335;
(d) A security interest as defined in subdivision (35) of section 1-201,
Uniform Commercial Code; and
(e) A home solicitation sale as defined in section 69-1601;
(5) Consummation means the occurrence of an event which causes a consumer
to become contractually obligated on a consumer rental purchase agreement;
-71-

LB474 LB474
2025 2025
(6) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(7) Lease payment means a payment to be made by the consumer for the right
of possession and use of the property for a specific lease period but does not
include taxes imposed on such payment;
(8) Lease period means a week, month, or other specific period of time,
during which the consumer has the right to possess and use the property after
paying the lease payment and applicable taxes for such period;
(9) Lessor means a person who in the ordinary course of business operates
a commercial outlet which regularly leases, offers to lease, or arranges for
the leasing of property under a consumer rental purchase agreement;
(10) Property means any property that is not real property under the laws
of this state when made available for a consumer rental purchase agreement; and
(11) Total of payments to acquire ownership means the total of all charges
imposed by the lessor and payable by the consumer as a condition of acquiring
ownership of the property. Total of payments to acquire ownership includes
lease payments and any initial nonrefundable administrative fee or required
delivery charge but does not include taxes, late charges, reinstatement fees,
or charges for optional products or services.
Sec. 109. Section 76-2711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-2711 Homeowner means the owner of a residence in foreclosure, including
a vendee under a contract for deed to real property as defined in section
45-335 45-1002.
Sec. 110. Section 4, Legislative Bill 527, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) No later than January 1, 2026, the Director of Insurance shall
establish a schedule for the collection of a tax of not to exceed six percent
of the gross amount of non-medicare direct writing premiums written under a
health maintenance organization certificate of authority pursuant to section
44-32,115, to the extent not preempted by federal law, during the current year
for business done in the state. The director shall remit the tax paid under
this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall annually credit
the entirety of the tax remitted to the Medicaid Access and Quality Fund.
(2) No later than August 1, 2025, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall amend the medicaid state plan or file other federal authorizing
documents necessary to receive federal financial participation for the Medicaid
Access and Quality Act.
(3) The tax established by this section shall be effective January 1,
2026, and applies to premiums received during the current calendar year and
each year thereafter.
Sec. 111. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36,
37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 51, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58,
59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78,
79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98,
99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 113, and 114 of this act
become operative on October 1, 2025. The other sections of this act become
operative on their effective date.
Sec. 112. Original sections 44-502 and 44-4109.01, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 4, Legislative Bill 527, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 113. Original sections 8-319, 8-330, 8-601, 8-820.01, 8-2701,
8-2702, 8-2703, 8-2704, 8-2705, 8-2706, 8-2707, 8-2708, 8-2709, 8-2710, 8-2711,
8-2712, 8-2713, 8-2714, 8-2715, 8-2716, 8-2717, 8-2718, 8-2719, 8-2720, 8-2721,
8-2722, 8-2723, 8-2725, 8-2726, 8-2727, 8-2728, 8-2731, 8-2732, 8-2733, 8-2734,
8-2736, 8-2737, 8-2738, 8-2739, 8-2740, 8-2741, 8-2742, 8-3027, 44-1703,
45-101.04, 45-1,110, 45-334, 45-335, 45-336, 45-337, 45-338, 45-339, 45-340,
45-341, 45-342, 45-343, 45-344, 45-345, 45-347, 45-348, 45-350, 45-351, 45-352,
45-353, 45-355, 45-356, 45-702, 45-703, 45-705, 45-729, 45-734, 45-804, and
76-2711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 8-602, 8-2729, 8-2730,
8-2735, 8-3025, 45-346, 45-354, and 69-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 8-2724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, as amended by section 18, Legislative Bill 251, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 114. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 8-2743,
8-2744, 8-2745, 8-2746, 8-2747, 45-351.01, 45-1001, 45-1004, 45-1007, 45-1008,
45-1009, 45-1010, 45-1011, 45-1012, 45-1013, 45-1014, 45-1015, 45-1016,
45-1017, 45-1019, 45-1020, 45-1021, 45-1022, 45-1023, 45-1024, 45-1025,
45-1026, 45-1027, 45-1028, 45-1029, 45-1030, 45-1031, 45-1032, 45-1033,
45-1033.02, 45-1034, 45-1035, 45-1036, 45-1037, 45-1038, 45-1039, 45-1040,
45-1041, 45-1042, 45-1043, 45-1044, 45-1045, 45-1046, 45-1047, 45-1048,
45-1049, 45-1050, 45-1051, 45-1052, 45-1053, 45-1054, 45-1055, 45-1056,
45-1057, 45-1058, 45-1059, 45-1060, 45-1061, 45-1062, 45-1063, 45-1064,
45-1065, 45-1066, 45-1067, 45-1068, 45-1069, and 45-1070, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 45-346.01, 45-1002, 45-1003, 45-1005,
45-1006, 45-1018, and 45-1033.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-72-